


Also by Olivia Laing
To the River
The Trip to Echo Spring
OLIVIA LAING
The Lonely City
Adventures in the Art of Being Alone
Published in Great Britain in 2016 by Canongate Books Ltd, 14 High Street, Edinburgh EH1 1TE
www.canongate.tv
This digital edition first published in 2016 by Canongate Books
Copyright © Olivia Laing, 2016
The moral right of the author has been asserted
For permissions acknowledgements, please see the Notes beginning on page 285
Every effort has been made to trace copyright holders and obtain their permission for the use of
copyright material. The publisher apologises for any errors or omissions and would be grateful if notified
of any corrections that should be incorporated in future reprints or editions of this book.
British Library Cataloguing-in-Publication Data
A catalogue record for this book is available on request from the British Library
ISBN 978 1 78211 123 8
eISBN 978 1 78211 124 5
Typeset in Bembo by Palimpsest Book Production Ltd, Falkirk, Stirlingshire
If you’re lonely,
this one’s for you
and every one members one of another
Romans 12:5
CONTENTS
1 The Lonely City
2 Walls of Glass
3 My Heart Opens to Your Voice
4 In Loving Him
5 The Realms of the Unreal
6 At the Beginning of the End of the World
7 Render Ghosts
8 Strange Fruit
Notes
Bibliography
Acknowledgements
List of Illustrations

1
THE LONELY CITY
IMAGINE STANDING BY A WINDOW at night, on the sixth or seventeenth or fortythird floor of a building. The city reveals itself as a set of cells, a hundred
thousand windows, some darkened and some flooded with green or white or
golden light. Inside, strangers swim to and fro, attending to the business of
their private hours. You can see them, but you can‘t reach them, and so this
commonplace urban phenomenon, available in any city of the world on any
night, conveys to even the most social a tremor of loneliness, its uneasy
combination of separation and exposure.
You can be lonely anywhere, but there is a particular flavour to the
loneliness that comes from living in a city, surrounded by millions of people.
One might think this state was antithetical to urban living, to the massed
presence of other human beings, and yet mere physical proximity is not
enough to dispel a sense of internal isolation. It’s possible – easy, even – to
feel desolate and unfrequented in oneself while living cheek by jowl with
others. Cities can be lonely places, and in admitting this we see that
loneliness doesn’t necessarily require physical solitude, but rather an
absence or paucity of connection, closeness, kinship: an inability, for one
reason or another, to find as much intimacy as is desired. Unhappy, as the
dictionary has it, as a result of being without the companionship of others.
Hardly any wonder, then, that it can reach its apotheosis in a crowd.
Loneliness is difficult to confess; difficult too to categorise. Like
depression, a state with which it often intersects, it can run deep in the fabric
of a person, as much a part of one’s being as laughing easily or having red
hair. Then again, it can be transient, lapping in and out in reaction to external
circumstance, like the loneliness that follows on the heels of a bereavement,
break-up or change in social circles.
Like depression, like melancholy or restlessness, it is subject too to
pathologisation, to being considered a disease. It has been said emphatically
that loneliness serves no purpose, that it is, as Robert Weiss puts it in his
seminal work on the subject, ‘a chronic disease without redeeming features’.
Statements like this have a more than casual link with the belief that our
whole purpose is as coupled creatures, or that happiness can or should be a
permanent possession. But not everyone shares that fate. Perhaps I’m wrong,
but I don’t think any experience so much a part of our common shared lives
can be entirely devoid of meaning, without a richness and a value of some
kind.
In her diary of 1929, Virginia Woolf described a sense of inner loneliness
that she thought might be illuminating to analyse, adding: ‘If I could catch the
feeling, I would: the feeling of the singing of the real world, as one is driven
by loneliness and silence from the habitable world.’ Interesting, the idea that
loneliness might be taking you towards an otherwise unreachable experience
of reality.
Not so long ago, I spent a period in New York City, that teeming island of
gneiss and concrete and glass, inhabiting loneliness on a daily basis. Though
it wasn’t by any means a comfortable experience, I began to wonder if Woolf
wasn’t right, if there wasn’t more to the experience than meets the eye – if, in
fact, it didn’t drive one to consider some of the larger questions of what it is
to be alive.
There were things that burned away at me, not only as a private individual,
but also as a citizen of our century, our pixelated age. What does it mean to
be lonely? How do we live, if we’re not intimately engaged with another
human being? How do we connect with other people, particularly if we don’t
find speaking easy? Is sex a cure for loneliness, and if it is, what happens if
our body or sexuality is considered deviant or damaged, if we are ill or
unblessed with beauty? And is technology helping with these things? Does it
draw us closer together, or trap us behind screens?
I was by no means the only person who’d puzzled over these questions.
All kinds of writers, artists, filmmakers and songwriters have explored the
subject of loneliness in one way or another, attempting to gain purchase on it,
to tackle the issues that it provokes. But I was at the time beginning to fall in
love with images, to find a solace in them that I didn’t find elsewhere, and so
I conducted the majority of my investigations within the realm of visual art. I
was possessed with a desire to find correlates, physical evidence that other
people had inhabited my state, and during my time in Manhattan I began to
gather up works of art that seemed to articulate or be troubled by loneliness,
particularly as it manifests in the modern city and even more particularly as it
has manifested in the city of New York over the past seventy or so years.
Initially it was the images themselves that drew me, but as I burrowed in, I
began to encounter the people behind them: people who had grappled in their
lives as well as work with loneliness and its attendant issues. Of all the many
documenters of the lonely city whose work educated or moved me, and who I
consider in the pages ahead – among them Alfred Hitchcock, Valerie
Solanas, Nan Goldin, Klaus Nomi, Peter Hujar, Billie Holiday, Zoe Leonard
and Jean-Michel Basquiat – I became most closely interested in four artists:
Edward Hopper, Andy Warhol, Henry Darger and David Wojnarowicz. Not
all of them were permanent inhabitants of loneliness, by any means,
suggesting instead a diversity of positions and angles of attack. All, however,
were hyper-alert to the gulfs between people, to how it can feel to be
islanded amid a crowd.
This seems particularly unlikely in the case of Andy Warhol, who was
after all famous for his relentless sociability. He was almost never without a
glittering entourage and yet his work is surprisingly eloquent on isolation and
the problems of attachment, issues he struggled with lifelong. Warhol’s art
patrols the space between people, conducting a grand philosophical
investigation into closeness and distance, intimacy and estrangement. Like
many lonely people, he was an inveterate hoarder, making and surrounding
himself with objects, barriers against the demands of human intimacy.
Terrified of physical contact, he rarely left the house without an armoury of
cameras and tape recorders, using them to broker and buffer interactions:
behaviour that has light to shed on how we deploy technology in our own
century of so-called connectivity.
The janitor and outsider artist Henry Darger inhabited the opposite
extreme. He lived alone in a boarding house in the city of Chicago, creating
in a near-total void of companionship or audience a fictional universe
populated by wonderful and frightening beings. When he gave up his room
unwillingly at the age of eighty to die in a Catholic mission home, it was
found to be stuffed with hundreds of exquisite and disturbing paintings, work
he’d apparently never shown to another human being. Darger’s life
illuminates the social forces that drive isolation – and the way the
imagination can work to resist it.
Just as these artists’ lives varied in sociability, so their work handled or
moved around the subject of loneliness in a multitude of ways, sometimes
tackling it directly and sometimes dealing with subjects – sex, illness, abuse
– that were themselves sources of stigma or isolation. Edward Hopper, that
rangy, taciturn man, was occupied, though he sometimes denied it, with the
expression of urban loneliness in visual terms, its translation into paint.
Almost a century on, his images of solitary men and women glimpsed behind
glass in deserted cafés, offices and hotel lobbies remain the signature images
of isolation in the city.
You can show what loneliness looks like, and you can also take up arms
against it, making things that serve explicitly as communication devices,
resisting censorship and silence. This was the driving motivation of David
Wojnarowicz, a still under-known American artist, photographer, writer and
activist, whose courageous, extraordinary body of work did more than
anything to release me from the burden of feeling that in my solitude I was
shamefully alone.
Loneliness, I began to realise, was a populated place: a city in itself. And
when one inhabits a city, even a city as rigorously and logically constructed
as Manhattan, one starts by getting lost. Over time, you begin to develop a
mental map, a collection of favoured destinations and preferred routes: a
labyrinth no other person could ever precisely duplicate or reproduce. What
I was building in those years, and what now follows, is a map of loneliness,
built out of both need and interest, pieced together from my own experiences
and those of others. I wanted to understand what it means to be lonely, and
how it has functioned in people’s lives, to attempt to chart the complex
relationship between loneliness and art.
A long time back, I used to listen to a song by Dennis Wilson. It was from
Pacific Ocean Blue, the album he made after The Beach Boys fell apart.
There was a line in it I loved: Loneliness is a very special place. As a
teenager, sitting on my bed on autumn evenings, I used to imagine that place
as a city, perhaps at dusk, when everyone turns homeward and the neon
flickers into life. I recognised myself even then as one of its citizens and I
liked how Wilson claimed it; how he made it sound fertile as well as
frightening.
Loneliness is a very special place. It isn’t always easy to see the truth of
Wilson’s statement, but over the course of my travels I’ve come to believe
that he was right, that loneliness is by no means a wholly worthless
experience, but rather one that cuts right to the heart of what we value and
what we need. Many marvellous things have emerged from the lonely city:
things forged in loneliness, but also things that function to redeem it.

2
WALLS OF GLASS
I NEVER WENT SWIMMING IN New York. I came and went, but never stuck a
summer, and so all the outdoor pools I coveted remained empty, their water
spirited away for the duration of the long off-season. Mostly, I stayed on the
eastern edges of the island, downtown, taking cheap sublets in East Village
tenements or in co-ops built for garment workers, where day and night you
could hear the hum of traffic crossing the Williamsburg Bridge. Walking
home from whatever temporary office I’d found that day, I’d sometimes take
a detour by Hamilton Fish Park, where there was a library and a twelve-lane
pool, painted a pale flaking blue. I was lonely at the time, lonely and adrift,
and this spectral blue space, filling at its corners with blown brown leaves,
never failed to tug my heart.
What does it feel like to be lonely? It feels like being hungry: like being
hungry when everyone around you is readying for a feast. It feels shameful
and alarming, and over time these feelings radiate outwards, making the
lonely person increasingly isolated, increasingly estranged. It hurts, in the
way that feelings do, and it also has physical consequences that take place
invisibly, inside the closed compartments of the body. It advances, is what
I’m trying to say, cold as ice and clear as glass, enclosing and engulfing.
Most of the time, I sublet a friend’s apartment on East 2nd Street, in a
neighbourhood full of community gardens. It was an unreconstructed
tenement, painted arsenic green, with a clawfooted bathtub in the kitchen,
concealed behind a moulding curtain. The first night I arrived there, jetlagged and bleary, I caught a smell of gas that grew increasingly pronounced
as I lay unsleeping on the high platform bed. In the end I called 911 and a few
minutes later three firemen trooped in, relit the pilot light and then hung about
in their big boots, admiring the wooden floor. There was a framed poster
above the oven from a 1980s Martha Clarke performance called Miracolo
d’Amore. It showed two actors dressed in the white suits and pointed hats of
the Commedia dell’Arte. One was moving towards a lit doorway, and the
other had flung both hands up in a gesture of horrified alarm.
Miracolo d’Amore. I was in the city because I’d fallen in love, headlong
and too precipitously, and had tumbled and found myself unexpectedly
unhinged. During the false spring of desire, the man and I had cooked up a
hare-brained plan in which I would leave England and join him permanently
in New York. When he changed his mind, very suddenly, expressing
increasingly grave reservations into a series of hotel phones, I found myself
adrift, stunned by the swift arrival and even swifter departure of everything I
thought I lacked.
In the absence of love, I found myself clinging hopelessly to the city itself:
the repeating tapestry of psychics and bodegas, the bump and grind of traffic,
the live lobsters on the corner of Ninth Avenue, the steam drifting up from
beneath the streets. I didn’t want to lose the flat I’d rented in England for
almost a decade, but I also had no ties, no work or family commitments to
tether me in place. I found a lodger and scrimped the money for a plane
ticket, not knowing then that I was entering a maze, a walled city within the
island of Manhattan itself.
But already this isn’t quite right. The first apartment I had wasn’t on the
island at all. It was in Brooklyn Heights, a few blocks away from where I
would have been living in the alternate reality of accomplished love, the
ghostly other life that haunted me for almost two full years. I arrived in
September, and at immigration the guard said to me without a trace of
friendliness why are your hands shaking? The Van Wyck Expressway was
the same as ever, bleak, unpromising, and it took several attempts to open the
big door with the keys my friend had FedExed me weeks back.
I’d only seen the apartment once before. It was a studio, with a kitchenette
and an elegantly masculine bathroom tiled all in black. There was another
ironic, unsettling poster on the wall, a vintage advert for some kind of bottled
drink. A beaming woman, her lower half a glowing lemon, spritzing a tree
hung liberally with fruit. It seemed to epitomise sunny abundance, but the
light never really made it past the brownstones opposite, and it was clear that
I was tucked up on the wrong side of the house. There was a laundry room
downstairs, but I was too new to New York to know what a luxury that was,
and went down unwillingly, scared the basement door would slam, trapping
me in the dripping, Tide-smelling dark.
Most days I did the same things. Go out for eggs and coffee, walk
aimlessly through the exquisite cobbled streets or down to the promenade to
gaze at the East River, pushing each day a little further until I reached the
park at Dumbo, where on Sundays you’d see the Puerto Rican wedding
couples come to have their photos taken, the girls in enormous sculptural
lime-green and fuchsia dresses that made everything else look tired and staid.
Manhattan across the water, the glittering towers. I was working, but I didn’t
have anything like enough to do, and the bad times came in the evenings,
when I went back to my room, sat on the couch and watched the world
outside me going on through glass, a light bulb at a time.
I wanted very much not to be where I was. In fact part of the trouble
seemed to be that where I was wasn’t anywhere at all. My life felt empty and
unreal and I was embarrassed about its thinness, the way one might be
embarrassed about wearing a stained or threadbare piece of clothing. I felt
like I was in danger of vanishing, though at the same time the feelings I had
were so raw and overwhelming that I often wished I could find a way of
losing myself altogether, perhaps for a few months, until the intensity
diminished. If I could have put what I was feeling into words, the words
would have been an infant’s wail: I don’t want to be alone. I want someone
to want me. I’m lonely. I’m scared. I need to be loved, to be touched, to be
held. It was the sensation of need that frightened me the most, as if I’d lifted
the lid on an unappeasable abyss. I stopped eating very much and my hair fell
out and lay noticeably on the wooden floor, adding to my disquiet.
I’d been lonely before, but never like this. Loneliness had waxed in
childhood, and waned in the more social years that followed. I’d lived by
myself since my mid-twenties, often in relationships but sometimes not.
Mostly I liked the solitude, or, when I didn’t, felt fairly certain I’d sooner or
later drift into another liaison, another love. The revelation of loneliness, the
omnipresent, unanswerable feeling that I was in a state of lack, that I didn’t
have what people were supposed to, and that this was down to some grave
and no doubt externally unmistakable failing in my person: all this had
quickened lately, the unwelcome consequence of being so summarily
dismissed. I don’t suppose it was unrelated, either, to the fact that I was
keeling towards the midpoint of my thirties, an age at which female aloneness
is no longer socially sanctioned and carries with it a persistent whiff of
strangeness, deviance and failure.
Outside the window, people threw dinner parties. The man upstairs
listened to jazz and show tunes at full blast, and filled the hallways with pot
smoke, snaking fragrantly down the stairs. Sometimes I spoke to the waiter in
my morning café, and once he gave me a poem, typed neatly on thick white
paper. But mostly I didn’t speak. Mostly I was walled up inside myself, and
certainly a very long way from anyone else. I didn’t cry often, but once I
couldn’t get the blinds closed and then I did. It seemed too awful, I suppose,
the idea that anyone could peer over and get a glimpse of me, eating cereal
standing up or combing over emails, my face illuminated by the laptop’s
glare.
I knew what I looked like. I looked like a woman in a Hopper painting.
The girl in Automat, maybe, in a cloche hat and green coat, gazing into a cup
of coffee, the window behind her reflecting two rows of lights, swimming
into blackness. Or the one in Morning Sun, who sits on her bed, hair twisted
into a messy bun, gazing through her window at the city beyond. A pretty
morning, light washing the walls, but nonetheless something desolate about
her eyes and jaw, her slim wrists crossed over her legs. I often sat just like
that, adrift in rumpled sheets, trying not to feel, trying simply to take
consecutive breaths.
The one I found most disturbing was Hotel Window. Looking at it was like
gazing into a fortune teller’s mirror, through which you glimpse the future, its
spoiled contours, its deficit of promise. This woman is older, tense and
unapproachable, sitting on a navy couch in an empty drawing room or lobby.
She’s dressed to go out, in a smart ruby-coloured hat and cape, and is
twisting to look down into the darkening street below, though there’s nothing
out there save a gleaming portico and the stubborn black window of the
building opposite.
Asked about the origins of this painting, Hopper once said in his evasive
way: ‘It’s nothing accurate at all, just an improvisation of things I’ve seen.
It’s no particular hotel lobby, but many times I’ve walked through the Thirties
from Broadway to Fifth Avenue and there are a lot of cheesy hotels there.
That probably suggested it. Lonely? Yes, I guess it’s lonelier than I planned it
really.’
What is it about Hopper? Every once in a while an artist comes along who
articulates an experience, not necessarily consciously or willingly, but with
such prescience and intensity that the association becomes indelible. He
never much liked the idea that his paintings could be pinned down, or that
loneliness was his metier, his central theme. ‘The loneliness thing is
overdone,’ he once told his friend Brian O’Doherty, in one of the very few
long interviews to which he submitted. And again, in the documentary
Hopper’s Silence, when O’Doherty asks: ‘Are your paintings reflective of
the isolation of modern life?’ A pause, then Hopper says tersely: ‘It may be
true. It may not be true.’ Later, asked what draws him to the dark scenes he
favours, he replies opaquely: ‘I suppose it’s just me.’
Why, then, do we persist in ascribing loneliness to his work? The obvious
answer is that his paintings tend to be populated by people alone, or in
uneasy, uncommunicative groupings of twos and threes, fastened into poses
that seem indicative of distress. But there’s something else too; something
about the way he contrives his city streets. As the Whitney curator Carter
Foster observes in Hopper’s Drawings, Hopper routinely reproduces in his
paintings ‘certain kinds of spaces and spatial experiences common in New
York that result from being physically close to others but separated from them
by a variety of factors, including movement, structures, windows, walls and
light or darkness’. This viewpoint is often described as voyeuristic, but what
Hopper’s urban scenes also replicate is one of the central experiences of
being lonely: the way a feeling of separation, of being walled off or penned
in, combines with a sense of near-unbearable exposure.
This tension is present in even the most benign of his New York paintings,
the ones that testify to a more pleasurable, more equanimous kind of solitude.
Morning in a City, say, in which a naked woman stands at a window, holding
just a towel, relaxed and at ease with herself, her body composed of lovely
flecks of lavender and rose and pale green. The mood is peaceful, and yet the
faintest tremor of unease is discernible at the far left of the painting, where
the open casement gives way to the buildings beyond, lit by the flannel-pink
of a morning sky. In the tenement opposite there are three more windows,
their green blinds half-drawn, their interiors rough squares of total black. If
windows are to be thought analogous to eyes, as both etymology, wind-eye,
and function suggests, then there exists around this blockage, this plug of
paint, an uncertainty about being seen – looked over, maybe; but maybe also
overlooked, as in ignored, unseen, unregarded, undesired.
In the sinister Night Windows, these worries bloom into acute disquiet.
The painting centres on the upper portion of a building, with three apertures,
three slits, giving into a lighted chamber. At the first window a curtain
billows outward, and in the second a woman in a pinkish slip bends over a
green carpet, her haunches taut. In the third, a lamp is glowing through a layer
of fabric, though what it actually looks like is a wall of flames.
There’s something odd, too, about the vantage point. It’s clearly from
above – we see the floor, not the ceiling – but the windows are on at least the
second storey, making it seem as if whoever’s doing the looking is hanging
suspended in the air. The more likely answer is that they’re stealing a
glimpse from the window of the ‘El’, the elevator train, which Hopper liked
to ride at night, armed with his pads, his fabricated chalk, gazing avidly
through the glass for instances of brightness, moments that fix, unfinished, in
the mind’s eye. Either way, the viewer – me, I mean, or you – has been coopted into an estranging act. Privacy has been breached, but it doesn’t make
the woman any less alone, exposed in her burning chamber.
This is the thing about cities, the way that even indoors you’re always at
the mercy of a stranger’s gaze. Wherever I went – pacing back and forth
between the bed and couch; roaming into the kitchen to regard the abandoned
boxes of ice cream in the freezer – I could be seen by the people who lived
in the Arlington, the vast Queen Anne co-op that dominated the view, its ten
brick storeys lagged in scaffolding. At the same time, I could also play the
watcher, Rear Window-style, peering in on dozens of people with whom I’d
never exchange a word, all of them engrossed in the small intimacies of the
day. Loading a dishwasher naked; tapping in on heels to cook the children’s
supper.
Under normal circumstances, I don’t suppose any of this would have
provoked more than idle curiosity, but that autumn wasn’t normal. Almost as
soon as I arrived, I was aware of a gathering anxiety around the question of
visibility. I wanted to be seen, taken in and accepted, the way one is by a
lover’s approving gaze. At the same time I felt dangerously exposed, wary of
judgement, particularly in situations where being alone felt awkward or
wrong, where I was surrounded by couples or groups. While these feelings
were undoubtedly heightened by the fact that I was living in New York for the
first time – that city of glass, of roving eyes – they arose out of loneliness,
which agitates always in two directions, towards intimacy and away from
threat.
That autumn, I kept coming back to Hopper’s images, drawn to them as if
they were blueprints and I was a prisoner; as if they contained some vital
clue about my state. Though I went with my eyes over dozens of rooms, I
always returned to the same place: to the New York diner of Nighthawks, a
painting that Joyce Carol Oates once described as ‘our most poignant,
ceaselessly replicated romantic image of American loneliness’.
I don’t suppose there are many people in the western world who haven’t
peered into the cool green icebox of that painting, who haven’t seen a grimy
reproduction hanging in a doctor’s waiting room or office hallway. It’s been
disseminated with such profligacy that it has long since acquired the patina
that afflicts all too-familiar objects, like dirt over a lens, and yet it retains its
eerie power, its potency.
I’d been looking at it on laptop screens for years before I finally saw it in
person, at the Whitney one sweltering October afternoon. It was hanging at
the very back of the gallery, hidden behind a shoal of people. The colours
are amazing, a girl said, and then I was drawn to the front of the crowd. Up
close, the painting rearranged itself, decomposing into snags and anomalies
I’d never seen before. The bright triangle of the diner’s ceiling was cracking.
A long drip of yellow ran between the coffee urns. The paint was applied
very thinly, not quite covering the linen ground, so that the surface was
breached by a profusion of barely visible white pinpricks and tiny white
threads.
I took a step back. Green shadows were falling in spikes and diamonds on
the sidewalk. There is no colour in existence that so powerfully
communicates urban alienation, the atomisation of human beings inside the
edifices they create, as this noxious pallid green, which only came into being
with the advent of electricity, and which is inextricably associated with the
nocturnal city, the city of glass towers, of empty illuminated offices and neon
signs.
A tour guide came in then, her dark hair piled on her head, a group of
visitors trailing in her wake. She pointed to the painting, saying do you see,
there isn’t a door? and they crowded round, making small noises of
exclamation. She was right. The diner was a place of refuge, absolutely, but
there was no visible entrance, no way to get in or out. There was a
cartoonish, ochre-coloured door at the back of the painting, leading perhaps
into a grimy kitchen. But from the street, the room was sealed: an urban
aquarium, a glass cell.
Inside, in their livid yellow prison, were the four famous figures. A spivvy
couple, a counter-boy in a white uniform, his blond hair raked into a cap, and
a man sitting with his back to the window, the open crescent of his jacket
pocket the darkest point on the canvas. No one was talking. No one was
looking at anyone else. Was the diner a refuge for the isolated, a place of
succour, or did it serve to illustrate the disconnection that proliferates in
cities? The painting’s brilliance derived from its instability, its refusal to
commit.
Look, for instance, at the counter-boy, his face maybe affable, maybe cold.
He stands at the centre of a series of triangles, presiding over the nocturnal
sacrament of coffee. But isn’t he also trapped? One of the vertices is cut off
by the edge of the canvas, but surely it’s narrowing too sharply, leaving no
room for the expected hatch or gangway. This is the kind of subtle geometric
disturbance that Hopper was so skilled at, and which he used to kindle
emotion in the viewer, to produce feelings of entrapment and wariness, of
profound unease.
What else? I leant against the wall, sweaty in my sandals, itemising the
diner’s contents. Three white coffee cups, two empty glasses rimmed in blue,
two napkin dispensers, three salt shakers, one pepper shaker, maybe sugar,
maybe ketchup. Yellow light flaring on the ceiling. Livid green tiles
(brilliant streak of jade green, Hopper’s wife Jo had written in the notebook
she used to log his paintings), triangular shadows dropping lightly
everywhere, the colour of a dollar bill. A hoarding above the diner for
Phillies American cigars, Only 5cs, illustrated with a crude brown doodle. A
green till in the window of the store across the street, not that there was any
stock on show. Green on green, glass on glass, a mood that expanded the
longer I lingered, breeding disquiet.
The window was the weirdest thing: a bubble of glass that separated the
diner from the street, curving sinuously back against itself. This window is
unique in Hopper’s work. Though he painted hundreds, maybe thousands, in
his life, the rest are simply openings, apertures for the eye to gaze through.
Some catch reflections, but this was the only time he ever painted glass itself,
in all its ambiguous physicality. Simultaneously solid and transparent,
material and ephemeral, it brings together what he elsewhere did in parts,
fusing in one devastating symbol the twin mechanisms of confinement and
exposure. It was impossible to gaze through into the diner’s luminous interior
without experiencing a swift apprehension of loneliness, of how it might feel
to be shut out, standing alone in the cooling air.
*
The dictionary, that chilly arbiter, defines the word lonely as a negative
feeling invoked by isolation, the emotional component being what
differentiates it from lone, alone or solo. Dejected because of want of
company or society; sad at the thought that one is alone; having a feeling
of solitariness. But loneliness doesn’t necessarily correlate with an external
or objective lack of company; what psychologists term social isolation or
social privation. By no means all people who live their lives in the absence
of company are lonely, while it is possible to experience acute loneliness
while in a relationship or among a group of friends. As Epictetus wrote
almost two thousand years ago: ‘For because a man is alone, he is not for that
reason also solitary; just as though a man is among numbers, he is not
therefore not solitary.’
The sensation arises because of a felt absence or insufficiency of
closeness, and its feeling tone ranges from discomfort to chronic, unbearable
pain. In 1953, the psychiatrist and psychoanalyst Harry Stack Sullivan came
up with what still stands as a working definition: ‘the exceedingly unpleasant
and driving experience connected with inadequate discharge of the need for
human intimacy’.
Sullivan only approached loneliness in passing in his work, and as such
the real pioneer of loneliness studies is the German psychiatrist Frieda
Fromm-Reichmann. Fromm-Reichmann spent most of her working life in
America and is memorialised in popular culture as the therapist Dr Fried in
Joanne Greenberg’s semi-autobiographical novel about her teenage struggles
with schizophrenia, I Never Promised You a Rose Garden. When she died in
Maryland in 1957, she left on her desk an unfinished pile of notes, which was
subsequently edited and published as ‘On Loneliness’. This essay represents
one of the first attempts by a psychiatrist or psychoanalyst to approach
loneliness as an experience in its own right, distinct from and perhaps
fundamentally more damaging than depression, anxiety or loss.
Fromm-Reichmann viewed loneliness as an essentially resistant subject,
hard to describe, hard to pin down, hard even to broach as a topic, noting
dryly:
The writer who wishes to elaborate on loneliness is faced with a serious
terminological handicap: Loneliness seems to be such a painful, frightening
experience that people do practically everything to avoid it. This avoidance
seems to include a strange reluctance on the part of psychiatrists to seek
scientific clarification on the subject.
She picks through what little material she can find, gathering up scraps from
Sigmund Freud and Anna Freud and Rollo May. Many of these, she thinks,
muddle together different types of loneliness, conflating that which is
temporary or circumstantial – the loneliness of bereavement, say, or the
loneliness that stems from insufficient tenderness in childhood – with the
deeper and more intractable forms of emotional isolation.
Of these latter, desolating states, she comments: ‘Loneliness, in its
quintessential form, is of a nature that is incommunicable by the one who
suffers it. Nor, unlike other non-communicable emotional experiences, can it
be shared via empathy. It may well be that the second person’s empathic
abilities are obstructed by the anxiety-arousing quality of the mere
emanations of the first person’s loneliness.’
When I read those lines, I remembered sitting, years back, outside a train
station in the south of England, waiting for my father. It was a sunny day, and
I had a book I was enjoying. After a while, an elderly man sat down next to
me and tried repeatedly to strike up conversation. I didn’t want to talk and
after a brief exchange of pleasantries I began to respond more tersely until
eventually, still smiling, he got up and wandered away. I’ve never stopped
feeling ashamed about my unkindness, and nor have I ever forgotten how it
felt to have the force field of his loneliness pressed up against me: an
overwhelming, unmeetable need for attention and affection, to be heard and
touched and seen.
If it’s difficult to respond to people in this state, it is harder still to reach
out from it. Loneliness feels like such a shameful experience, so counter to
the lives we are supposed to lead, that it becomes increasingly inadmissible,
a taboo state whose confession seems destined to cause others to turn and
flee. In her essay, Fromm-Reichmann returns repeatedly to this issue of
incommunicability, noting how reluctantly even the loneliest of patients
approach the subject. One of her case studies concerns a schizophrenic
woman who asked to see her psychiatrist specifically in order to discuss her
experience of deep and hopeless loneliness. After several futile attempts, she
finally burst out: ‘I don’t know why people think of hell as a place where
there is heat and where warm fires are burning. That is not hell. Hell is if you
are frozen in isolation into a block of ice. That is where I have been.’
I first read this essay sitting on my bed, the blinds half-drawn. On my
printout, I’d drawn a wavering Biro line under the words a block of ice. I
was often feeling then like I was encased in ice, or walled up in glass, that I
could see out all too clearly but lacked the ability to free myself or to make
the kind of contact I desired. Show tunes from upstairs again, cruising
Facebook, the white walls tight around me. Hardly any wonder I’d been so
fixated on Nighthawks, that bubble of greenish glass, the colour of an
iceberg.
After Fromm-Reichmann’s death, other psychologists slowly began to turn
their attention to the subject. In 1975, the social scientist Robert Weiss edited
a seminal study, Loneliness: The Experience of Emotional and Social
Isolation. He too opened by acknowledging the subject’s neglect, noting
wryly that loneliness is more often commented on by songwriters than social
scientists. He felt that in addition to being unnerving in its own right – he
writes of it as something that ‘possessed’ people, that is ‘peculiarly
insistent’; ‘an almost eerie affliction of the spirits’ – loneliness inhibits
empathy because it induces in its wake a kind of self-protective amnesia, so
that when a person is no longer lonely they struggle to remember what the
condition is like.
If they had earlier been lonely, they now have no access to the self that
experienced the loneliness; furthermore, they very likely prefer that things
remain that way. In consequence they are likely to respond to those who are
currently lonely with absence of understanding and perhaps irritation.
Even psychiatrists and psychologists,Weiss thought, were not immune to this
near-phobic dislike; they too were liable to be made uneasy ‘by the
loneliness that is potential in the everyday life of everyone’. As a result, a
kind of victim blaming takes place: a tendency to see the rejection of lonely
people as justified, or to assume they have brought the condition on
themselves by being too timid or unattractive, too self-pitying or selfabsorbed. ‘Why can’t the lonely change?’ he imagines both professional and
lay observers musing. ‘They must find a perverse gratification in loneliness;
perhaps loneliness, despite its pain, permits them to continue a selfprotective isolation or provides them with an emotional handicap that forces
handouts of pity from those with whom they interact.’
In fact, as Weiss goes on to show, loneliness is hallmarked by an intense
desire to bring the experience to a close; something which cannot be
achieved by sheer willpower or by simply getting out more, but only by
developing intimate connections. This is far easier said than done, especially
for people whose loneliness arises from a state of loss or exile or prejudice,
who have reason to fear or mistrust as well as long for the society of others.
Weiss and Fromm-Reichmann knew that loneliness is painful and
alienating, but what they didn’t understand was how it generates its effects.
Contemporary research has focused particularly on this area, and in
attempting to understand what loneliness does to the human body it has also
succeeded in illuminating why it is so appallingly difficult to dislodge.
According to work being carried out over the past decade by John Cacioppo
and his team at the University of Chicago, loneliness profoundly affects an
individual’s ability to understand and interpret social interactions, initiating a
devastating chain-reaction, the consequence of which is to further estrange
them from their fellows.
When people enter into an experience of loneliness, they trigger what
psychologists call hypervigilance for social threat, a phenomenon Weiss first
postulated back in the 1970s. In this state, which is entered into unknowingly,
the individual tends to experience the world in increasingly negative terms,
and to both expect and remember instances of rudeness, rejection and
abrasion, giving them greater weight and prominence than other, more benign
or friendly interactions. This creates, of course, a vicious circle, in which the
lonely person grows increasingly more isolated, suspicious and withdrawn.
And because the hypervigilance hasn’t been consciously perceived, it’s by no
means easy to recognise, let alone correct, the bias.
What this means is that the lonelier a person gets, the less adept they
become at navigating social currents. Loneliness grows around them, like
mould or fur, a prophylactic that inhibits contact, no matter how badly contact
is desired. Loneliness is accretive, extending and perpetuating itself. Once it
becomes impacted, it is by no means easy to dislodge. This is why I was
suddenly so hyper-alert to criticism, and why I felt so perpetually exposed,
hunching in on myself even as I walked anonymously through the streets, my
flip-flops slapping on the ground.
At the same time, the body’s state of red alert brings about a series of
physiological changes, driven by gathering tides of adrenaline and cortisol.
These are the fight or flight hormones, which act to help an organism respond
to external stressors. But when the stress is chronic, not acute; when it
persists for years and is caused by something that cannot be outrun, then these
biochemical alterations wreak havoc on the body. Lonely people are restless
sleepers, and experience a reduction in the restorative function of sleep.
Loneliness drives up blood pressure, accelerates ageing, weakens the
immune system and acts as a precursor to cognitive decline. According to a
2010 study, loneliness predicts increased morbidity and mortality, which is
an elegant way of saying that loneliness can prove fatal.
At first it was thought that this increased morbidity occurred because of
the practical consequences of being isolated: the lack of care, the potentially
diminished ability to feed and nurture oneself. In fact, it seems almost certain
now that it is the subjective experience of loneliness that produces the
physical consequences, not the simple fact of being alone. It is the feeling
itself that is stressful; the feeling that sets the whole grim cascade into
motion.
*
Hopper could not possibly have known about any of this, except of course
from the inside out, and yet in painting after painting he shows not just what
loneliness looks like but also how it feels, communicating with his blank
walls and open windows a simulacrum of its paranoid architecture, the way
it functions to simultaneously entrap and expose.
It’s naive to assume that an artist is personally acquainted with their
subject matter, that they are not simply a witness to their age, to the
prevailing moods and preoccupations of the times. All the same, the more I
looked at Nighthawks, the more I wondered about Hopper himself, who had
after all once said: ‘The man’s the work. Something doesn’t come out of
nothing.’ The vantage point the painting makes you enter into is so particular,
so estranging. Where did it come from? What was Hopper’s own experience
of cities, of intimacy, of longing? Was he lonely? Who do you have to be to
see the world like that?
Though he disliked interviews, and as such left only a minimal record of
his life in words, Hopper was often photographed, and so it’s possible to
track him through the years, from gawky youth in a straw boater in the 1920s
to great man of the arts in the 1950s. What comes across in these mostly
black and white images is a quality of intense self-containment, of someone
set deep inside himself, leery of contact, emphatically reserved. He stands or
sits always a little awkwardly, slightly hunched, as tall men often are, his
long limbs uncomfortably arranged, dressed in dark suits and ties or threepiece tweeds, his long face sometimes sullen, sometimes guarded and
sometimes showing a small glint of amusement, the deprecating wit that came
and went in disarming flashes. A private man, one might conclude, not on
easy terms with the world.
All photographs are silent, but some are more silent than others, and these
portraits attest to what was by all accounts Hopper’s most striking feature,
his gigantic resistance to speech. It’s a different thing from quietness, silence;
more powerful, more aggressive. In his interviews, it functions as a barrier,
preventing the interviewer from opening him up or putting words into his
mouth. When he does speak, it’s often simply to deflect the question. ‘I don’t
remember,’ he says frequently, or ‘I don’t know why I did that.’ He regularly
uses the word unconscious, as a way of evading or disclaiming whatever
meaning the interviewer believes to be seeping from his pictures.
Just before his death in 1967, he gave an unusually long interview to the
Brooklyn Museum. He was eighty-four at the time: the foremost realist
painter at work in America. As always, his wife was present in the room. Jo
was a consummate interrupter, filling in the spaces, jumping in all the gaps.
The conversation (which was recorded and transcribed, though never
published in full) is illuminating not only in terms of content, but also for
what it reveals of the Hoppers’ complex dynamic, their intimately
adversarial marriage.
The interviewer asks Edward how he comes to choose his subjects. As
usual, he seems to find the question painful. He says that the process is
complicated, very difficult to explain, but that he has to be very much
interested in his subject, and that as such he can only produce perhaps one or
two paintings a year. At this, his wife interrupts. ‘I’m being very biographic,’
she says, ‘but when he was twelve years old, he grew, he was six feet tall.’
‘Not at twelve. Not at twelve,’ Hopper says. ‘But that’s what your mother
said. And you said. Now you’re changing it. Oh, you contradict me . . . You
know, you’d think we were bitter enemies.’ The interviewer makes some
small sound of disavowal and Jo ploughs on, describing her husband as a
schoolboy, slim as a blade of grass, no strength in him at all, not wanting to
make trouble with the mean kids, the bullies.
But that made him rather, it would make one shy . . . he had to lead the line at
school, you know, the tallest, and oh, he hated that, these bad boys in back of
him, and they’d try to push him off in the wrong direction.
‘Shy is hereditary,’ Hopper says, and she replies: ‘Well, I think it’s
circumstantial too, you know . . . He never has been much on the declaring
himself – ’. At that he interrupts, saying: ‘I declare myself in my paintings.’
And again, a little later: ‘I don’t think I ever tried to paint the American
scene. I’m trying to paint myself’.
He’d always had a knack for drawing, right from his boyhood in New
Jersey at the tail end of the nineteenth century, the only son of cultured and
not particularly well-suited parents. A lovely naturalness of line, and at the
same time a certain sourness that came out especially in the ugly caricatures
he drew right through his life. In these often strikingly unpleasant drawings,
which were never exhibited but which can be seen in Gail Levin’s biography,
Hopper presents himself as a skeletal figure, all long bones and a grimace,
often under the thumb of women or hankering silently for something they
refuse to supply.
At eighteen, he went to art school in New York, where he was taught by
Robert Henri, one of the foremost proponents of the gritty urban realism
known as the Ashcan School. Hopper was an outstanding and much-praised
student, and so understandably lingered at college for years, unwilling to cast
himself fully into independent adulthood. In 1906 his parents financed a trip
to Paris, where he shut himself away, not meeting any of the artists in the city
at the time, a lack of interest in prevailing currents or fashions that he
maintained lifelong. ‘I’d heard of Gertrude Stein,’ he remembered later, ‘but
I don’t recall having heard of Picasso at all.’ Instead, he spent his days
wandering the streets, painting by the river or sketching prostitutes and
passers-by, setting down a taxonomy of hairdos and women’s legs and nifty
feathered hats.
It was in Paris that he learned to open up his paintings, to let light in,
following the example of the Impressionists, after the gloomy browns and
blacks favoured in his New York training. Learned too to meddle with
perspective, to make small impossibilities in his scenes: a bridge reaching
where it couldn’t, the sun falling from two directions at once. People
stretched, buildings shrunk, infinitesimal disturbances in the fabric of reality.
This is how you unsettle the viewer, by making a not-rightness, by rendering
it in little jabs of white and grey and dirty yellow.
For a few years he went back and forth to Europe, but in 1910 he settled
permanently in Manhattan. ‘It seemed awfully crude and raw here when I got
back,’ he remembered decades later. ‘It took me ten years to get over
Europe.’ He was jarred by New York, its frenetic pace, the relentless pursuit
of the long green. In fact, money quickly became a major problem. For a long
time, no one was interested in his paintings at all, and he scraped by as an
illustrator, hating the clichéd commissions, the dismal necessity of lugging a
portfolio all over town, an unwilling salesman for work he didn’t think at all
worthwhile.
They weren’t exactly rich in relationships either, those first American
years. No girlfriend, though there might have been brief liaisons here and
there. No intimate friendships, and only occasional contact with his family.
Colleagues and acquaintances, yes, but a life notably short on love, though
long on independence, long too on that discarded virtue, privacy.
This sense of separation, of being alone in a big city, soon began to surface
in his art. By the early 1920s, he was making a name for himself as an
authentically American artist, stubbornly sticking with realism despite the
fashionable tide of abstraction filtering in from Europe. He was determined
to articulate the day-to-day experience of inhabiting the modern, electric city
of New York. Working first with etchings and then in paint, Hopper began to
produce a distinctive body of images that captured the cramped, anxious,
sometimes alluring experience of urban living.
His scenes – of women glimpsed through windows, of disordered
bedrooms and tense interiors – were improvised from things he saw or half
saw on long walks around Manhattan. ‘They are not factual,’ he said much
later. ‘Perhaps there were a very few of them that were. You can’t go out and
look up at an apartment and stand in the street and paint but many things have
been suggested by the city.’ And elsewhere: ‘The interior itself was my main
interest . . . simply a piece of New York, the city that interests me so much.’
None of these drawings show crowds, of course, though the crowd is
surely the signature sight of the city. Instead they focus on the experience of
isolation: of people alone or in awkward, uncommunicative couples. It’s the
same limited and voyeuristic view that Alfred Hitchcock would later subject
James Stewart to in the Hopperesque Rear Window, a film that is likewise
about the dangerous visual intimacy of urban living, of being able to survey
strangers inside what were once private chambers.
Among the many people Stewart’s character L. B. Jeffries watches over
from his Greenwich Village apartment are two female figures who might
have walked straight out of a Hopper painting. Miss Torso is a sexy blonde,
though her popularity is more superficial than it initially appears, while Miss
Lonelyhearts is an unhappy, not quite attractive spinster, consistently
displayed in situations that attest to her inability to find either companionship
or contentment in solitude. She’s seen preparing dinner for an imaginary
lover, weeping and consoling herself with alcohol, picking up a stranger, then
fighting him off when his advances go too far.
In one excruciating scene, Jeffries watches through a zoom lens as she
makes herself up in a mirror, dressed in an emerald green suit, before putting
on large black glasses to assess the effect. The act is intensely private, not
intended for spectators. Instead of displaying the polished exterior she’s so
painstakingly produced, what she inadvertently reveals instead is her longing
and vulnerability, her desire to be desirable, her fear that she’s running short
on what remains for women a chief currency of exchange. Hopper’s paintings
are full of women like her; women who appear to be in the grips of a
loneliness that has to do with gender and unattainable standards of
appearance, and that gets increasingly toxic and strangulating with age.
But if Jeffries is performing Hopper’s characteristic gaze – cool, curious,
detached – then Hitchcock is also at pains to show how voyeurism works to
isolate the viewer as well as the viewed. In Rear Window voyeurism is
explicitly presented as an escape from intimacy, a way of side-stepping real
emotional demands. Jeffries prefers watching to participating; his obsessive
scrutiny is a way of remaining emotionally aloof from both his girlfriend and
the neighbours on whom he spies. It’s only gradually that he is drawn into
investment and commitment, becoming literally as well as figuratively
engaged.
A rangy man who likes to spy on others, and who must learn to
accommodate a flesh and blood woman in his life: Rear Window mimics or
mirrors more than just the contents of Hopper’s art. It also reflects the
contours of his emotional life, the conflict between detachment and need that
was lived out in actuality as well as expressed in coloured streaks of paint
on canvas, in scenes repeated over many years.
In 1923, he re-encountered a woman with whom he’d studied at art school.
Josephine Niveson, known as Jo, was tiny and tempestuous: a talkative, hottempered, sociable woman who’d been living alone in the West Village after
the death of her parents, doggedly making her way as an artist, though she
was crushingly short on funds. They bonded over a shared love of French
culture and that summer began haltingly to date. The next year, they married.
She was forty-one and still a virgin, and he was almost forty-two. Both must
have considered the possibility that they would remain alone for good,
having gone so far beyond the then conventional age for marriage.
The Hoppers were only parted when Edward died in the spring of 1967.
But though they were as a couple deeply enmeshed, their personalities, even
their physical forms, were so diametrically opposed that they sometimes
seemed like caricatures of the gulf between men and women. As soon as Jo
gave up her studio and moved into Edward’s marginally more salubrious
room on Washington Square, her own career, previously much fought for,
much defended, dwindled away to almost nothing: a few soft, impressionistic
paintings here and there; an occasional group show.
In part this was because Jo poured her considerable energies into tending
and nurturing her husband’s work: dealing with his correspondence, handling
loan requests and needling him into painting. At her insistence, she also
posed for all the women in his canvases. From 1923 on, every office worker
and city girl was modelled for by Jo, sometimes dressed up and sometimes
stripped down, sometimes recognisable and sometimes entirely rebuilt. The
tall blonde usherette in 1939’s New York Movie, leaning pensively against a
wall: that was based on her, as was the leggy red-haired burlesque dancer in
1941’s Girlie Show, for which Jo modelled ‘without a stitch on in front of the
stove – nothing but high heels in a lottery dance pose’.
A model, yes; a rival, no. The other reason Jo’s career foundered is that
her husband was profoundly opposed to its existence. Edward didn’t just fail
to support Jo’s painting, but rather worked actively to discourage it, mocking
and denigrating the few things she did manage to produce, and acting with
great creativity and malice to limit the conditions in which she might paint.
One of the most shocking elements of Gail Levin’s fascinating and
enormously detailed Edward Hopper:An Intimate Biography, which draws
closely on Jo’s unpublished diaries, is the violence into which the Hoppers’
relationship often degenerated. They had frequent rows, particularly over his
attitude to her painting and her desire to drive their car, both potent symbols
of autonomy and power. Some of these fights were physical: cuffings,
slappings and scratchings, undignified struggles on the bedroom floor that left
bruises as well as wounded feelings.
As Levin observes, it is almost impossible to form a judgement of Jo
Hopper’s work, since so little of it has survived. Edward left everything to
his wife, asking that she bequeath his art to the Whitney, the institution with
which he’d had the closest ties. After his death, she donated both his and the
majority of her own artistic estates to the museum, even though she’d felt
from the moment of her marriage that she’d been the victim of a boycott by
the curators there. Her disquiet was not unwarranted. After her death, the
Whitney discarded all her paintings, perhaps because of their calibre and
perhaps because of the systematic undervaluing of women’s art against which
she’d railed so bitterly in her own life.
The silence of Hopper’s paintings becomes more toxic after the revelation
of how violently he worked to suppress and check his wife. It isn’t easy to
square the revelation of pettiness and savagery with the image of the suited
man in polished shoes, his stately reticence, his immense reserve. Perhaps
his own silence was part of it, though: some inability to communicate in
ordinary language, some deep resentment around intimacy and need. ‘Any
talk with me sends his eyes to the clock,’ Jo wrote in her diary in 1946. ‘It’s
like taking the attention of an expensive specialist’ – behaviour that
compounded her feeling of being ‘a rather lonely creature’, cut off and
excluded from the artistic world.
Just before the Hoppers got together, a fellow artist jotted down a penportrait of Edward. He started with the visual elements: the prominent
masticating muscles, the strong teeth and big, unsensuous mouth, before
moving on to the cool static way he painted: blocking things out, retaining
control. He noted Hopper’s sincerity, his vast inhibitions and his wit,
writing: ‘Should be married. But can’t imagine to what kind of a woman. The
hunger of that man.’ A few lines on he repeated the phrase: ‘But the hunger of
him, the hunger of him!’
Hunger is also what’s communicated in Hopper’s cartoons, in which he
abases himself before his primly elevated wife, a starving man, crouching on
the floor while she eats at the table or kneeling in pious self-abnegation at the
foot of her bed. And it flickers on and off in his paintings too, in the vast
space he makes between men and women who share the same small rooms.
Room in New York, say, which ripples with unexpressed frustration, unmet
desire, violent restraint. Perhaps this is why his images are so resistant to
entry, and so radiant with feeling. If the statement I declare myself in my
paintings is to be taken at face value, then what is being declared is barriers
and boundaries, wanted things at a distance and unwanted things too close:
an erotics of insufficient intimacy, which is of course a synonym for
loneliness itself.
*
For a long time, the paintings came steadily enough, but by the mid-1930s the
periods between them had started to lengthen. Until very late in life, Hopper
always needed something real to spark his imagination, wandering the city
until he saw a scene or space that gripped him, and then letting it settle in his
memory; painting, or so he hoped, both the feeling and the thing, ‘the most
exact transcription possible of my most intimate impressions of nature’. Now
he began to complain about a lack of subjects that excited him enough to
bother beginning the labour, the tricky business of trying ‘to force this
unwilling medium of paint and canvas’ into a record of emotion, a process he
characterised in a famous essay titled ‘Notes on Painting’ as a struggle
against inevitable decay.
I find in working always the disturbing intrusion of elements not a part of my
most interested vision, and the inevitable obliteration and replacement of this
vision by the work itself as it proceeds. The struggle to prevent this decay is,
I think, the common lot of all painters to whom the invention of arbitrary
forms has lesser interest.
While this process meant painting could never be entirely pleasurable, the
periods of blockage were far worse. Black moods, long disappointing walks,
frequent trips to the cinema, a retreat into wordlessness, plunging downward
into a shaft of silence, which led almost inevitably to fights with Jo, who
needed to speak as badly as her husband required quiet.
All of these things were at work in the winter of 1941, the period from out
of which Nighthawks emerged. Hopper had achieved considerable acclaim
by then, including the rare honour of a retrospective at the Museum of
Modern Art. Ever the New England puritan, he hadn’t let the increase in
prestige go to his head. While he and Jo had moved from the cramped back
studio at Washington Square to two rooms at the front, they still didn’t have
central heating or a private bathroom; still had to haul coal up seventy-four
steps for the woodburner that kept the place from freezing.
On 7 November they returned from a summer in Truro, where they had
recently built a beach house. A canvas was put on the easel, but for weeks it
stayed untouched, a painful blankness in the small flat. Hopper went out on
his usual outings, trolling for scenes. At last, something came into focus. He
started making drawings in coffee shops and on street corners, sketching
patrons that caught his eye. He drew a coffee pot and jotted colours next to it:
amber and dark brown. On 7 December, either just before or just after this
process started, Pearl Harbor was attacked. The next morning, America
entered the Second World War.
In a letter Jo wrote to Edward’s sister on 17 December, worries about
bombing are interspersed with complaints about her husband, who is finally
at work on a new painting. He’s banned her from entering the studio, meaning
she’s effectively imprisoned in half their tiny domain. Hitler has said he
intends to destroy New York. They live, she reminds Marion, right under
glass skylights, a leaking roof. They don’t have blackout shades. Ed, she
writes crossly, can’t be bothered. A few lines down: ‘I haven’t gone thru
even for things I want in the kitchen.’ She packs a knapsack with a
chequebook, towels, soap, clothes and keys, ‘in case we ran to race out
doors in our nighties’. Her husband, she adds, jeers when he sees what she
has done. There’s nothing new about his slighting tone, nor her habit of
passing it on.
In the studio next door, Edward gets a mirror and draws himself, slouching
at the counter, establishing the pose for both his male customers. Over the
next few weeks he furnishes the café with coffee pots and cherry countertops,
the dim reflections in their shined and lacquered surfaces. The painting has
started to quicken. He’s busy with it, Jo tells Marion a month later, interested
all the time. Eventually he allows her into the studio to pose. This time he
elongates her, reddening her lips and hair. The light strikes her face, bowed
to consider the object in her right hand. He finally finishes on 21 January
1942. Collaborating, as they often do, on titles, the Hoppers call it
Nighthawks, after the beaked profile of the woman’s saturnine companion.
There’s so much going on in this story, so many potential readings, some
personal and some far larger in scope and scale. The glass, the leaking light,
look different after reading Jo’s letter, her agitation over bombs and
blackouts. You could read the painting now as a parable about American
isolationism, finding in the diner’s fragile refuge a submerged anxiety about
the nation’s abrupt lurch into conflict, the imperilling of a way of life.
Then there’s a more intimate interpretation to be made, about the ongoing
struggle with Jo, the need to keep her punishingly distant and then to bring her
close, to change her face and body into the sexual, self-contained woman at
the counter, lost in thought. Is this Hopper’s way of silencing his wife,
locking her into the speechless medium of paint, or is it an erotic act, a mode
of fertile collaboration? The practice of using her as a model for so many
different women invites such questioning, but to settle on a single answer is
to miss the point of how emphatically Hopper resists closure, creating with
his ambiguous scenes a testament instead to human isolation, to the essential
unknowability of others – something, one must remember, that he achieved in
part by ruthlessly refusing his wife the right to her own acts of artistic
expression.
In the late 1950s, the curator and art historian Katherine Kuh interviewed
Hopper for a book called The Artist’s Voice. In the course of their
conversation, she asked him which of his paintings he liked the best. He
named three, one of which was Nighthawks, which he said ‘seems to be the
way I think of a night street’. ‘Lonely and empty?’ she asks, and he replies: ‘I
didn’t see it as particularly lonely. I simplified the scene a great deal and
made the restaurant bigger. Unconsciously, probably, I was painting the
loneliness of a large city.’ The conversation meanders on to other things, but
a few minutes later she returns to the subject, saying: ‘Whenever one reads
about your work, it is always said that loneliness and nostalgia are your
themes.’ ‘If they are,’ Hopper replies cautiously, ‘it isn’t at all conscious.’
And then, reversing again: ‘I probably am a lonely one.’
It’s an unusual formulation, a lonely one; not at all the same thing as
admitting one is lonely. Instead, it suggests with that a, that unassuming
indefinite article, a fact that loneliness by its nature resists. Though it feels
entirely isolating, a private burden no one else could possibly experience or
share, it is in reality a communal state, inhabited by many people. In fact,
current studies suggest that more than a quarter of American adults suffers
from loneliness, independent of race, education and ethnicity, while 45 per
cent of British adults report feeling lonely either often or sometimes.
Marriage and high income serve as mild deterrents, but the truth is that few of
us are absolutely immune to feeling a greater longing for connection than we
find ourselves able to satisfy. The lonely ones, a hundred million strong.
Hardly any wonder Hopper’s paintings remain so popular, and so endlessly
reproduced.
Reading his halting confession, one begins to see why his work is not just
compelling but also consoling, especially when viewed en masse. It’s true
that he painted, not once but many times, the loneliness of a large city, where
the possibilities of connection are repeatedly defeated by the dehumanising
apparatus of urban life. But didn’t he also paint loneliness as a large city,
revealing it as a shared, democratic place, inhabited, whether willingly or
not, by many souls? What’s more, the technical strategies he uses – the
strange perspective, the sites of blockage and exposure – further combat the
insularity of loneliness by forcing the viewer to enter imaginatively into an
experience that is otherwise notable for its profound impenetrability, its
multiple barriers, its walls like windows, its windows like walls.
How had Frieda Fromm-Reichmann put it? ‘It may well be that the second
person’s empathic abilities are obstructed by the anxiety-arousing quality of
the mere emanations of the first person’s loneliness.’ This is what’s so
terrifying about being lonely: the instinctive sense that it is literally
repulsive, inhibiting contact at just the moment contact is most required. And
yet what Hopper captures is beautiful as well as frightening. They aren’t
sentimental, his pictures, but there is an extraordinary attentiveness to them.
As if what he saw was as interesting as he kept insisting he needed it to be:
worth the labour, the miserable effort of setting it down. As if loneliness was
something worth looking at. More than that, as if looking itself was an
antidote, a way to defeat loneliness’s strange, estranging spell.

3
MY HEART OPENS TO YOUR VOICE
I DIDN’T STAY IN BROOKLYN long. The friend whose apartment I was staying in
came back from L.A. and I moved to the green walk-up in the East Village.
The change in habitat marked another phase of loneliness; a period in which
speech became an increasingly perilous endeavour.
If you are not being touched at all, then speech is the closest contact it is
possible to have with another human being. Almost all city-dwellers are
daily participants in a complex part-song of voices, sometimes performing
the aria but more often the chorus, the call and response, the passing back and
forth of verbal small change with near and total strangers. The irony is that
when you are engaged in larger and more satisfactory intimacies, these
quotidian exchanges go off smoothly, almost unnoticed, unperceived. It is
only when there is a paucity of deeper and more personal connection that
they develop a disproportionate importance, and with it a disproportionate
risk.
Since coming to America, I was forever botching the ballgame of
language: fumbling my catches, bungling my throws. Each morning I’d walk
up through Tompkins Square Park to get my coffee, past the Temperance
fountain and the dog run. On East 9th Street there was a café that looked out
over a community garden planted with an enormous weeping willow. It was
populated almost exclusively by people gazing into the glowing clamshells of
their laptops and so it seemed a safe place, in which my solitary status was
unlikely to be exposed. Each day, though, the same thing happened. I ordered
the nearest thing to filter on the menu: a medium urn brew, which was written
in large chalk letters on the board. Each time, without fail, the barista looked
mystified and asked me to repeat myself. I might have found it funny in
England, or irritating, or I might not have noticed it at all, but that autumn it
worked under my skin, depositing little grains of anxiety and shame.
It was such a stupid thing to get upset about: a minor artefact of
foreignness, of speaking a shared language with a slightly different inflection,
a different slant. Wittgenstein speaks for all exiles when he says: ‘The silent
adjustments to understand colloquial language are enormously complicated.’
I was failing to make those complicated adjustments, those enormous silent
shifts, and as such I was exposing myself as a non-native, an outsider,
someone who doesn’t know the code word is regular or drip.
In certain circumstances, being outside, not fitting in, can be a source of
satisfaction, even pleasure. There are kinds of solitude that provide a respite
from loneliness, a holiday if not a cure. Sometimes as I walked, roaming
under the stanchions of the Williamsburg Bridge or following the East River
all the way to the silvery hulk of the U.N., I could forget my sorry self,
becoming instead as porous and borderless as the mist, pleasurably adrift on
the currents of the city. I didn’t get this feeling when I was in my apartment;
only when I was outside, either entirely alone or submerged in a crowd.
In these situations I felt liberated from the persistent weight of loneliness,
the sensation of wrongness, the agitation around stigma and judgement and
visibility. But it didn’t take much to shatter the illusion of self-forgetfulness,
to bring me back not only to myself but to the familiar, excruciating sense of
lack. Sometimes the trigger was visual – a couple holding hands, something
as trivial and innocuous as that. But more often it had to do with language,
with the need to communicate, to understand and make myself understood via
the medium of speech.
The intensity of my reaction – sometimes a blush; more often a full-blown
blast of panic – testified to hypervigilance, to the way perception around
social interaction had begun to warp. Somewhere in my body, a measuring
system had identified danger, and now the slightest glitch in communication
was registering as a potentially overwhelming threat. It was as if, having
been so cataclysmically dismissed, my ears had become attuned to the note of
rejection, and when it came, as it inevitably does, in small doses throughout
the day, some vital part of me clamped and closed, poised to flee not so much
physically as deeper into the interior of the self.
No doubt it was ridiculous to be so sensitive. But there was something
almost agonising about speaking and being misunderstood or found
unintelligible, something that got right to the heart of all my fears about
aloneness. No one will ever understand you. No one wants to hear what you
say. Why can’t you fit in, why do you have to stick out so much? It wasn’t
hard to see why someone in this position might come to mistrust language,
doubting its ability to bridge the gap between bodies, traumatised by the
revealed gulf, the potentially lethal abyss that lurks beneath each carefully
proffered sentence. Dumbness in this context might be a way of evading hurt,
dodging the pain of failed communication by refusing to participate in it at
all. That’s how I explained my growing silence, anyway; as an aversion akin
to someone wishing to avoid a repeated electric shock.
If anyone would have understood this dilemma, it was Andy Warhol, an
artist I’d always dismissed until I became lonely myself. I’d seen the screenprinted cows and Chairman Maos a thousand times, and I thought they were
vacuous and empty, disregarding them as we often do with things we’ve
looked at but failed properly to see. My fascination with Warhol did not
begin until after I’d moved to New York, when I happened upon a couple of
his television interviews one day on YouTube and was struck by how hard he
seemed to be struggling with the demands of speech.
The first was a clip from the Merv Griffin show in 1965, when Warhol
was thirty-seven, at the height of his Pop Art fame. He came on in a black
bomber jacket and sat chewing gum, refusing to speak out loud and instead
whispering his answers in Edie Sedgwick’s ear. Do you do your own copies,
Griffin asks and at this ideal question Andy comes to life, nodding his head,
putting a finger to his lips and then mumbling the word yes to a torrent of
amused applause.
In the second interview, recorded two years later, he sits rigid against a
backdrop of his own Elvis I and II. Asked if he ever bothers reading
interpretations of his work, he gives a campy little wobble of the head.
‘Uhhhh,’ he says, ‘can I just answer alalalala?’ The camera zooms in,
revealing he’s by no means as disengaged as the affectless, narcotic voice
suggests. He looks almost sick with nerves, his make-up not quite concealing
the red nose that was the bane of his existence and which he tried repeatedly
to improve with cosmetic surgery. He blinks, swallows, licks his lips; a deer
in headlights, at once graceful and terrified.
Warhol is often thought of as being completely subsumed by the glossy
carapace of his own celebrity, of having successfully transformed himself
into an instantly recognisable avatar, just as his screen-prints of Marilyn and
Elvis and Jackie Kennedy convert the actual face into the endlessly
reproducible lineaments of the star. But one of the interesting things about his
work, once you stop to look, is the way the real, vulnerable, human self
remains stubbornly visible, exerting its own submerged pressure, its own
mute appeal to the viewer.
He’d had problems with speech from the start. Though passionately fond
of gossip and drawn since childhood to dazzling talkers, he was in his own
person frequently tongue-tied, especially in younger life, struggling with
communication by way of both the spoken and the written word. ‘I only know
one language,’ he once said, conveniently forgetting the Slovak he spoke with
his family:
. . . and sometimes in the middle of a sentence I feel like a foreigner trying to
talk it because I have word spasms where the parts of some words begin to
sound peculiar to me and in the middle of saying the word I’ll think, ‘Oh, this
can’t be right – this sounds very peculiar, I don’t know if I should try to finish
up this word or try to make it into something else, because if it comes out
good it’ll be right, but if it comes out bad it’ll sound retarded,’ and so in the
middle of words that are over one syllable, I sometimes get confused and try
to graft other words on top of them . . . I can hardly talk what I already talk.
Despite his own incapacity, Warhol was fascinated by how people talk to
one another. ‘To me,’ he said, ‘good talkers are beautiful because good talk
is what I love.’ His art exists in such a dazzling array of mediums, among
them film, photography, painting, drawing and sculpture, that it’s easy to miss
quite how much of it was devoted to human speech. During his career,
Warhol made over 4,000 audio tapes. Some of these he stored away, but
others were transcribed by assistants and published as books, including
several memoirs, the gargantuan diaries and a novel. His taped works, both
published and unpublished, investigate the alarmingness of language, its
range and limits, just as his films explore the borders of the physical body, its
boundaries and fleshy openings.
If becoming Warhol was an alchemical process, then the base metal was
Andrej, later Andrew, Warhola, born amidst the smelting fires of Pittsburgh
on 6 August 1928. He was the youngest of three sons of Andrej, sometimes
spelled Ondrej, and Julia Warhola, Ruthenian emigrants from what was then
the Austro-Hungarian Empire and is now Slovakia. This linguistic instability,
this parade of changing names, is a staple of the immigrant experience,
undermining from the very first the comforting notion that word and object
are securely attached. I come from nowhere, Warhol once famously said,
referring to poverty or Europe or the myth of self-creation, though perhaps
also attesting to the linguistic rent from out of which he had emerged.
Andrej had been the first to arrive in America, settling at the beginning of
the First World War in a Slovakian slum region of Pittsburgh and finding
work as a coal miner. Julia followed in 1921. The next year, their son Pawel
was born, anglicised to Paul. None of the family spoke English and Paul was
bullied at school for his accent, his mangling of American diction. As a
consequence he developed a speech impediment so severe that he cut class
whenever he might have to talk in public; a phobia that eventually drove him
to drop out of high school altogether (years later, in the diary he dictated each
morning down the phone to his secretary Pat Hackett, Andy commented of
Paul: ‘And my brother speaks better than I do, he always was a good
talker’).
As for Julia, she never mastered the new language, speaking at home in
Ruthenian, itself a blend of Slovak and Ukrainian mixed with Polish and
German. In her own tongue she was a strikingly garrulous woman, a
magnificent storyteller and ardent letter writer; a genius of communication
transplanted to a country where she could not make herself understood
beyond a few phrases of broken and garbled English.
Even as a little boy, Andy was notable for his skill at drawing and his
painful shyness: a pale, slightly otherworldly child, who fantasised about
renaming himself Andy Morningstar. He was passionately close to his
mother, particularly when at the age of seven he contracted rheumatic fever,
followed by St Vitus’s Dance, an alarming disorder characterised by
involuntary movements of the limbs. Confined to bed for months, he
inaugurated what might in retrospect be termed the first of his Factories,
those hubs of production and sociability he would go on to establish in New
York. He turned his room into an atelier of scrapbooking, collaging, drawing
and colouring in, activities for which Julia served as both rapturous audience
and studio assistant.
Sissy, momma’s boy, spoilt: this sort of withdrawal can leave a mark on a
child, especially if they’re temperamentally unsuited to the society of their
peers or do not conform to gender roles. It happened to a future friend,
Tennessee Williams, who never quite refound his footing in the shifting,
sometimes perilous hierarchy of school. As for Andy, though he always had
female friends and was never actively bullied, he could not in fairness be
described after his re-emergence from the sickroom as socially desirable, a
popular presence in the hallways of Schenley High School.
There was his appearance for a start: tiny and homely, with a bulbous nose
and ashen hair. The illness had left his strikingly white skin covered in livercoloured blotches, and as a teenager he suffered from the mortification of
acne, earning him the nickname Spot. In addition to his physical
awkwardness, he spoke English, his second language, with a heavy accent,
which instantly marked him as coming from among the lowest of Pittsburgh’s
immigrant working classes.
Can I just say alalalala? According to his biographer, Victor Bockris,
Andy had trouble making himself understood right through his teens and into
adulthood: saying ‘“ats” for “that is”, “jeetjet” for “did you eat yet?” and
“yunz” for “all of you”’; what one of his teachers later described as
‘mutilations of the English language’. In fact, his grasp was so poor that even
at art school he relied on friends to help him draft essays, assuming he’d
even understood what the teachers had assigned.
It’s not easy to summon him, the Andy of the 1940s. He lingers at the
threshold, slight in his creamy corduroy suit, standing with hands folded
prayer-style against his cheek, a pose he’d copied from his idol Shirley
Temple. Gay, of course, not that anyone had the terminology or sophistication
to vocalise that then. The sort of boy who polarised opinion, with his
confident, stylish drawings, his flamboyant outfits and awkward,
uncomfortable air.
After graduation, he moved in the summer of 1949 to – where else? – New
York, renting a slummy walk-up on St Mark’s Place, two blocks away from
where I had my humiliating morning coffees. There he started, like Hopper
before him, the arduous process of building a career as a commercial
illustrator. The same rounds of magazine editors, dragging a portfolio, though
in Raggedy Andy’s case it was a brown paper bag. The same grinding
poverty, the same shame at its exposure. He remembered (or claimed he did;
like many of Andy’s stories, this may actually have happened to a friend)
watching in horror as a cockroach crawled out of his drawings as he
displayed them to the white-gloved art director at Harper’s Bazaar.
Over the course of the 1950s he transformed himself by dogged
networking and hard graft into one of the city’s best known and best paid
commercial artists. In that same period, he established himself within the
intersecting worlds of bohemian and gay society. You could see it as a
decade of success, of rapid elevation, but it also involved repeated rejection
on two fronts. What Warhol most wanted was to be accepted by the art world
and to be desired by one of the beautiful boys on whom he developed serial
crushes: a breed exemplified by the poised and wickedly glamorous Truman
Capote. Adept despite his shyness at manoeuvring himself into social
proximity, he was hampered by an absolute belief in his own physical
abhorrence. ‘He had an enormous inferiority complex,’ one of these love
objects, Charles Lisanby, later told Bockris. ‘He told me he was from
another planet. He said he didn’t know how he got here. Andy wanted so
much to be beautiful, but he wore that terrible wig which didn’t fit and only
looked awful.’ As for Capote, he thought Warhol was ‘just a hopeless born
loser, the loneliest, most friendless person I’d ever met in my life’.
Born loser or not, he did in the course of the 1950s have several
relationships with men, though they had a tendency to fizzle out and were
marked by his extreme unwillingness to show his body, preferring always to
look than be seen. As for the art world, though he succeeded in having
several shows, his drawings were dismissed as being too commercial, too
campy, too weightless, too flimsy; too gay altogether for the homophobic,
macho climate of the time. This was the age of abstract expressionism,
dominated by Jackson Pollock and Willem de Kooning, in which the cardinal
virtues were seriousness and feeling, the revealed layers behind the
superficiality of the image. Beautiful drawings of golden shoes couldn’t be
anything but a retrograde step, frivolous and trivial, though in fact they
represented the first stage in Warhol’s assault on distinction itself, the
opposition between depth and surface.
The loneliness of difference, the loneliness of undesirability, the
loneliness of not being admitted into the magic circles of connection and
acceptance – the social and professional groupings, the embracing arms.
Another thing: he lived with his mother. In the summer of 1952 Julia had
arrived in Manhattan (I’d like to say by ice cream van, but that was a
previous visit). Andy had recently moved into his own apartment and she
was anxious about his ability to care for himself. The two of them shared a
bedroom, as they had when he was a sick little boy, sleeping on twin
mattresses on the floor and re-establishing the old production-line of
collaboration. Julia’s hand is everywhere in Warhol’s commercial work; in
fact, her beautifully erratic lettering won several awards. Her housekeeping
skills were less pronounced. Both that apartment and the larger one that
followed quickly degenerated into a state of squalor: a smelly labyrinth filled
with wobbling towers of paper, in which as many as twenty Siamese cats
made their homes, all but one of them named Sam.
*
Enough. At the beginning of the 1960s, Warhol reinvented himself. Instead of
whimsical drawings of shoes for fashion magazines and department store ad
campaigns, he began to produce flat, commodified, eerily exact paintings of
even more despicable objects, the kind of household goods everyone in
America knew and handled daily. Starting with a series of Coke bottles, he
progressed rapidly to Campbell’s soup cans, food stamps and dollar bills:
things he literally harvested from his mother’s cupboards. Ugly things,
unwanted things, things that couldn’t possibly belong in the sublime white
chamber of the gallery.
He wasn’t quite the originator of what quickly became known as Pop Art,
though he would soon be its most famous and charismatic proponent. Jasper
Johns had produced his first encaustic, messy, painterly American flag in
1954, and they were exhibited at the Leo Castelli gallery in New York in
1958. Robert Rauschenberg, Robert Indiana and Jim Dine all had shows
planned in the city by the end of 1960, and in 1961 Roy Lichtenstein, another
Castelli artist, pushed even further in terms of both content and execution,
ditching the human brushstrokes of abstract expressionism altogether to paint
the first of his giant primary-coloured Mickey Mouses, Look Mickey, a
cartoon lovingly replicated (though perhaps, considering the adjustments and
clarifications that Lichtenstein made, a better word is purified) in oils, right
down to the Ben-Day dots of the printing process, soon to become a signature
of his style.
One talks about the shock of the new, but part of the reason Pop Art caused
such enormous hostility, such a wringing of hands among artists, gallerists
and critics alike, is that it looked on first glance like a category error, a
painful collapse of the seemingly unquestionable boundary between high and
low culture; good taste and bad. But the questions Warhol was asking with
his new work run far deeper than any crude attempt at shock or defiance. He
was painting things to which he was sentimentally attached, even loved;
objects whose value derives not because they’re rare or individual but
because they are reliably the same. As he put it later in his bewitchingly
weird autobiography, The Philosophy of Andy Warhol, in the lovely
Gertrude Steinish cadence at which he was so adept: ‘all the Cokes are the
same and all the Cokes are good.’
Sameness, especially for the immigrant, the shy boy agonisingly aware of
his failures to fit in, is a profoundly desirable state; an antidote against the
pain of being singular, alone, all one, the medieval root from which the word
lonely emerges. Difference opens the possibility of wounding; alikeness
protects against the smarts and slights of rejection and dismissal. One dollar
bill is not more attractive than another; drinking Coke puts the coal miner
among the company of presidents and movie stars. It’s the same democratic
inclusive impulse that made Warhol want to call Pop Art Common Art, or
that had him declare: ‘If everybody’s not a beauty, then nobody is.’
Warhol emphasised the glamour of sameness as well as its potentially
unnerving aspect by producing his common objects as multiples; a generative
bombardment of repeating images in fluxing palettes. In 1962 he discovered
the mechanical, wonderfully chancy process of silk-screening. Now he could
dispense with hand-painted images altogether, transforming photographs by
way of professionally produced stencils directly into prints. That summer, he
filled the living room-cum-studio of his new house on Lexington Avenue with
hundreds of Marilyns and Elvises, their faces rollered on to canvases
covered in tonal splashes of pink and lavender, scarlet, fuchsia and pale
green.
‘The reason I’m painting this way is that I want to be a machine, and I feel
that whatever I do and do machine-like is what I want to do,’ he famously
told Gene Swenson in an interview for Art News conducted the next year.
AW: I think everybody should be a machine. I think everybody should like
everybody.
GS: Is that what Pop Art is all about?
AW: Yes. It’s liking things.
GS: And liking things is like being a machine?
AW: Yes, because you do the same thing every time. You do it over and over
again.
GS: And you approve of that?
AW: Yes.
To like: to feel attraction. To be like: to be similar or indistinguishable, of a
common origin or ilk. I think everybody should like everybody: the lonely
wish lurking at the heart of this profusion of likeable like objects, each one
desirable, each one desirably the same.
The desire to transform himself into a machine didn’t end with the
production of art. At around the time that he was painting the first Coke
bottles, Warhol also redesigned his own image, converting himself into a
product. In the 1950s, he’d shuttled between Raggedy Andy and a more
dandyish uniform of Brooks Brothers suits and expensive, often identical
shirts. Now he codified and refined his appearance; playing not, as is
customary, to his strengths, but rather emphasising the elements of himself
about which he felt most self-conscious or insecure. He didn’t surrender his
own individuality, or try to make himself appear more ordinary. Instead, he
consciously developed himself as a replicable entity, exaggerating his
physical appearance to create an automaton or simulacrum that he could both
shelter behind and send out into the world at large.
Rejected by the galleries for being too camp, too gay, he intensified his
swishy way of moving, his mobile wrists and light, bouncing walk. He set his
wigs a little askew, to emphasise their presence, and exaggerated his
awkward way of talking, speaking in a mumble if he spoke at all. According
to the critic John Richardson: ‘He made a virtue of his vulnerability, and
forestalled or neutralized any possible taunts. Nobody could ever “send him
up”. He had already done so himself.’ Forestalling criticism is something we
all do in small ways, but the commitment and thoroughness of Warhol’s
intensification of his flaws is very rare, attesting both to his courage and his
extreme fear of rejection.
The new Andy was immediately recognisable; a caricature that could be
cloned at will. In fact, in 1967 he did just that, secretly sending the actor
Alan Midgette out in Warhol drag to do a university lecture tour on his
behalf. Dressed in a leather jacket, albino wig and Wayfarers and mumbling
through his talks, Midgette did not arouse suspicion until he got lazy and
stopped applying Andy’s signature pancake layer of pallid foundation.
Multiple Andys, like the multiple silk-printed Marilyns and Elvises, raise
questions about originals and originality, about the duplicatory process by
which celebrity arises. But the desire to turn oneself into a multiple or
machine is also a desire to be liberated from human feeling, human need,
which is to say the need to be cherished or loved. ‘Machines have less
problems. I’d like to be a machine, wouldn’t you?’ he told Time in 1963.
Warhol’s mature work, in all its many mediums, from the screen-printed
divas to the magically random and quixotic movies, is in perpetual flight
from emotion and earnestness; arises, in fact, out of a desire to undermine,
undo, do over plodding notions of authenticity and honesty and personal
expression. Affectlessness is as much a part of the Warhol look, the gestalt,
as the physical props he employed to play himself. In all the eleven years and
806 pages of his vast diaries, the response to scenes of emotion or distress is
almost invariably it was so abstract or I was so embarrassed.
How did this come about? How did Raggedy Andy with his weeping
needs become transformed into the anaesthetised high priest of Pop?
Becoming a machine also meant having relationships with machines, using
physical devices as a way of filling the uncomfortable, sometimes
unbearable space between self and world. Warhol could not have achieved
his blankness, his enviable detachment, without the use of these charismatic
substitutes for human intimacy and love.
In The Philosophy of Andy Warhol, he explains in very precise terms how
technology liberated him from the burden of needing other people. At the
start of this laconic, light-footed and remarkably funny book (which opens
with the unnerving declaration: ‘B is anybody who helps me kill time. B is
anybody and I’m nobody. B and I’), Warhol revisits his early life, recalling
the babushkas and Hershey bars, the un-cut-out cut-out dolls stuffed under his
pillow. He wasn’t amazingly popular, he says, and though he did have some
nice friends, he wasn’t especially close to anyone. ‘I guess I wanted to be,’
he adds sadly, ‘because when I would see the kids telling one another their
problems, I felt left out. No one confided in me – I wasn’t the type they
wanted to confide in, I guess.’
This isn’t exactly a confession. It floats weightlessly, a play or parody of
unburdenment, though it does explicitly conflate loneliness, the desire for
closeness, with the desire for more or deeper speech. All the same, on he
goes, spilling details next about the early years in Manhattan. He still wanted
to be close to people back then, for them to open up their hidden regions, to
share those elusive, covetable problems with him. He kept thinking his
roommates would become good friends, only to discover they were just
looking for someone to pay the rent, something that made him feel hurt and
left out.
At the times in my life when I was feeling the most gregarious and looking
for bosom friendships, I couldn’t find any takers so that exactly when I was
alone was when I felt the most like not being alone. The moment I decided
I’d rather be alone and not have anyone telling me their problems, everybody
I’d never even seen before in my life started running after me . . . As soon as
I became a loner in my own mind, that’s when I got what you might call a
‘following.’
But now he had an ironic problem of his own, which was that all these new
friends were telling him too much. Instead of enjoying their problems
vicariously, as he had hoped he would, he felt instead that they were
spreading themselves on to him, like germs. He went to a psychiatrist to talk
it over, and on the way back he stopped at Macy’s – if in doubt, shop: the
Warhol credo – and bought a television, the first he’d ever owned, an RCA
19-inch black and white set.
Who needs a shrink? If he kept it on while people were talking it was just
diverting enough to protect him from getting too involved, a process he
described as being like magic. In fact, it was a buffer in more ways than one.
Able to conjure or dismiss company at the touch of a button, he found that it
made him stop caring so much about getting close to other people, the
process he’d found so hurtful in the past.
This is a strange story, perhaps better understood as a parable, a way of
articulating what it’s like to inhabit a particular kind of being. It’s about
wanting and not wanting: about needing people to pour themselves out into
you and then needing them to stop, to restore the boundaries of the self, to
maintain separation and control. It’s about having a personality that both
longs for and fears being subsumed into another ego; being swamped or
flooded, ingesting or being infected by the mess and drama of someone else’s
life, as if their words were literally agents of transmission.
This is the push and pull of intimacy, a process Warhol found much more
manageable once he realised the mediating capacities of machines, their
ability to fill up empty emotional space. That first TV set was both a
surrogate for love and a panacea for love’s wounds, for the pain of rejection
and abandonment. It provided an answer to the conundrum voiced in the very
first lines of The Philosophy: ‘I need B because I can’t be alone. Except
when I sleep. Then I can’t be with anyone’ – a double-edged loneliness, in
which a fear of closeness pulls against a terror of solitude. The photographer
Stephen Shore remembered being struck in the 1960s by the intimate role it
played in Warhol’s life, ‘finding it stunning and poignant that he’s Andy
Warhol, who’s just come from some all-night party or several of them, and
has turned on the television and cried himself to sleep to a Priscilla Lane
film, and his mother has come in and turned it off’.
Becoming a machine; hiding behind machines; employing machines as
companions or managers of human communication and connection: Andy was
as ever at the vanguard, the breaking wave of a change in culture, abandoning
himself to what would soon become the driving obsession of our times. His
attachment at once prefigures and establishes our own age of automation: our
rapturous, narcissistic fixation with screens; the enormous devolution of our
emotional and practical lives to technological apparatuses and contraptions
of one kind or another.
Though I made myself venture out each day for a walk by the river, I was
spending increasing hours sprawled on the orange couch in my apartment, my
laptop propped against my legs, sometimes writing emails or talking on
Skype, but more often just prowling the endless chambers of the internet,
watching music videos from my teenaged years or spending eye-damaging
hours scrolling through racks of clothes on the websites of labels I couldn’t
afford. I would have been lost without my MacBook, which promised to
bring connection and in the meantime filled and filled the vacuum left by
love.
For Warhol, the Macy’s television was the first in a long line of surrogates
and intermediaries. Over the years, he employed a range of devices, from the
stationary 16mm Bolex on which he recorded the Screen Tests of the 1960s
to the Polaroid camera that was his permanent companion at parties in the
1980s. Part of the appeal was undoubtedly having something to hide behind
in public. Acting as servant, consort or companion to the machine was
another route to invisibility, a mask-cum-prop like the wig and glasses.
According to Henry Geldzahler, who met Warhol in the transitional year of
1960, just before he began his transformation:
He was a little bit franker, but not much. He was always hiding. What
became obvious later on, as he used the tape recorder, camera and video, the
Polaroid, was the distancing quality of technology for him. It was always
keeping people at a slight remove. He always had a frame through which he
could see them in a slightly distanced way. But that wasn’t what he wanted.
What he wanted was to make sure that they couldn’t see him too clearly.
Basically, all those personality devices he had, all those denials and kind of
cagy self-inventions, were about – don’t understand me, don’t look into me,
don’t analyze. Don’t get too near me, because I’m not sure what’s there, I
don’t want to think about it. I’m not sure I like myself. I don’t like where I
came from. Take the artifact as I’m giving it.
But unlike the television, which was static and domestic, a transmitter
merely, these new machines also allowed him to record the world around
him, to capture and hoard the messy, covetable litter of experience. His
favourite was the tape-recorder, a device that so radically transformed his
need for people that he nicknamed it my wife.
I didn’t get married until 1964 when I got my first tape recorder. My wife.
My tape recorder and I have been married for ten years now. When I say
‘we,’ I mean my tape recorder and me. A lot of people don’t understand that
. . . The acquisition of my tape recorder really finished whatever emotional
life I might have had, but I was glad to see it go. Nothing was ever a problem
again, because a problem just meant a good tape and when a problem
transforms itself into a good tape it’s not a problem any more.
The tape machine, which in fact entered his life in 1965 (a gift from the
makers, Philips), was the ideal intermediary. It served as a buffer, a way of
keeping people at one remove, at once diverting and inoculating the flow of
potentially infectious or invasive words that had so agitated him prior to the
purchase of the television. Warhol hated waste, and he liked to make art out
of what other people considered superfluous, if not actually trash. Now he
could capture the social butterflies, the proto-Superstars who’d begun to
gather around him, storing their unscripted selves, their charismatic effluvia
on the preservative medium of magnetic tape.
By this time he was no longer working at home, painting pictures with his
mother, but had instead moved his studio operation on to the fifth floor of a
dirty, dingy, barely furnished warehouse on East 47th Street, in that dismal
part of Midtown near the UN, its crumbling walls meticulously covered with
silver foil, silver Mylar and silver paint.
The Silver Factory was the most sociable and least bounded of all of
Warhol’s working spaces. It was permanently thronged with people: people
helping out or killing time, people lolling on the couch or chatting on the
phone while Andy laboured in a corner, making Marilyns or cow wallpaper,
frequently pausing to ask a passer-by what they thought he should do next.
Stephen Shore again: ‘My guess is that it helped him in his work to have
people around, to have these other activities around him.’ And Andy himself:
‘I don’t really feel all these people with me every day at the Factory are just
hanging around me. I’m more hanging around them . . . I think we’re in a
vacuum here at the Factory: it’s great. I like being in a vacuum; it leaves me
alone to work.’
Alone in a crowd; hungry for company but ambivalent about contact: it’s
not surprising that in the Silver Factory years Warhol acquired the nickname
Drella, a portmanteau of Cinderella, the girl left behind in the kitchen while
everyone else has gone to the ball, and Dracula, who gains his nourishment
from the living essence of other human beings. He’d always been acquisitive
about people, especially if they were beautiful or famous or powerful or
witty; had always desired proximity, access, a better view. (Mary Woronov,
in her terrifying amphetamine-memoir of the Factory years, Swimming
Underground: ‘Andy was the worst . . . He even looked like a vampire:
white, empty, waiting to be filled, incapable of satisfaction. He was the
white worm – always hungry, always cold, never still, always twisting.’)
Now he had the tools to take possession, ameliorating loneliness without
ever having to risk himself.
*
Language is communal. It is not possible to have a wholly private language.
This is the theory put forward by Wittgenstein in Philosophical
Investigations, a rebuttal of Descartes’s notion of the lonely self, trapped in
the prison of the body, uncertain that anyone else exists. Impossible, says
Wittgenstein. We cannot think without language, and language is by its nature
a public game, both in terms of acquisition and transmission.
But despite its shared nature, language is also dangerous, a potentially
isolating enterprise. Not all players are equal. In fact, Wittgenstein was by no
means always a successful participant himself, frequently experiencing
extreme difficulty in communication and expression. In an essay on fear and
public language, the critic Rei Terada describes a scene repeated throughout
Wittgenstein’s life, in which he would begin to stammer while attempting to
address a group of colleagues. Eventually, his stuttering would give way to a
tense silence, during which he would struggle mutely with his thoughts,
gesticulating all the while with his hands, as if he was still speaking audibly.
The fear of being misunderstood or failing to generate understanding
haunted Wittgenstein. As Terada observes, his ‘confidence in the stability
and public character of language coexisted, it would seem, with a dreadful
expectation that he would himself be unintelligible’. He had a horror of
certain kinds of language, in particular ‘idle talk and unintelligibility’; talk
that lacked substance or failed to produce meaning.
The idea that language is a game at which some players are more skilled
than others has a bearing on the vexed relationship between loneliness and
speech. Speech failures, communication breakdowns, misunderstandings,
mishearings, episodes of muteness, stuttering and stammering, word
forgetfulness, even the inability to grasp a joke: all these things invoke
loneliness, forcing a reminder of the precarious, imperfect means by which
we express our interiors to others. They undermine our footing in the social,
casting us as outsiders, poor or non-participants.
Though Warhol shared many of Wittgenstein’s problems with speech
production, he retained a typically perverse fondness for language errors. He
was fascinated by empty or deformed language, by chatter and trash, by
glitches and botches in conversation. The films he made in the early 1960s
are full of people failing to understand or listen to each other, an
investigative process that sharpened with the arrival of the tape machine. The
first thing he did with his new wife was to make a book, entitled a, a novel,
composed entirely of recorded speech; a celebratory tour de force of idle
and unintelligible language, around which loneliness hovers like a sea mist.
Despite the declaration of the title, a isn’t a novel in any ordinary sense. It
isn’t fictional, for a start. It doesn’t have a plot and nor is it a product of
creative labour, at least not in the way that term is ordinarily defined. Like
Warhol’s paintings of inappropriate objects or wholly static films it defies
the rules of content, the terms by which categories are assembled and
maintained.
It was conceived as an homage to Ondine, Robert Olivo, nicknamed the
Pope, the irrepressible speed-queen and greatest of all the Factory’s
supernaturally gifted talkers. Charming and unstable, he appeared in many of
Warhol’s films of the period, most notably Chelsea Girls, in which he can be
seen flying into one of his notorious rages and slapping Rona Page twice
around the face for calling him a phoney.
Ondine was a quicksilver presence. A photograph taken around the time of
a’s taping catches him in a rare moment of stillness, out in the street, head
turned to confront the camera – a handsome man in aviators and a black tshirt, his dark hair falling in a quiff over his eyes, an airline flight bag slung
over his shoulder, his mouth in the characteristic pout-cum-smirk that Warhol
describes in POPism as being ‘pure Ondine, a sort of quizzical duck’s mouth
with deep smile lines around it’.
The original plan was to follow him for twenty-four hours straight.
Recording began in the afternoon of Friday, 12 August 1965, but after twelve
hours and despite copious consumption of amphetamines Ondine began to
flag (‘you have finished me off’). The remainder was taped later, in three
sessions over the summer of 1966 and one in May 1967. The twenty-four
cassettes were then transcribed by four different typists, all of them young
women. The pool comprised Maureen Tucker, later the drummer in The
Velvet Underground, Susan Pile, a student at Barnard, and two high school
girls. They approached their task in a variety of ways, some erratically
identifying speakers and some failing to distinguish between voices at all.
None were professional typists. Tucker refused to transcribe swear words,
while one of the girls’ mothers threw away an entire section, horrified by the
language.
Warhol insisted that all these errors be preserved, alongside the many
infelicities of transcription and spelling. As such, a is resistant if not actively
antagonistic to the production of understanding. Reading it is confusing,
amusing, baffling, alienating, boring, infuriating, thrilling; a crash course in
how speech binds and isolates, conjoins and freezes out.
Where are we? Hard to tell. In the street, in a coffee shop, in a cab, on a
roof terrace, in a bathtub, on the phone, at a party, surrounded by people
popping pills and playing opera at full blast. Everywhere is the same place
really: the empire of the Silver Factory. But you have to imagine the
interiors. No one describes their location, just as in a conversation one
doesn’t stop to itemise the elements of the room in which it’s taking place.
The effect is like being shipwrecked in a sea of voices, a surf of
unattributed speech. Voices in the background, voices vying for space, voices
drowned out by opera, inconsequential voices, unintelligible garble, voices
running into one another: an endless barrage of gossip, anecdote, confession,
flirtation, plan; language taken to the threshold of meaning, abandoned
language, language past the point of caring, language disintegrating into pure
sound; OW-UH-mmmmm. I dunno what the wor dis. Oooooo-mmm-mmm,
through which the voice of Maria Callas perpetually seeps, itself gloriously
deformed.
Who’s talking? Drella, Taxi, Lucky, Rotten, the Duchess, DoDo, the Sugar
Plum Fairy, Billy Name, a parade of cryptic, unstable nicknames and noms
de plume. Do you understand or don’t you? Are you in or out? Like any game,
it’s all about belonging. ‘The only way to talk is to talk in games, it’s just
fabulous,’ Ondine says and Edie Sedgwick, disguised as Taxi, replies:
‘Ondine has games that no one understands.’
People who can’t keep up, who slow the flow, are cast literally to the
margins. In one of the most disturbing sequences, Taxi and Ondine are joined
by a French actress, whose repeatedly ignored interjections are placed on the
far side of the page, away from the main stream of conversation, the text
shrunken to denote the tiny tininess of an ignored voice, caught in the echo
chamber of exclusion. Elsewhere, the talk is of who deserves to stay inside
the charmed circle of the Factory. Elaborate rules are drawn up, protocols of
expulsion developed. Society as centrifugal force, separating the elements,
policing division.
But speaking, participating, is almost as terrifying as being ignored.
Warhol takes the desire for attention – to be looked at and listened to – and
sharpens it into an instrument of torture. ‘I’m making love to the tape
recorder,’ Ondine says towards the end of his marathon of speech, but from
the very beginning he also keeps begging to stop, asking over and over how
many more hours he has to fill. In the john: ‘No, oh Della, please, I, I, my
. . .’ In the bathtub: ‘may I ask you in all fairness – this is no private . . .’ At
Rotten Rita’s apartment: ‘Don’t you hate me Drella, by this time? You must
be so disgusted with putting that thing in my face . . . Please shut it off, I’m so
horrifying.’
Putting that thing in my face: there’s certainly something sexual about
Warhol’s behaviour: stripping Ondine down, encouraging him to ejaculate a
torrent, to spill his secrets, to dish the dirt. What he wants is words – words
to fill or kill time, take up empty space, expose the gaps between people,
reveal wounds and hurts. He says very little himself beyond a reticent,
repetitive litany of Oh, Oh really? What? (In 1981, by which time he’d
become considerably more fluent, even chatty, one of his first superstars
called him on the phone. He immediately fell back into the old stuttering
speech, telling his diary: ‘The dialogue was straight from the sixties.’)
Towards the end of the book, Ondine escapes for a while and Drella is left
with the Sugar Plum Fairy, Joe Campbell, the actorcum-rent boy who starred
with Paul America in his movie My Hustler in 1965. Slender, dark and
quick-witted, a former boyfriend of Harvey Milk, Campbell was
astonishingly skilled at making even the most reluctant people open up. He
turns the tables on Warhol, submitting him to the same kind of scrutiny he
forced on others. First he examines his body, describing him sweetly as soft,
not fat. ‘How old are you?’ he asks. A long pause. ‘Very great silence.’
‘Yeah, uh talk about Ondine.’ ‘Nah, why do you avoid this problem?’ Warhol
repeatedly tries to turn the flow of the conversation. For a minute or two, Joe
plays along, and then he returns to the attack.
SPF—Why do you avoid yourself? Huh?
SPF—Why do you avoid yourself? What?
SPF—I mean you almost refuse your own existence. You know- Uh—it’s just
easier SPF—No I mean I like, I like to know you (talking very quietly) I
always think of you as being hurt. Well, I’ve been hurt so often I don’t even
care anymore. SPF—Oh sure you care. Well uh, I don’t get hurt anymore . . .
SPF—I mean, it’s very nice to feel. You know. Uh-no, I don’t really think so.
It’s too sad to do (opera) And I’m always, uh, afraid to feel happy because
then uh . . . just never last . . . SPF—Do you ever, do you ever do things by
yourself? Uh no, I can’t do things by myself.
Talking so much you horrify yourself and those around you; talking so little
that you almost refuse your own existence: a demonstrates that speech is by
no means a straightforward route to connection. If loneliness is to be defined
as a desire for intimacy, then included within that is the need to express
oneself and to be heard, to share thoughts, experiences and feelings. Intimacy
can’t exist if the participants aren’t willing to make themselves known, to be
revealed. But gauging the levels is tricky. Either you don’t communicate
enough and remain concealed from other people, or you risk rejection by
exposing too much altogether: the minor and major hurts, the tedious
obsessions, the abscesses and cataracts of need and shame and longing. My
own decision had been to clam up, though sometimes I longed to grab
someone’s arm and blurt the whole thing out, to pull an Ondine, to open
everything for inspection.
It’s here that Warhol’s recording devices take on their magical,
transformative aspect. Plenty of people have over the years felt the need to
portray him as damaged and manipulative, needling confession out of the
vulnerable and drug-addicted as a way of filling gaping holes in the fabric of
his own being. But that isn’t the whole story. His work around speech might
be better understood as a collaboration, a symbiotic exchange between the
citizens of too much and not enough, between excess and paucity, expulsion
and retention. After all, it’s just as painful, just as isolating, to talk into a
vacuum as it is to be stoppered in the first place. For the logorrheic, the
compulsively communicative, Warhol was the ideal audience, the neutral
dream listener as well as the bully with what Ondine called his ‘Prussian
tactics’.
This is what the filmmaker Jonas Mekas thought was really driving the
Factory’s grand project of exhibition and exposure. He figured people
participated because of Warhol’s knack for paying non-judgemental attention
to those who were otherwise rejected or ignored.
Andy was the chief psychiatrist. It’s the typical psychiatrist’s situation: on the
couch, you begin to be totally yourself, hide nothing, this person won’t react,
just listen to you. Andy was such an open psychiatrist with all those sad,
confused people. They used to come and feel at home. There was this person
who never disapproved of them – ‘Nice, nice, good, oh, beautiful.’ They felt
very much received, accepted. I have no doubt it helped some not to commit
suicide – some committed . . . Also they felt that when Andy put them in front
of the camera, they could do and be themselves, thinking that this is what they
can contribute, now I’m doing my thing.
The critic Lynne Tillman also felt that the exchange went both ways. In her
essay on a, ‘The Last Words are Andy Warhol’, she weighs the charge of
manipulation against the notion that Warhol offered insecure and unhappy
people ‘something – work or a feeling of significance for that moment or a
way to fill time. The tape recorder is on. You are being recorded. Your voice
is being heard, and this is history.’
It wasn’t just a question of contribution, though. If all of Warhol’s work, a
included, is antagonistic to received notions of value, if it participates in a
tearing down of sentiment and seriousness, it is at the same time engaged in a
project of building up, of giving status and attention to the deviant and
neglected, to the aspects of culture that have become invisible, either because
they lurk in shadows or because they’ve drifted into the blind spot of
excessive familiarity.
While a is at pains to show that a heartfelt confession has no more
intrinsic value than a conversation about 20 milligram bi-phetamine or
mouldy Coca-Cola, it simultaneously testifies to the importance, the beauty
even, of what people actually say and how they say it: the great jumbled
inconsequential endlessly unfinished business of ordinary existence. This is
what Warhol liked, and this is what he valued too, a fact attested to by a’s
closing line, in which Billy Name, summing up the whole chaotic expulsive
endeavour, cries ‘Out of the garbage, into The Book’ – the vessel, that is, by
which the transient and trashy will be sanctified and preserved.
*
Of course, all this is assuming that your words are wanted in the first place.
In the spring of 1967, the final year of a’s taping, a woman came to see Andy
about a play she’d written. He took the meeting, intrigued by the title, Up
Your Ass, but then got cold feet, worried about the potentially pornographic
contents. He thought the woman might be an undercover cop, trying to entrap
him. On the contrary, she was as far from the system as it is possible to be, an
outlier and anomaly even amidst the flamboyant freak-show of the Factory.
Like Warhol, Valerie Solanas, the woman who once shot him, has been
eaten by history, reduced to a single act. The crazy woman, the failed
assassin, too angry and unhinged to be worthy of attention. And yet what she
had to say is brilliant and prescient as well as brutal and psychotic. The story
of her relationship with Andy is all about words – about how much they’re
valued and what happens if they aren’t. In her controversial book, the SCUM
Manifesto, she considers the problems of isolation not in emotional terms,
but structurally, as a social problem that particularly affects women. And yet
Solanas’s attempt to make contact and build solidarity by way of language
ended in tragedy, amplifying rather than relieving the sense of isolation that
she and Warhol shared.
The early life of Valerie Solanas is just as you might expect, only more so.
A disordered childhood, parcelled between relatives. Sharp as a knife, so
sharp you’ll cut yourself, a sarcastic, rebellious girl. Abused by her
bartender father, sexually active from a young age, first child at fifteen,
raised as her sister, second child at sixteen, adopted by friends of the father,
a sailor lately back from the Korean War. An out lesbian at school, where she
was bullied, then a psychology major at the University of Maryland, where
she wrote witty, caustic, proto-feminist columns for the student paper.
What was she like back then? Angry, sometimes physically aggressive,
very poor, determined, isolated, radicalised by the circumstances of her own
life – the suffocating expectations, the limited options, the galling hypocrisies
and ruthless double standards. Unlike Warhol, who combated his exclusion
passively, Solanas wanted active change, to smash things up rather than
redecorate and rearrange.
After an abortive stint at grad school, she dropped out of the educational
system entirely, hitchhiking around the country. She started writing Up Your
Ass in 1960 and the next year moved to New York, where she drifted
between boarding houses and welfare hotels. I have said that both Hopper
and Warhol were poor, but Solanas existed in a marginal world that neither
of them ever experienced: panhandling, turning tricks, waiting tables; never
resting, never taking her eyes off the ball.
In the mid-1960s she started work on what would become the SCUM
Manifesto. The word scum appealed to her. Scum: extraneous matter or
impurities; a low, vile or worthless person or group of people. Like Warhol,
she was attracted by the excessive and neglected, the rubbished and rubbishy.
Both liked turning things upside-down; both were inverts, imaginative
upenders of what the culture held dear. As for the SCUM of the manifesto,
Solanas’s definition describes just the sort of women Warhol liked, at least
from the other side of a camera: ‘dominant, secure, self-confident, nasty,
violent, selfish, independent, proud, thrill-seeking, free-wheeling, arrogant
females, who consider themselves fit to rule the universe, who have freewheeled to the limits of this “society” and are ready to wheel on to
something far beyond what it has to offer’.
The Manifesto breaks down what’s wrong with patriarchy – which is to
say, using Solanas’s own language, what’s wrong with men. It proposes
violent solutions, perhaps along the satiric lines of Swift’s A Modest
Proposal, which suggested that Ireland’s poor might sell their children as
food for the rich, though perhaps not. It’s insane and appalling, also insightful
and weirdly joyful. It calls in the very first sentence for the overthrow of the
government, the elimination of the money system, the institution of complete
automation (Valerie shared Warhol’s prescience when it came to the
liberating or pseudo-liberating qualities of machines) and the destruction of
the male sex. Over the next forty-five pages, it slams through the ways in
which men are responsible for violence, work, boredom, prejudice, moral
systems, isolation, government and war, even death.
Still shockingly violent now, the manifesto was so far in advance of its
times politically as to be almost unreadably strange, written in an alien
language, a language that is palpably buckling and rupturing, exploding out of
silence, splattering itself on to the page. When Solanas wrote SCUM,
second-wave feminism had barely begun. Betty Friedan’s reasoned and
reasonable The Feminine Mystique was published in 1963. In 1964, the
Civil Rights Act barred employment discrimination with regard to race and
gender; in addition, the first woman’s shelter opened. But a nascent
acknowledgement that the lot of women included violence and financial
exploitation was still a world away from the systemic, furious, radical
upheaval that Solanas was proposing. ‘SCUM,’ she wrote, ‘is against the
entire system, the very idea of law and government. SCUM is out to destroy
the system, not attain certain rights within it.’
It’s not an easy position to inhabit, that of the outlier, the iconoclast.
‘Valerie Solanas was a loner,’ writes Avital Ronell in her introduction to
SCUM. ‘She had no followers. She arrived too late or too early on every
scene.’ And Ronell is not the only one to see the manifesto as a text that both
arises from and exists in isolation. According to Mary Harron, the writer and
director of the biopic I Shot Andy Warhol: ‘It is a product of a gifted mind
working in isolation, with no contact with but also no allegiance to academic
structures – isolated and therefore owing nothing to anyone.’ As for Breanne
Fahs, who wrote the wonderfully restorative biography of Solanas published
by the Feminist Press in 2014: ‘SCUM Manifesto was witty, intelligent, and
violent, sure, but it was also lonely. Isolation followed Valerie, however
much she recruited and connected, attacked and provoked.’
This is not to say, however, that isolation was what Solanas desired. In
fact, isolation was one of the things she blamed on men: the way they
separated women from each other, hauling them off to the suburbs to form
self-absorbed family groups. SCUM is deeply opposed to this kind of
atomisation. It’s not just a lonely document; it’s also a document that seeks to
identify and remedy the causes of isolation. The deeper dream, beyond that of
a world without men, is revealed when the word community is defined: ‘A
true community consists of individuals – not mere species members, not
couples – respecting each others individuality and privacy, at the same time
interacting with each other mentally and emotionally – free spirits in free
relation to each other – and cooperating with each other to achieve common
ends’ – a statement with which I am in complete accord.
After Valerie finished the manifesto at the beginning of August 1967, she
worked frenetically to publicise its existence. She mimeographed 2,000
copies and hand-sold them on the streets, $1 for women, $2 for men. She
distributed fliers, conducted forums, posted adverts in the Village Voice and
made recruiting posters.
One of the recipients of these posters was Andy Warhol. On 1 August,
Valerie mailed him three copies, two for the Factory and one ‘to keep under
your pillow at night’. It was a gift for an ally, not an enemy. They’d met
earlier that spring, while she was trying to get Up Your Ass produced. At the
time, she’d been arranging dozens of meeting with producers and publishers,
but they all passed, some expressing anxiety about its pornographic contents
(the play is extremely bawdy, centring on the exploits of a hard-boiled dyke
called Bongoi).
Valerie hadn’t wandered or drifted into the Factory. She’d come
deliberately, looking for amplification of her voice, her work. She was
focused and intent; ‘dead serious’ in her own words. That spring she’d
sometimes come to sit at Warhol’s table in the backroom of Max’s Kansas
City, braving the stares, the drag queens giving her the once over. She was a
fast-talker, a hustler, and he liked that, regularly taping their phone
conversations and apparently lifting a number of her lines for later movies.
Their conversations were playful and often very funny. In one of them,
reported in Fahs’s biography, Solanas asks: ‘Andy, will you take seriously
your position as head of the men’s auxiliary of SCUM? Cause you do realise
the immenseness of the position?’ Andy: ‘What is it? Is it that big?’ Valerie:
‘Yes, it is.’ She pretends to be in the CIA, quizzes him about his sexual
practices and, like the Sugar Plum Fairy, interrogates him about his own
silence, his abnormal reticence.
Valerie: Why don’t you like to answer questions?
Andy: I really never have anything to say . . .
Valerie: Andy! Did anyone ever tell you you were uptight?
Andy: I’m not uptight.
Valerie: How are you not uptight?
Andy: It’s such an old-fashioned word.
Valerie: You’re an old-fashioned guy. You really are. I mean, you don’t
realize it but you really are.
Back in June, she’d given him a bound copy of Up Your Ass. He’d expressed
interest in producing it; in fact their conversations had progressed as far as
suggesting venues and possible double-bills. But some time that summer
Warhol lost or discarded it. As a kind of apology, a way of getting her off his
back, he cast Valerie in his film, I, a Man. In it, she refuses the sinuous
femininity of most of the Superstars, male and female alike, performing
instead an aggressively anti-sexual androgyny, awkward, jittery and
amusingly contemptuous.
Warhol wasn’t by any means the only publisher or promoter Valerie was
pursuing that summer. At the end of August, a few days after the premiere of
I, a Man, she signed a contract for $500 for a novel with a notoriously sleazy
publisher, Maurice Girodias at the Olympia Press. As soon as the ink was
dry, she began to fret. Did the contract mean she had inadvertently signed
away the rights to both Up Your Ass and SCUM Manifesto? Who actually
owned her words? Had she given them away? Worse, had they been stolen
from her?
Warhol was sympathetic to Valerie’s worries about the Girodias contract,
even arranging for his own lawyers to look it over for free. There was no
problem, they all agreed; the contract was vaguely worded and in no way
binding, but their reassurances did nothing to ameliorate her growing anxiety.
Words were what counted for Valerie; they were the flung rope between her
and the world. Words were a source of power, the best way of making
contact, of reshaping society on her own terms. The idea that she might have
lost control over her own writing was devastating. It plunged her into the
isolation chamber of paranoia, where the self is necessarily armed and
barricaded against incursion and attack.
But as the old adage goes, just because you’re paranoid doesn’t mean
they’re not after you. Solanas was not mad in thinking that she could see
oppression everywhere she looked, or that society was a system dedicated to
excluding and side-lining women (1967, the year in which SCUM was first
published, was also, one might remember, the year in which Jo Hopper
donated her life’s work to the Whitney, which subsequently destroyed
it).Valerie’s growing loneliness and isolation was caused not just by mental
illness, but also because she was voicing something about which the
community at large was in denial.
Over the course of the next year, Solanas’s relationship with Warhol
soured. Her attempts to have him produce the play or make a film out of
SCUM became more aggrieved, more desperate and deranged. She’d been
evicted from the Chelsea Hotel for non-payment of rent, and was drifting
around the country, homeless and broke. She sent him hate mail from the
road. One addresses him as ‘Toad’; another reads: ‘Daddy, if I am good will
you let Jonas Mekas write about me? Will you let me do a scene in one of
your shit movies? Oh, thank you, thank you’ – not, one might imagine, a tone
or attitude to which Warhol was much accustomed.
Things came to a head in the summer of 1968. Back in New York, and
more paranoid than ever, she began to ring Andy persistently at home, a
number almost no one in his entourage even had, let alone used. Eventually,
he stopped taking Solanas’s calls at all (one of the ongoing threads in a is the
necessity of establishing this sort of protocol, so that calls to the Factory
could be screened and unwanted advances avoided).
On Monday 3 June, Valerie collected a bag from a friend’s apartment and
then went to visit two producers, Lee Strasberg and Margo Feiden. Strasberg
was out but Valerie spent four hours at Feiden’s apartment. At the end of an
exhausting and exhaustive discussion about her work, she asked if Margo
would be willing to produce her play. When Margo refused, she pulled out a
gun. After some persuasion, she left, saying she was going to shoot Andy
Warhol instead.
She arrived at the Factory just after lunch, carrying a brown paper bag
containing two handguns, a Kotex pad and her address book. This was the
new Factory: a glossy loft on the sixth floor of 33 Union Square West, at the
northernmost tip of the square. The old Silver Factory had been demolished
that spring and with the shift in location the personnel too had begun to
change, the speed-heads and drag queens gradually replaced by sleek and
suited men, the business-minded associates who would shepherd Warhol into
increasingly lucrative pastures from now on.
When Valerie arrived Warhol was out, and so she hung around outside,
going up and down in the elevator at least seven times to check she hadn’t
missed him. He finally appeared at 4.15, encountering both Valerie and his
then boyfriend Jed Johnson in the street outside. The three of them took the
elevator up together. In POPism, his memoir of the 1960s, Warhol recalled
that Valerie was wearing lipstick and a heavy coat, though the day was very
hot, and that she was bouncing a little on the balls of her feet.
Upstairs, people were working, among them Warhol’s collaborator Paul
Morrissey and his business manager Fred Hughes. Andy sat down at his desk
and took a call from Viva, Susan Bottomley, who was having her hair dyed in
Kenneth’s Hair Salon. As they chatted, Valerie pulled out the .32 Beretta and
fired twice. No one but Andy saw where the shots had come from. He tried
to climb under the desk, but she stood over him and shot again, this time
hitting him at close range. Blood was gushing through his t-shirt, splattering
the white cord of the phone. ‘I felt horrible, horrible pain,’ he remembered
later, ‘like a cherry bomb exploding inside me.’ Next, Solanas shot the art
critic Mario Amaya, wounding him superficially. She was about to fire at a
pleading Fred Hughes when the elevator door opened and she was persuaded
to step inside. ‘There’s the elevator, Valerie. Just take it.’
By then Warhol was crumpled on the floor in a pool of his own blood. He
kept saying he couldn’t breathe. When Billy Name bent over him, shaking and
heaving, Warhol thought he was laughing and started to laugh too. ‘Don’t
laugh, oh, please don’t make me laugh,’ he said, but Billy was crying. The
bullet had ricocheted sideways through Andy’s abdomen, passing through
both his lungs, his oesophagus, gall bladder, liver, intestines and spleen,
leaving a gaping exit wound in his right flank. His lungs were punctured and
he was fighting for air.
It took a long time to get him out. Everything dragging, everything lagging.
The stretcher wouldn’t fit in the elevator and so he had to be carried down
six flights of steep stairs, a journey so distressing that he lost consciousness.
Mario had to tip the ambulance driver $15 to put the siren on, and once
Warhol was finally in the operating room, it seemed anyway that they were
too late. Both he and Mario distinctly heard the doctors muttering No chance.
‘Don’t you know who this is?’ Mario screamed. ‘It’s Andy Warhol. He’s
famous. And he’s rich. He can afford to pay for an operation. For Christ’s
sake, do something.’
Inspired perhaps by the mention of fame and riches, the surgeons did
decide to operate, but as they opened up Andy’s chest his heart stopped
beating. Though they managed to resuscitate, Warhol was clinically dead for
one and a half minutes, flung out of life altogether by the least regarded of all
the voice artists who’d collected around him: a journey he later said he could
never be totally certain he had returned from.
*
Everyone always got Valerie wrong. When she was arrested (giving herself
up to a traffic cop in Times Square at around the time Andy was having his
spleen removed), she told the throng of journalists at the Thirteenth Precinct
station house that the answer to why she’d shot Andy Warhol would be found
in her manifesto. ‘Read my manifesto,’ she insisted. ‘It will tell you what I
am.’ Evidently no one did, since she was misidentified on the front page of
the Daily News the next morning. The famous headline ran: ACTRESS
SHOOTS ANDY WARHOL. Furious, she demanded a retraction, and the
evening edition of the story included her correction: ‘I’m a writer, not an
actress.’
It would become increasingly hard to maintain control of her own story,
dismaying considering she claimed she’d shot Warhol because he had too
much control over her life. Now she had to contend with the full apparatus of
the state; to spend three years shuttling back and forth between courts, mental
hospitals and prisons, among them the notoriously filthy and brutal
Matteawan State Hospital for the Criminally Insane (where Edie Sedgwick
was also a patient at the time), Bellevue Psychiatric Hospital (where
Valerie’s uterus was removed), and the Women’s House of Detention.
Her case became a cause célèbre among feminists, but she quickly fell out
with the women who flocked to her defence. She didn’t want anyone
speaking for her, or co-opting her ideas. Nor did she stop her attacks on
Warhol. During the years of her incarceration, she kept sending him letters,
some threatening or coercive, some conciliatory, even chummy. Briefly at
liberty in the winter of 1968, she reinstituted her campaign of telephone
harassment. In POPism, Warhol remembered answering the phone to her on
Christmas Eve, and almost fainting when he heard her voice. She threatened,
he said, to ‘do it again . . . My worst nightmare had come true.’
Instead, she went back to prison. By the time she re-emerged, she was
quieter, more subdued, as you might expect from someone who’d been
trapped in places where sexual and physical assaults were common, where
prisoners were expected to survive on a slice of bread and a single filthy cup
of coffee a day, and were frequently locked as punishment into cells devoid
of furnishings or light.
Back in New York, Valerie spent much of her time hunting for food and a
place to sleep. People who knew her in that period attest to the way she was
excluded from communes and women’s groups, both of whom had become
wary of her hostility, her savage tongue. Strangers avoided her in the street.
She was frequently spat at and thrown out of cafés, not because she was
recognised as Warhol’s putative assassin, but because she gave off a tang of
difference, a silent signal of being somehow outcast, undesirable, even
blemished. She drifted around the Village, a miserable, skinny figure,
huddled in layers of winter clothes. She was still fixated with the idea that
people were stealing her words, only now she thought a transmitter had been
hidden in her uterus.
The loneliness of the second half of Solanas’s life was a product of many
factors. The most obvious and frequently stated was her growing loss of
touch with consensual reality. Paranoia is isolating in itself, by its own
mechanisms of mistrust and withdrawal, but it also carries a stigma, as does
time spent in prison. People pick up on these perceived markers of
abnormality. They sidestep the street mutterer and shun the former criminal,
isolating them if not submitting them to actual violence. What I am trying to
say is that the vicious circle by which loneliness proceeds does not happen
in isolation, but rather as an interplay between the individual and the society
in which they are embedded, a process perhaps worsened if they are already
a sharp critic of that society’s inequities.
All the same, there was a period in the 1970s in which Valerie’s life
improved. She developed a loving relationship (with a man, as it happens)
and found an apartment on East 3rd Street. Later, I realised her building had
backed directly on to mine, and that she too must have spent her days
listening to the bells of the Most Holy Redeemer tolling off the hours. She
found work on a feminist magazine, and enjoyed the business of
collaboration. A stable, even a pleasant time, until in 1977 she finally
succeeded in self-publishing SCUM. It was a total failure, a dead and abject
loss. Of all the things that happened to Valerie, it was this that finally broke
her ability to form relationships with other people: not the imprisonment, not
the shooting, but the final, incontrovertible evidence of her failure to make
contact by way of words.
From then on, her paranoia became overwhelming. She thought her
enemies were trying to communicate with her through her bed-sheets. She
gave up her apartment and her relationship, becoming homeless once again.
Her abiding, driving fear in her last years was the same old, increasingly
ironic one: that her words were going to be stolen. In the end this paranoia
isolated her from everyone in her life. She refused to speak, writing in code
and mumbling or humming, trying to avoid the necessity of opening her
mouth. Eventually she left New York altogether and drifted west. She died of
pneumonia in April 1988, in Room 420 of a welfare hotel in San Francisco.
Her body wasn’t found for three days, and was crawling with maggots by the
time the super noticed her rent was late.
This is about as lonely as death gets. It’s the death of someone who has
tumbled out of the world of language altogether; who has severed not just the
ties of friendship and love but also the many small verbal bonds that hold
each person within the social order, tethering them in place. Solanas had
pinned her hopes on language, believing implicitly in its capacity for
changing the world. Perhaps in the end it was better, safer, less devastating to
think of it as a medium in which her own stock was so high, so in demand
that she no longer dared participate, rather than accepting that she had simply
failed in her expression: that she was unintelligible, Wittgenstein’s great fear,
or worse, that what she had to say was not wanted at all.
But it wasn’t only Valerie who became more isolated in the wake of the
shooting. In hospital, on a drip, with his spleen and part of his right lung
removed, Andy felt sure that he had already died, that he was occupying a
dream space, parked in a corridor between realms. On the third day, he heard
on the hospital television that Robert Kennedy had been shot, the eroding surf
of the news deposing him from the front page.
Already wary of contact, already uncertain about the virtues of
embodiment, he now had to deal with the catastrophic wreckage of his
physical form. His abdomen had been carved to pieces and he would spend
the rest of his life in surgical corsets (they made him feel ‘glued-together’, a
term he also used for his wigs, and which attests to how deeply he relied on
physical objects for a sense of wholeness and cohesion). He was exhausted,
in acute physical pain and suffering from what would now be diagnosed as
post-traumatic stress disorder, which came by way of surges of
overwhelming anxiety and terror.
He reacted by withdrawing, going numb, retreating inside himself. In an
interview conducted two weeks after the shooting he said, as he had to the
Sugar Plum Fairy: ‘It’s too hard to care . . . I don’t want to get too involved
in other people’s lives . . . I don’t want to get too close . . . I don’t like to
touch things . . . That’s why my work is so distant from myself.’
He was so weak that he had to stay home for months, nursed by his mother.
When he finally returned to the Factory, it was autumn. It was wonderful to
be back; it was just that he didn’t quite know what he should do there. He hid
out in his office, not painting, not making films. The only one of his old
occupations he still enjoyed was taping, but even that was a problem now.
After the shooting he’d developed a terror of being around the sort of people
whose conversation had previously been so entertaining and desirable.
‘What I never came right out and confided to anyone in so many words,’ he
wrote in POPism, ‘was this: I was afraid that without the crazy, druggy
people around jabbering away and doing their insane thing, I’d lose my
creativity. After all, they’d been my total inspiration since ’64, and I didn’t
know if I could make it without them.’
The one thing he did find soothing was listening to his old tapes being
transcribed. Andy found all mechanical noise reassuring – shutters and
flashbulbs, ringtones and buzzers – but his favourite by far was the clickclack of typewriters accompanied by the sound of sequestered voices
released into the air, liberated at last from their dangerous bodies. That
autumn, the Factory typists were working on a, and so he could sit in his
office, glued together by his corset, listening to the manic chatter of Ondine
and Taxi, the swell of those old, beloved voices drifting through the room.
Like SCUM Manifesto, the publication of a would not be a success, either
in terms of sales or reviews. All the same, listening to the tapes roll on,
Warhol finally got the idea for his next creative venture. He’d make a
magazine, entirely comprised of people talking to one another. He called it
Interview, and it has survived right through to the present day, a symphony of
human speech, made by someone who knew exactly how much words cost
and what consequences they can have: how they can start but also stop the
opened organ of the heart.

4
IN LOVING HIM
HALLOWEEN. IT HAD BEEN A bad day, I don’t know why. At seven I got up from
whatever I was or wasn’t doing, ringed my eyes in kohl, put on a black dress
covered in small black sequins, drank down a glass of bourbon and went out
into the night, heading for the parade in the West Village. Cold smoky dark,
walking past the big brownstones, their stoops and sills covered in a garish
litter of pumpkins, skulls and spun white spider webs. I thought it would be
cheering to stand in a crowd, but it wasn’t, not really. Looking at my photos
from that night I think that what I was in search of was a sensation of smear,
of the collapsing boundaries that come with festivity or intoxication. All my
pictures are blurred; they all show a whirl of bright objects colliding in
space. Giant skeletons, giant eyeballs on stalks, a dozen flashbulbs, a
glowing silver suit. A flatbed truck came chugging up Sixth Avenue, bearing
a cotillion of zombies snapping and twitching in unison to Michael Jackson’s
‘Thriller’.
All that evening, I was dogged by the exhausting sense of being too
visible, sticking out like a sore thumb among the coupled and conjoined, the
jaunty, tipsy groups of friends. I bitterly regretted not having bought a mask in
Party City: a cat face or Spider-Man. I wanted to be anonymous, to pass
through the city unseen; not invisible exactly, but concealed, my pained,
anxious, all too declarative face hidden from view, relieved from the burden
of needing to look unconcerned, or worse, appealing.
What is it about masks and loneliness? The obvious answer is that they
offer relief from exposure, from the burden of being seen – what is described
in the German as Maskenfreiheit, the freedom conveyed by masks. To refuse
scrutiny is to dodge the possibility of rejection, though also the possibility of
acceptance, the balm of love. This is what makes masks so poignant as well
as so uncanny, sinister, unnerving. Think of the Phantom of the Opera or the
Man in the Iron Mask; or Michael Jackson himself, for that matter, his
exquisite face half-concealed by a black or white surgical veil that begs the
question of whether he is the victim or perpetrator of his own disfigurement.
Masks amplify the way in which skin is a barrier or wall, acting as a
marker of separation, singularity, distance. They are protective, yes, but a
masked face is also frightening. What lies behind it? Something monstrous,
something awful beyond bearing. We’re known by our faces; they reveal our
intentions and betray our emotional weather. All those horror films that
feature masked killers – Texas Chainsaw Massacre, Silence of the Lambs,
Halloween – play on a terror of facelessness, of not being able to make an
appeal, to speak as we say face to face, mortal to mortal.
These films often also articulate the deforming, dehumanising, monstermaking horror our culture considers loneliness to be. Here donning the mask
signifies a definitive rejection of the human state, a prelude to wreaking
revenge on the community, the mass, the excluding group. (The same message
delivered in a lighter envelope week after week on Scooby-Doo: the ghoul’s
mask plucked from the villain to reveal the lonely caretaker, the cantankerous
isolate who can’t bear those insufferably sunny, agglomerate kids.)
Masks also beg the question of the public self: the set, frozen features of
politeness and conformity, behind which real desires writhe and twist.
Maintaining a surface, pretending to be someone you are not, living in the
closet: these imperatives breed a gangrenous sense of being unknown, of
going unregarded. And then of course there are masks as a cover for illegal
or deviant activity, and being unmasked, and being surrounded by a masked
mob, like the terrifyingly pastoral animal heads worn by the villagers in The
Wicker Man, or the zombie army in ‘Thriller’, a video I’d found
unwatchably frightening as a child.
Many of these currents circulate through one of the most striking masked
images I’ve ever seen, made by an artist who in the 1980s lived a block
away from my apartment on East 2nd. It’s a black and white photograph of a
man standing outside the 7th Avenue exit of the Times Square subway. He’s
wearing a sleeveless denim jacket, a white t-shirt and a paper mask of the
French poet Arthur Rimbaud, a life-sized Xerox of the famous portrait on the
cover of Illuminations. Behind him a guy with an Afro is jaywalking in a
billowing white shirt and flared black pants. The camera has caught him midbounce, one shoe still in the air. Both sides of the street are lined with big
old-timey cars and cinemas. MOONRAKER is on at the New Amsterdam,
AMITYVILLE HORROR at the Harris, while the sign at the Victory, just
above Rimbaud’s head, promises in big black letters RATED X.
The picture was taken in 1979, when New York was passing through one
of its periodic phases of decline. Rimbaud is standing at the sleazy epicentre
of the city: on the Deuce, the old name for that stretch of 42nd Street that runs
between 6th and 8th Avenue – standing, in fact, right where Valerie Solanas
was arrested eleven years before. The street was wild even then, but by the
1970s New York was on the verge of bankruptcy and Times Square was
overrun by violence and crime, a teeming haven for prostitutes, dealers,
muggers and pimps. The Beaux Arts theatres – the same places Hopper had
celebrated in New York Movie, his famous painting of a uniformed movie
attendant slouched against a wall – had been transformed into porn cinemas
and cruising grounds, the old economy of covert glances and desirable
images growing more explicit, more flagrant by the day.
What better place for Rimbaud, who was drawn to crime and squalor, who
spilled his talent liberally and fast, burning through the precincts of
nineteenth-century Paris like a comet? He looks entirely at home there, his
paper face expressionless, the gutter glinting at his feet. In other images from
the series, which is entitled Arthur Rimbaud in New York, he shoots heroin,
rides the subway, masturbates in bed, eats in a diner, poses with carcasses at
a slaughterhouse and wanders through the wreckage of the Hudson piers,
lounging with outstretched arms in front of a wall spray-painted with the
words THE SILENCE OF MARCEL DUCHAMP IS OVERRATED.
No matter how large the crowd through which he moves, Rimbaud is
always on his own; always unlike the people who surround him. Sometimes
he’s looking for sex, or maybe to sell himself, slouching outside the Port
Authority bus terminal, where the hustlers go to display their wares.
Sometimes he even has companions, like the one of him standing at night with
two laughing homeless men, their arms slung around each other’s shoulders,
one of them holding a toy pistol, a trashcan fire burning at their feet. All the
same, the mask marks him out as separate: a wanderer or voyeur, unable or
unwilling to display his real face.
The Rimbaud series was conceived, orchestrated and shot in its entirety by
David Wojnarowicz (generally pronounced Wonna-row-vich), a then entirely
unknown twenty-four-year-old New Yorker who would in a few years
become one of the stars of the East Village art scene, alongside
contemporaries like Jean-Michel Basquiat, Keith Haring, Nan Goldin and
Kiki Smith. His work, which includes paintings, installations, photography,
music, films, books and performances, turns on issues of connection and
aloneness, focusing in particular on how an individual can survive within an
antagonistic society, a society that might plausibly want them dead rather than
tolerate their existence. It’s passionately in favour of diversity; acutely aware
of how isolating a homogeneous world can be.
The Rimbaud images are often mistaken for self-portraits, but in fact
Wojnarowicz stayed behind the camera, using multiple friends and lovers to
play the part of mask-wearer. Nonetheless, the work is deeply personal,
albeit in a complicated way. The figure of Rimbaud served as a kind of
stand-in or proxy for the artist, inserted into places that mattered to David,
places where he’d been or which still exerted a power over him. In an
interview carried out much later, he talked about the project and its origins,
saying: ‘I’ve periodically found myself in situations that felt desperate and,
in those moments, I’d feel that I needed to make certain things . . . I had
Rimbaud come through a vague biographical outline of what my past had
been – the places I had hung out in as a kid, the places I starved in or haunted
on some level.’
He wasn’t kidding about the desperate situations. Violence ran through his
childhood like a fire, gutting and hollowing, leaving its mark. The story of
Wojnarowicz’s life is emphatically a story about masks: why you might need
them, why you might mistrust them, why they might be necessary for survival;
also toxic, also unbearable.
He was born on 14 September 1954 in Red Bank, New Jersey. His first
memory wasn’t of humans at all, but of horseshoe crabs crawling in the sand,
the sort of image his dreamy, collaged films are filled with. His mother was
very young, and his father was a merchant seaman, an alcoholic with a
vicious temper. The marriage ran into trouble almost as soon as it began, and
when David was two years old Ed and Dolores got divorced. For a while he
and his siblings – a brother and sister, both older – were left in a boarding
house, where they were physically abused: beaten; made to stand to attention
or woken in the night and forced to take cold showers. Their mother had
custody, but when David was around four the children were kidnapped by
their father, who left them on a chicken farm run by an aunt and uncle before
taking them to live with his new wife in the suburbs of New Jersey, in what
David later described as The Universe of the Neatly Clipped Lawn – a place
where physical and psychic violence against women, gay people and
children could be carried out without repercussions.
‘In my home,’ he wrote in his memoir, Close to the Knives, ‘one could not
laugh, one could not express boredom, one could not cry, one could not play,
one could not explore, one could not engage in any activity that showed
development or growth that was independent.’ Ed was away at sea for weeks
at a time, but when he was home he terrorised the children. David was
beaten with dog leashes and two-by-fours, and once saw his sister being
slammed on the sidewalk until brown liquid oozed from her ears, while
neighbours pruned their gardens and mowed their lawns.
Fear contaminates everything. He remembered playing chicken with the
trucks that came over the hill by his house, remembered being left in a
shopping centre with his siblings just before Christmas, walking miles home
in the snow with two turtles in a takeout box. Often he’d spend whole days
hiding in the woods, looking for bugs and snakes, an activity he never tired
of, even as a grown man.
At some point in the early 1960s he was sent to Catholic school and
around that time his father became crueller, more uncontrolled. Once he
killed and cooked David’s pet rabbit, telling the kids they were eating New
York strip. Another time, after a beating, he asked David to play with his
penis. When David refused he dropped the subject, though the beating
continued. Bad dreams in those days, recurring night images of tidal waves
and tornadoes. A better one too, which visited periodically right to the end.
In it, he was walking along a dirt road to a pond. He’d dive in, swimming
beneath the surface. There was a cave at the bottom, and he’d duck down into
it, going deeper and deeper, lungs bursting, until at the last possible moment
he’d emerge into a chamber filled with stalactites and stalagmites, luminous
in the dark.
In the mid-1960s the Wojnarowicz children found their mother by looking
up her name in a Manhattan phone book: Dolores Voyna. They snuck away
for a day visit, spending a few hours with her in the Museum of Modern Art.
It was there, wandering through the galleries, that David decided to become
an artist. More visits were sanctioned, but then out of nowhere Ed decided he
was done with the kids he’d fought so hard to get, dumping all three of them
on Dolores. It should have been a relief, but her apartment in Hell’s Kitchen
was tiny and she was unused to playing the part of mother, especially to three
by now deeply troubled children. She didn’t even like them using the word
mom, and though she was warm and expressive, it soon transpired that she
was also manipulative, erratic and unstable.
New York City: the smell of dog shit and rotting garbage. Rats in the
cinema, eating your popcorn. All of a sudden sex was everywhere. Men kept
trying to pick David up, kept offering him money. He had a dream about
being naked in a stream, ejaculating into water, and after that he said yes to
one of the guys, going with him to his apartment on Central Park, though he
insisted on travelling separately, by bus. He had sex with the son of one of
his mother’s friends and then thought frantically about killing him, almost
hysterical with panic about his family finding out and sending him to an
asylum, where he’d doubtless be given electric shock therapy. Could it be
seen on his face: what he’d done, and worse, how much he’d liked it? It
wasn’t a good time to be discovering you were queer, a year or two before
the Stonewall riots kicked the gay liberation movement into life. He went to
the local library to try and find out what a fag was. The information was
limited, distorted, depressing; a litany of sissies and inverts, self-harm and
suicide.
By fifteen he was regularly turning ten-dollar tricks in Times Square. He
loved the energy of the place, though he barely ever visited without getting
shoved around or having his pockets picked. The slam of the city, the assault
of neon and electric light, the roiling mass of people, made up of mixed
elements: sailors, tourists, cops, hookers, hustlers and dealers. He wandered
through the crowds, fascinated; a skinny boy with big teeth and glasses, his
ribs sticking out. At the same time he was drawn to quieter, more inward
pursuits. He liked to draw, liked going to the movies on his own or
wandering round the dioramas in the Natural History Museum; the dusty
smell, the long unpopulated corridors.
A funny habit from those days: hanging by his fingers from the window
ledge of his bedroom, his whole weight suspended seven storeys above 8th
Avenue. Testing out the limits of his body, maybe, or maybe putting himself at
risk as a way of overriding bad feelings, giving himself a series of selfadministered shocks, ‘testing testing testing how do I control this how much
control do I have how much strength do I have’. He was thinking about
suicide all the time, thinking about suicide and stealing snakes from pet
stores, liberating them in the park. Sometimes he’d ride the bus to New
Jersey and wade into lakes fully dressed, the only time he ever washed (later,
he remembered his jeans being so dirty that he could see the reflection of his
face when he bent over). Feeling everything around him, all the architectural
structures – school, home, family – crumbling, falling apart, the scaffolding
struck.
Things came to a head at around the age of seventeen, when he was either
thrown out or ran away for good from the apartment in Hell’s Kitchen.
Dolores had already kicked out both his siblings, after escalating tension,
escalating rows. Now David too was on his own, freefalling out of society,
crash-landing, as Valerie Solanas had before him, in the slippery, perilous
world of the streets.
Time blurred, getting shifty, no longer signifying in the same way. He was
almost starving for one thing, eventually getting so emaciated and filthy that
he couldn’t pick up a decent trick, settling instead for men who often beat him
up or ripped him off. A walking skeleton, at the mercy of any vicious creep.
He was so malnourished his gums poured with blood every time he smoked a
cigarette. In Fire in the Belly, Cynthia Carr’s extraordinary Wojnarowicz
biography, there’s a story about him ending up in hospital alone, in agony
because of his rotting teeth, after persuading Dolores to lend him her
Medicaid card. Push it under the door when you’re done, she’d said. She’d
be on holiday in Barbados.
He never got enough sleep in those days. Sometimes he’d spend the night
on the roof of a building, curled against the heating vents, and in the morning
would wake covered in soot, his eyes and mouth and nose filled with a
choking black dust. The same boy, that is, who’d written in his diary a few
months earlier of how frightened he was to spend a night alone. Stealing
clothes, stealing reptiles from pet shops. Staying in halfway houses, or with a
group of transvestites down by the Hudson River, drifting with them between
welfare hotels and wretched apartments. Sleeping in boiler rooms or
abandoned cars. Sometimes he was raped or drugged by the men who offered
him money, but others were kind to him, especially a lawyer called Syd, who
used to take him home and feed him, just treat him like a regular, lovable
human being.
Eventually, in 1973, he managed to prise himself off the streets. His sister
offered him a bed in her apartment, and slowly he worked his way back into
something closer to a regular existence: a roof over his head, at any rate,
even if things like steady work and steady money weren’t exactly easy to
secure. In fact, in a covering essay for the book Rimbaud in New York,
David’s boyfriend Tom Rauffenbart remembered that when they first met,
David, who had by then become a successful artist, didn’t own a real bed
and seemed to be subsisting on not much more than coffee and cigarettes. ‘I
did what I could to change that,’ he added, ‘but essentially David was a
loner. Although he knew many people, he preferred to relate to them one-toone. Everyone knew a slightly different David.’
You don’t emerge from a childhood like that without baggage, without a
sense of toxic burdens, which have to be somehow concealed or carried or
otherwise disposed of. First there was the legacy of all that abuse and
neglect, the feelings of worthlessness and shame and rage, the sense of
difference, of being somehow inferior or marked out. Anger, in particular,
and bedded underneath it a deep, maybe unquenchable sense of being
unlovable.
As if that wasn’t bad enough, there was also the shame of having been on
the streets at all, the worry that people would know he’d been a hustler, and
judge him for it. He found himself plagued throughout his early twenties by
an inability to speak, to acknowledge verbally what he’d been through, the
experiences that he’d had. ‘There was no way I could relate them to anybody
in a room full of people at any party anywhere,’ he told his friend Keith
Davis in a taped conversation years later. ‘The sense of carrying experiences
on my shoulder, where I could sit there and look at people and realize there
was just no frame of reference that was similar to theirs.’ And again in Close
to the Knives: ‘I could barely speak when in the company of other people.
There was never a point in conversations at work, parties or gatherings when
I could reveal what I’d seen.’
This sense of separation, of being profoundly isolated by his past, was
intensified by the old anxiety about sexuality. It had been agonising, growing
up in a world in which what he desired to do with his body was considered
disgusting, tragic, deviant, deranged. He came out properly in San Francisco
in the mid-1970s, on a brief stint away from Manhattan. Living openly for the
first time as a gay man, he immediately felt happier, freer and healthier than
he ever had before. At the same time he realised forcibly the weight of the
antagonism stacked against him, the hatred lurking everywhere for a man who
loved men and was not ashamed of the fact. ‘My queerness,’ he wrote in a
biographical summary titled ‘Dateline’, ‘was a wedge that was slowly
separating me from a sick society.’
In Close to the Knives, he recalled how it had felt as a child to hear other
kids screaming FAGGOT! at one another, how ‘the sound of it resonated in
my shoes, that instant solitude, that breathing glass wall no one else saw’.
Reading that sentence made me realise how much of his account reminded me
viscerally of scenes from my own life; reminded me, in fact, of the precise
sources of my isolation, my sense of difference. Alcoholism, homophobia,
the suburbs, the Catholic church. People leaving, people drinking too much,
people losing control. I hadn’t experienced anything like the violence of
David’s childhood, but I knew what it was like to feel unsafe, to pass through
chaotic and frightening scenes; to have to find a way of coping with a
simmering sense of fear and rage. My mother was gay, deep in the closet. In
the 1980s she was outed and we ended up running away from the village I’d
lived in all my life, shuttling between houses on the south coast as her
partner’s alcoholism grew more advanced.
This was the era of Section 28, when homophobia was enshrined in
Britain’s legislation, let alone in any passing bigot’s mind, when teachers
could not legally promote ‘the acceptability of homosexuality as a pretended
family relationship’. I’d always found straight society isolating and
potentially dangerous. When I read that line in Knives I remembered vividly
the sick feeling that used to come over me at school when other children
talked in their hateful, stupid way about fags and gaylords, compacting and
inflaming my already acute sense of being an alien, of standing outside. It
wasn’t just about my mother. I can see myself then, skinny and pale, dressed
as a boy, completely incapable of handling the social demands of being at a
girls’ school, my own sexuality and sense of gender hopelessly out of kilter
with the options then on offer. If I was anything, I was a gay boy; in the wrong
place, in the wrong body, in the wrong life.
Later, after school, I dropped out altogether, living on protest sites,
squatting in semi-derelict buildings in seaside towns. I can remember
sleeping in a room of junkies, the backyard filled with ten solid feet of
rubbish. Why do you put yourself in unsafe places? Because something in you
feels fundamentally devoid of worth. And how do you break out, reclaim
your right to difference? One of David’s strongest memories of his street
years was periodic nights of rage, in which he and a buddy would get so
choked up with hunger and frustration that they’d walk almost the length of
Manhattan island, smashing the glass in every phone box that they passed.
Sometimes you can change the psychic space, the landscape of the emotions,
by carrying out actions in the physical world. I suppose in a way that’s what
art is, certainly the near-magical art that Wojnarowicz would soon begin to
make, as he turned increasingly from destruction to creation.
This is the context from out of which Rimbaud emerged, the kind of issues
with which it struggles. David began taking the photos in the summer of 1979
with a 35mm camera he’d borrowed from a friend. He’d been experimenting
previously with images shot at the hip, trying to build up a body of work that
would testify to the world in which he’d lived, the experiences he still found
it impossible to articulate in speech. He was beginning to understand that art
might be a way for him to bear witness, to reveal ‘things I’d always felt
pressured to keep hidden’. He wanted to make images that somehow told the
truth, that acknowledged the people who were left out of history or otherwise
disenfranchised, excluded from the record.
There was something very powerful about going back to his old stamping
grounds as an adult and inserting Rimbaud into the landscape of his
childhood, having him stand impassively by the painted barrier where David
used to lean as a boy, waiting for ageing men to buy his skinny, unkempt
body. Another self? A sexy, nerveless simulacrum, toughened by experience.
Was it a figure he could enter (as later, in his diary: ‘I want to create a myth
that I can one day become’), or a way of retroactively protecting the goofy,
vulnerable little boy that he’d once been? Hard to imagine his Rimbaud being
raped or forced to do anything against its will.
Either way, he was using the camera to illuminate an underground world,
pouring light into the hidden places of the city, the hustling grounds, the
locations where a struggling kid could make a buck or scrounge a meal.
Taking a photograph is an act of possession, a way of making something
visible while simultaneously freezing it in place, locking it in time. But what
of the mood of the pictures, the loneliness that rolls off them in waves,
radiating from Rimbaud’s uncanny, expressionless figure? It seemed to me
that they testified not just to a way of life, but also to the experience of
feeling different, cut off, incapable of confessing real feelings: imprisoned, in
short, as well as liberated by a mask.
The more I looked at them, the more they tallied with the feelings that
David was simultaneously exploring in his diaries (‘I found myself walking
the streets alone most times, being home alone, and gradually falling into a
state of very little communication, all because of the desire to preserve my
own sense of life and living’). They express a sense of isolation, a conflict
between the desire to make contact, to reach beyond the prison of the self,
and to hide, to walk away, to disappear. Something sad about them, despite
the toughness, the raw sexuality; a question not yet resolved. As Tom
Rauffenbart put it in his essay at the beginning of the Rimbaud book:
‘Although the Rimbaud mask presents a blank, unchanging face, it seems to
always be watching and absorbing sights and experiences. Yet in the end, it
remains alone.’
*
I went back to England briefly, and when I returned I began frequenting the
Wojnarowicz archive at Fales Library, which is housed inside the big Bobst
Library at New York University, right opposite Hopper’s old studio in
Washington Square. It was just the right distance for a walk and I took a
different route each day, crisscrossing the East Village, sometimes dawdling
past the little hidden cemetery on East 2nd and sometimes lingering to read
the posters outside La Mama and Joe’s Pub. It was winter now, the sky bright
blue, buckets of copper-coloured chrysanthemums outside the bodegas.
At the library I’d show my pass and take the elevator to the third floor,
deposit my illegal pens in a locker and borrow a pencil to fill out a request
sheet. Series I, Journals. Series VIII, Audio. Series IX, Photographs. Series
XIII, Objects. Week by week, I worked my way through all of it, unpacking
dozens of boxes of the Halloween masks and dollar toys David loved. A red
plastic cowboy. A tin ambulance. A devil doll, a Frankenstein. I leafed
through diaries, sometimes dislodging old menus and receipts, and watched
scratchy VHS tapes of old summer vacations: David swimming in a lake,
repeatedly dunking his face beneath the surface as nets of light broke across
his chest.
In the evenings, as I walked home past Plantworks or the old Grace
Church on Broadway, my head would be filled with images that had surfaced
long ago, in the looking glass of someone else’s mind. A man shooting heroin
in an abandoned pier, tumbling out of consciousness, limp and lovely as a
Pietà, spit bubbling from his lips. Dreams of fucking. Dreams of horses.
Dreams of dying tarantulas. Dreams of snakes.
So much of Wojnarowicz’s life was spent trying to escape solitary
confinement of one kind or another, to figure a way out of the prison of the
self. There were two things he did, two escape routes that he took, both
physical, both risky. Art and sex: the act of making images and the act of
making love. Sex is everywhere in David’s work, one of the animating forces
of his life. It was central among the things he felt driven to write about and
depict, to wrestle free from the silence in which he’d felt entrapped as a boy.
At the same time, the act itself was also a way – the best way, maybe – of
reaching beyond himself, of expressing his feelings via the secret, taboo
language of the body. Just as making art allowed him to communicate his
private experience, undoing the paralysing spells of speechlessness, so too
sex was a way of making contact, of revealing the wordless, unspeakable
things he kept concealed deep inside himself.
During the late 1970s and early 1980s, the same period in which he was
making the Rimbaud images, he went out cruising all the time, looking for
what some people would describe as casual sex – anonymous and with
strangers – but which David almost always both named and viewed as lovemaking. He recorded these encounters in his diaries and later in his
published writing in graphic detail, in both senses of the word: electrically
visual, electrically explicit. He also logged his own responses, charting the
subtle landscape of the emotions, the instances of longing or paralysing fear.
Almost every night he went out walking, down to the Brooklyn Promenade
or over the abandoned West Side Highway to the Chelsea piers, a place that
captured both his erotic and creative imagination for many years. The piers
ran along the Hudson from Christopher Street to 14th Street and had been
rotting ever since the decline of shipping back in the 1960s. As the
commercial lines moved their traffic to Brooklyn and New Jersey, most of
the Chelsea piers were closed for business and at least three were virtually
destroyed by fires. By the middle of the 1970s, the city could no longer
afford either to secure or destroy these immense, decaying buildings. Some
were squatted by homeless people, who built camps inside the old goods
sheds and baggage halls, and others were adopted by gay men as cruising
grounds. It was a landscape of decay, of ruined grandeur reclaimed by a
dissident, hedonistic population.
David recounted what he saw and did there with an extraordinary mixture
of tenderness and brutality. On the one hand, the place was an outdoor
whorehouse, reeking of piss and shit, where people were regularly murdered
and where he once encountered a screaming man with blood pouring from his
face who said a stranger in a navy windcheater had knifed him in an empty
room. On the other hand, it was a world without inhibitions, where people
whose sexuality was elsewhere the subject of intense hostility could find an
absolute freedom of encounter and where moments of unexpected intimacy
sometimes bloomed amongst the rubble.
In his diaries, he described prowling the Beaux-Arts departure halls at
night or during storms. They were vast as football fields, their walls
damaged by fire, their floors and ceilings full of holes, through which you
could see the river moving, sometimes silver and sometimes a sludgy, toxic
brown. He’d sit at the end of the pier with a notebook, his feet dangling over
the Hudson, watching the rain falling, the giant illuminated Maxwell House
coffee cup pouring its drips of scarlet neon over the Jersey shore. Sometimes
a man would join him, or he’d follow a figure down passageways and up
flights of stairs into rooms carpeted with grass or filled with boxes of
abandoned papers, where you could catch the scent of salt rising from the
river. ‘So simple,’ he wrote, ‘the appearance of night in a room full of
strangers, the maze of hallways wandered as in films, the fracturing of bodies
from darkness into light, sounds of plane engines easing into the distance.’
Wandering the piers, David rarely encountered the same men twice, though
sometimes he looked for them, half in love with an imagined personality, a
mythic being he’d conjured out of an accent or a single word. This was part
of the pleasure of cruising, the way it allowed him to be sexual and also to
stay separate, to maintain a degree of control.You could be alone in the city,
could relish the way ‘the solitude of two persons passing in opposite
directions creates a personal seclusion’, knowing that places existed where
physical connection was almost assured.
The public nature of what happened on the piers was in itself an antidote
to secrecy and shame. He tried to give people a degree of privacy, but there
was clearly a two-way dance between voyeurism and exhibitionism going
on, part of the pluralistic pleasure of the place. At the same time, the scene
invoked his archivist’s instinct for recording, for getting down what he saw
in words, preserving what might have seemed even then like a transient,
impossible utopia. He took photos, his camera at his hip, and carried a razor
in case of attack. It all came so fast, anyway, a hail of images, a lovely
scrambling assault to the senses. Two men fucking, so hard that one of them
fell to his knees. An upside-down couch, scattered office furniture, the carpet
pooling with water at every step. Kissing a French man with brilliant white
teeth and then staying up all night to make a black and yellow salamander out
of paint and clay, a talismanic beast.
Art and sex, the two things bound together. Sometimes he took a can of
spray-paint, and scrawled odd scenes from his imagination on to the
crumbling walls: stray dreamlike phrases, some by him and some borrowed
from artists he admired. THE SILENCE OF MARCEL DUCHAMP IS
OVERRATED: he’d written that, in homage to Beuys, then sprayed a version
of the Rimbaud face, roughly outlined on a pane of glass. Lines about a
Mexican dogfight, a drawing of a headless figure shooting up. Often he
incorporated his graffiti into the background of the Rimbaud photos, building
up layers of his presence, inscribing himself into the fabric of the place.
He wasn’t by any means the only person to be inspired by the wreckage of
the piers. Artists had been coming there for almost a decade, drawn by the
vast scale of the rooms, the freedom of working without scrutiny or
supervision. In the early 1970s, there’d been a series of avant-garde
happenings, recorded in weirdly beautiful black and white photos. One
shows a man suspended from a loading entrance, dangling from a rope tied to
his foot. He teeters above a great heap of trash, from which a single
Christmas tree protrudes: the Hanged Man in a post-apocalyptic Tarot deck.
The same artist, Gordon Matta-Clark, was also responsible for the most
ambitious artistic intervention on the piers. For Day’s End, he and a team of
helpers carved massive geometric shapes out of the floor and walls and
ceiling of Pier 52 with chainsaws and blowtorches, letting in a torrent of
light and converting the space into what Matta-Clark described as a sun and
water temple, built without consultation or permission.
As for the cruising years, they were also documented by dozens of
photographers, some amateur and some professional, among them Alvin
Baltrop, Frank Hanlon, Leonard Fink, Allen Tannenbaum, Stanley Stellar and
Arthur Tress, as well as Peter Hujar, the man who would become the most
stabilising and important figure in David’s life. With their cameras, they
captured it for posterity: the crowds of naked sunbathers on the dock; the
cavernous rooms with their broken windows and damaged girders; the halfdressed men embracing in the shadows.
Others came to paint. Wandering around Pier 46, exploring the stinking
labyrinth, David encountered the graffiti artist Tava, born Gustav von Will,
who was working on one of his enormous priapic figures, far larger than life.
More of them kept appearing, guardians and witnesses to the embracing
bodies below. A faun in sunglasses, fucking a bearded man on all fours.
Naked muscled torsos with enormous cocks, which David described as
caryatids. Images of sexual freedom, licentiousness and pleasure, shocking in
their rawness, though as David pointed out later, what was really shocking
was that sexuality and the human body were taboo subjects at this late
juncture in time, this ebb-end of a violent, image-saturated century.
*
Reading David’s diaries was like coming up for air after being a long time
underwater. There is no substitute for touch, no substitute for love, but
reading about someone’s else’s commitment to discovering and admitting
their desires was so deeply moving that I sometimes found I was physically
shaking as I read. That winter, the piers took on a life of their own in my
mind. I pored over all the accounts I could find, fascinated by the spaces, the
recklessness of encounter, the freedom and creativity they permitted. They
seemed like an ideal world for someone who was struggling with connection,
in that they combined the possibilities of privacy, anonymity and personal
expression with the ability to reach out, to find a body, to be touched, to have
your doings seen. A utopian, anarchic, sexy version of what the city itself
offers, but unsanitised, permissive rather than restrictive – and queer of
course, not straight.
I knew this was idealistic, only half the story. I’d read plenty of reports
that testified to how dangerous the piers were, and how rejecting and brutal
they could be if you didn’t look the part or know the code, let alone the bleak
consequences that would befall this libidinal haven as AIDS took hold. Still,
the piers as they had been gave my mind a place to wander, outside the
gleaming factory of monogamy, the pressure to cuddle up, to couple off, to go
like Noah’s animals two by two into a permanent container, sealed from the
world. As Solanas bitterly remarked: ‘Our society is not a community but
merely a collection of isolated family units.’
I didn’t want that any more, if in fact I ever had. I didn’t know what I did
want, but maybe what I needed was an expansion of erotic space, an
extension of my sense of what might be possible or acceptable. This is what
reading about the piers was like: it was like those dreams when you push on
the wall of a familiar room in a familiar house, and it gives way, opening on
to a garden or a pool you never knew was there. I always woke from those
dreams flushed with happiness, and it was the same when I read about the
piers, as if each time I thought about them I relinquished a little more of the
shame that almost every sexual body bears.
One of the things I was reading alongside Wojnarowicz was The Motion
of Light in Water, a radically candid memoir about living in the Lower East
Side in the 1960s by the science fiction writer and social critic Samuel
Delany. In it, he described his own nights on the waterfront, ‘a space at a
libidinal saturation impossible to describe to someone who has not known it.
Any number of pornographic filmmakers, gay and straight, have tried to
portray something like it – now for homosexuality, now for heterosexuality –
and failed because what they were trying to show was wild, abandoned,
beyond the edge of control, whereas the actuality of such a situation, with
thirty-five, fifty, a hundred all but strangers is hugely ordered, highly social,
attentive, silent, and grounded in a certain care, if not community.’
In a later book, Times Square Red, Times Square Blue, he returns to this
thought about community in greater detail. Times Square is a memoir-cumpolemic, in which come is the operative word. It chronicles Delany’s
experiences in the Square, and particularly in the porn cinemas of 42nd
Street, like the one that appears with its declarative X in the background of
the Rimbaud photo. Delany went to these cinemas often daily over a period
of thirty years to have sex with multiple strangers, some of whom became
deeply familiar to him, though their relationships rarely transcended the
location.
Delany was writing in the late 1990s, after the gentrification – the literal
Disneyfication, in fact, considering the identity of one of the major investors
– of Times Square; which is to say that he was writing in praise and grief at
what had already been destroyed. In his thoughtful as well as practised
estimation, what had been lost was not just a place to get your rocks off, but
also a zone of contact, and particularly of cross-class and cross-racial
contact - a site that facilitated intimacy, albeit transient, between a diverse
multitude of citizens, some wealthy and some poor, some homeless, some
mentally unsettled, but all soothed by the democratic balm of sex.
His take wasn’t so much nostalgic as utopian: a vision of a lubricated city
of exchange, in which brief, convivial encounters kept satiated those
otherwise nagging and sometimes agonising needs for touch, company,
playfulness, eroticism, physical relief. Furthermore, these interactions in
stalls and balconies and orchestra pits created as a by-product the kind of
weak ties that sociologists believe glue metropolises together, though
admittedly they tend to be thinking of repeat encounters with shopkeepers and
subway clerks, rather than amiable strangers who might give you a hand job
once every three years.
As to whether these places did reduce loneliness, the city itself provided
proof of that. Writing of the systemic closures that came in the 1990s, Delany
regretfully observed: ‘What has happened to Times Square has already made
my life, personally, somewhat more lonely and isolated. I have talked with a
dozen men whose sexual outlet, like many of mine, were centered on that
neighborhood. It is the same for them. We need contact.’
We do. But there was a glitch in this utopia, at least as far I was
concerned. In the context of the cinemas, the piers, citizens meant men, not
women. Once, Delany did bring a female friend with him to the
Metropolitan: a small Hispanic woman who worked as an office temp,
spending her evenings playing guitar and singing in nightclubs in the Village.
Ana was curious about the scene and so she joined Delany for an afternoon,
dressed in boyish clothes, though that didn’t stop a kid muttering fish as she
walked past, or the manager accusing her of being a prostitute. The visit
passed off smoothly enough – plenty of easy-going action on the balcony to
watch – and yet this anecdote reads more queasily than any of the more
graphic encounters elsewhere recorded. What hangs over it, what looms
unsaid, is the threat of what could have happened: the potential violence, the
all too plausible act of rape, the peculiar mix of disgust, objectification and
desire that the female form engenders, particularly when it appears in sexual
contexts.
God I was sick of carrying around a woman’s body, or rather everything
that attaches to it. Maggie Nelson’s stunning The Art of Cruelty had recently
been published and there was a paragraph I’d underscored and ringed in pen,
struck by how well it explained my attraction to the world of the piers. ‘Of
course,’ she wrote, ‘not all “thingness” is created equal, and one has to live
enough of one’s life not as a thing to know the difference.’ In parenthesis, she
added: ‘This may explain, in part, why the meat-making of gay male porn
doesn’t produce the same species of anxiety as that of straight porn: since
men - or white men, at any rate - don’t have the same historical relation to
objectification as do women, their meat-making doesn’t immediately threaten
to come off as cruel redundancy.’
Sometimes you want to be made meat; I mean to surrender to the body, its
hungers, its need for contact, but that doesn’t mean you necessarily want to be
served bloody or braised. And at other times, like Wojnarowicz’s Rimbaud,
you want to cruise, to pass unnoticed, to take your pick of the city’s sights.
This was why I’d been so frantic for a mask at the Halloween parade:
because I didn’t want to be the thing that was looked at, that could be
rejected or disparaged.
I was always walking that winter, up by the Hudson, poking about in the
gentrified remnants of the piers, pushing up past the manicured lawns, with
their population of glossy couples pushing strollers. Here and there, I found
small relics of the past. A set of old wooden pilings, sticking up through the
pewter-coloured water like pins from a cushion. Two fallen stone columns,
carved with wings. Skinny trees, growing out of rock and rubble, locked
gates, layers of graffiti, a poster that read sadly COST WAS HERE.
As I wandered, I kept trying to think of an image of a woman that could act
as a counterpart to Rimbaud in New York: an image of a woman at loose in
the city, free-wheeling, to borrow a term from Valerie Solanas (who had her
own history with the piers and who was through with the whole business,
writing with characteristic bitterness: ‘SCUM gets around . . . they’ve seen
the whole show – every bit of it – the fucking scene, the dyke scene – they’ve
covered the whole waterfront, been under every dock and pier – the peter
pier, the pussy pier . . . you’ve got to go through a lot of sex to get to antisex’).
I hadn’t at the time encountered the artist Emily Roysdon’s wry
photographs of herself re-enacting the Rimbaud images, her face covered by
a paper mask of David Wojnarowicz. Instead, I was looking at pictures of
Greta Garbo, those tough dreamy images of her striding around the city in
men’s shoes and a man’s trench coat, taking no shit from anyone, out solely
for herself. In Grand Hotel, Garbo said she wanted to be alone, that famous
line, but what the real Miss Garbo desired was to be left alone, a very
different thing: as in unbothered, unwatched, unharried. What she longed for
was privacy, the experience of drifting unobserved. The sunglasses, the
newspaper over the face, even the string of aliases – Jane Smith, Gussie
Berger, Joan Gustafsson, Harriet Brown – were ways of avoiding detection,
inhibiting recognition; masks that liberated her from the burden of fame.
For most of the years of her retirement, which began in 1941 at the age of
thirty-six and lasted for almost five whole decades, Garbo lived in an
apartment in the Campanile building on East 54th Street, not far from the
Silver Factory, though considerably more salubrious. Every day she went on
two walks: long meandering strolls that might take her up to the Museum of
Modern Art or the Waldorf; walks for which she shod herself in tan or
chocolate or cream suede Hush Puppies, which I once came across for sale
on an internet auction. Often she went all the way to Washington Square and
back, a loop of six miles, stopping to gaze in the windows of bookstores and
delis, walking aimlessly, walking not as a means but as an end, an ideal
occupation in and of itself.
‘When I stopped working, I preferred other activities, many other
activities,’ she once said. ‘I would rather be outside walking than to sit
inside a theater and watch a picture moving. Walking is my greatest
pleasure.’ And again: ‘Often I just go where the man in front of me is going. I
couldn’t survive here if I didn’t walk. I couldn’t be 24 hours in this
apartment. I get out and look at the human beings.’
This being New York, the human beings tended to ignore her, though Andy
Warhol did confess in his diary in 1985 to passing her in the street and being
unable to resist following for a while, taking sneaky photos as he went. She
was wearing dark glasses and a big coat, her signature accoutrements, and
she went into a Trader Horn store to talk to the counterwoman about TVs.
‘Just the kind of thing she would do,’ Warhol reported. ‘So I took pictures of
her until I thought she would get mad and then I walked downtown.’ He
laughs then, adding ruefully: ‘I was alone, too.’
The internet is full of images of her wandering the city. Garbo with an
umbrella. Garbo in camel-coloured slacks. Garbo in an overcoat, her hands
behind her back. Garbo drifting along Third Avenue, walking calmly
between the cabs. In a copy of Life from 1955, there’s a full-page photograph
of her crossing a street, islanded between four lanes of traffic. She cuts a
strangely Cubist figure, her head and body completely encased in an
enormous black sealskin coat and hat. Only her feet are visible, two skinny
legs in blurry boots. She’s turned disdainfully from the camera, her attention
caught by a gauzy explosion of light at the end of the avenue, into which the
buildings seem to dissolve. ‘A LONELY FORM’, the caption declares:
‘Garbo crosses First Avenue near her New York home on a recent
afternoon.’
It’s an image of refusal, of radical self-possession. But where do these
pictures come from? Most were taken by Garbo’s stalker, the paparazzo Ted
Leyson, who spent the best part of eleven years, from 1979 to 1990, lurking
outside her apartment building. He’d hide, he once explained in an interview,
and she’d come out of her front door and look around. Once she was certain
she was alone, she’d relax, and then he could sneak after her, ducking from
doorway to doorway, ready to snap her out of solitude.
In some of these images you can tell that she’s spotted him, whipping a
tissue to her mouth to spoil the value of his picture. Candids, they called
them, a word that once meant pure, fair, sincere, free from malice. It was
Leyson who bagged the final photograph, the last before she died. He shot it
through the window of the car that was taking her to hospital, her long silver
hair down around her shoulders, one veined hand covering the lower portion
of her face. She’s looking at him through tinted glasses, her expression a
queasy combination of fear, scorn and resignation; a gaze that should by
rights have cracked the lens.
In two separate interviews, Leyson explained his behaviour as an act of
love. ‘That’s how I express myself – in a strange way – express my regard
and admiration for Miss Garbo. It’s an overwhelming desire on my part,
something I cannot control. It became obsessive,’ he told CBS’s Connie
Chung in 1990. To Garbo’s biographer Barry Paris he added in 1992: ‘I
admire and love her very much. If I caused her any pain, I’m sorry, but I think
I did something for her or for posterity. I spent ten years of my life with her
— I’m the other “man who shot Garbo”, after Clarence Bull.’
I don’t want to moralise about desire, be it scopophilia or any other kind. I
don’t want to moralise about what pleases people or what they do in their
private lives, as long as it doesn’t cause harm to others. That said, Leyson’s
pictures are symptomatic of a kind of gaze that whether given or withheld is
dehumanising, a meat-making of a profoundly unliberating kind.
All women are subject to that gaze, subject to having it applied or
withheld. I’d been brought up by lesbians, I hadn’t been indoctrinated in
anything, but lately I’d begun to feel almost cowed by its power. If I was to
itemise my loneliness, to categorise its component parts, I would have to
admit that some of it at least was to do with anxieties around appearance,
about being found insufficiently desirable, and that lodged more deeply
beneath that was the growing acknowledgement that in addition to never
being able to quite escape the expectations of gender, I was not at all
comfortable in the gender box to which I’d been assigned.
Was it that the box was too small, with its preposterous expectations of
what women are, or was it that I didn’t fit? Fish. I’d never been comfortable
with the demands of femininity, had always felt more like a boy, a gay boy,
that I inhabited a gender position somewhere between the binaries of male
and female, some impossible other, some impossible both. Trans, I was
starting to realise, which isn’t to say I was transitioning from one thing to
another, but rather that I inhabited a space in the centre, which didn’t exist,
except there I was.
That winter, I kept watching Hitchcock’s Vertigo, a film that is all about
masks and femininity and sexual desire. If reading about the piers expanded
my sense of possibility about sex, then watching Vertigo was a way of
repeatedly alerting myself to the danger of conventional gender roles. Its
subject is objectification and the way it breeds loneliness, amplifying rather
than closing the gap between people, creating a dangerous abyss – the very
chasm, in fact, into which James Stewart as police detective Scottie
Ferguson finds himself tumbling, knocked off his feet by craving for a woman
who even when alive is more enigma or absence than corporeal, sweating
presence.
The most disturbing section takes place after Scottie’s breakdown, which
itself follows on the heels of his lover Madeleine’s suicide. Wandering the
precipitous streets of San Francisco, he happens upon Judy, a chubby
brunette in a Kelly green sweater who bears a passing resemblance to his
lost love, though she possesses none of Madeleine’s frosty hauteur or her
passivity, her near-catatonic withdrawal from life.
In a grim reworking of the transformations effected in My Fair Lady and
Pretty Woman, he takes this brash, fleshy, vulgar girl to Ransohoff’s
department store and makes her try on suit after suit until he finds the exact
replica of Madeleine’s immaculate smokegrey. ‘Scottie, what are you
doing?’ Judy says. ‘You’re looking for the suit that she wore, for me. You
want me to be dressed like her . . . No, I won’t do it!’ And she runs to the
corner of the room and stands there like a child being punished, her head
bowed, her hands clasped behind her back, her face turned to the wall. ‘No, I
don’t want any clothes, I don’t want anything, I just want to get out of here,’
she whimpers, and he jerks her arm, saying: ‘Judy, do this for me.’ I watched
that scene again and again, wanting to drain it of its power. It’s the spectacle
of a woman being forced to participate in the perpetual, harrowing, nonconsensual beauty pageant of femininity, of being made to confront her status
as an object that might or might not be deemed acceptable, capable of
arousing the eye.
In the next scene, in a shoe shop, Judy is expressionless. She’s absented
herself, withdrawing from that place of siege, her body. Later, Scottie drops
her off at a hairdresser and goes home to her hotel, where he fiddles with a
newspaper, in a state of agonising impatience. She comes towards him along
a corridor, white-blonde now, but with her hair still down around her
shoulders. ‘It should be back from your face and pinned back,’ he says
furiously. ‘I told them that, I told you that.’ She tries once again to check him
and then capitulates, going into the bathroom to complete the final episode of
her transformation.
Scottie walks to the window. Outside, behind net curtains, light is leaking
from a neon sign, drenching the room with icy green — the Hopper colour,
the colour of urban alienation, inimical to human connection; maybe even to
human life. Then Judy-as-Madeleine emerges, and walks towards him, a
perfect copy of a copy. They kiss and as the camera circles around them she
swoons backward until it seems that he’s embracing a dead body, a
prefiguration of what will shortly come to pass.
That embrace is one of the loneliest things I’ve ever seen, though it’s hard
to tell who’s worse off: the man who can only love a hologram, a figment, or
the woman who can only be loved by dressing up as someone else —
someone who barely exists at all, who is travelling from the moment we first
see her towards death. Never mind meat-making: this is corpse-making,
objectification taken to its logical extreme.
*
There are better ways of looking at bodies. One of the best antidotes I found,
a corrective to Hitchcock’s necrophilia and Leyson’s stolen images of a
beautiful stranger, was the work of the photographer Nan Goldin, one of
David Wojnarowicz’s closest friends. In her portraits of friends and lovers,
the boundaries between bodies, sexualities, genders seem magically to
dissolve. This is especially true of her constantly re-edited work The Ballad
of Sexual Dependency, which she began during the 1970s while living in
Boston and continued after her move to New York City in 1978.
These images are almost painfully intimate. ‘The instant of photographing,
instead of creating distance, is a moment of clarity and emotional connection
for me,’ Goldin writes in the introduction to the Aperture edition of Ballad.
‘There is a popular notion that the photographer is by nature a voyeur, the last
one invited to the party. But I’m not crashing; this is my party. This is my
family, my history.’
It’s striking, the difference between observer and participant. What
Goldin’s photographs show are beloved human bodies, some of which she’s
known since her teens, regarded with an unaffected tenderness. Many of her
images document scenes of decadence – the wild and wasted party-going, the
drugs, the baroque outfits. Others are quieter, more gentle. Two men kissing.
A boy lying in the milky waters of a bath. A woman’s hand on a man’s bare
back. A couple in bed, on striped sheets, the paleness of their skin
emphasized by the lacy white negligées both are wearing.
Naked flesh is everywhere in Goldin’s work, sometimes bruised or
sweating, the near-translucent white of the professionally nocturnal. Bodies
sleeping, bodies fucking, bodies embracing, estranged bodies, battered
bodies, bodies bent on getting high. Her subjects, identified by first names
only, are often half-dressed, stripping out of or climbing into clothes,
washing or painting a face on in the mirror. Her work is fascinated by people
in the act of transition, passing between one thing and another, adapting and
refashioning themselves by way of lipstick, lashes, gold lamé, piles of teased
hair.
Goldin has explicitly said that she doesn’t believe in a single, revelatory
portrait of a person, but aims instead to capture a swirl of identities over
time. Her people pass through moods, outfits, lovers, states of intoxication.
Forget the clunky opposition between masked and authentic selves. Instead
there’s fluidity, perpetual transition. Many of her subjects, especially early
on, were drag queens. She captures the process of transformation, the
beautiful boys turning themselves into what she once described as a ‘third
gender, that made more sense than either of the other two’. Sexual desire is
likewise fluid, a matter of connection rather than category. A relief, this nonbinary domain, where playing with appearance doesn’t automatically
necessitate Vertigo’s toxic self-extinguishment, but is instead an act of
discovery and expression.
That isn’t to say that the portraits shy away from showing failures of
intimacy: glitches and hiccups, moments of ambivalence or unravelling ties.
The subject of Ballad is explicitly sexual relationships. As a body of work it
traverses the poles of connection and isolation, capturing people as they drift
together and apart; moving on the unsteady tides of love. Some sequences –
‘Lonely Boys’, maybe, or ‘Wild Women Don’t Get the Blues’ or ‘Casta
Diva’ — show individuals in states of solitude and longing, lounging on beds
or gazing through windows, that classic Hopperesque image of the person in
a state of paucity and enclosure. The beautiful Dieter with the tulips, its
powdery grey light, the papery striped flowers, the softness of his face.
Tough Sharon, hand thrust into the waistband of her blue jeans, a little square
of plaster stuck on to her jaw. Or Brian, lying on the middle one of three
double beds in a dingy, barely furnished hotel room in Merida, Mexico,
1982.
Others plunge to the opposite extreme, showing scenes of contact, even
congress. A naked boy and a nearly naked girl kissing on a stained mattress
on the floor in a New York apartment, their torsos pressed together, their
slender legs entwined, one delicate foot cupped upwards, exposing a filthy
sole. Or Nan herself in purple ankle boots and maroon socks, her pale legs
bare, straddling her lover’s chest, his hands just grazing the edge of
translucent black knickers. The loveliness of touch, the rush of contact, the
high of simply embracing, like Bruce and French Chris on a towel scattered
with stars on the beach at Fire Island.
But if sex is a cure for isolation, it is also a source of alienation in its own
right, capable of igniting precisely the dangerous forces that swept Scottie off
his feet in Vertigo. Possessiveness, jealousy, obsession; an inability to
tolerate rejection, ambivalence or loss. The most famous image in Ballad is
a self-portrait of Goldin after her then-boyfriend battered her so badly that
she was almost blinded. Her face is bruised and swollen, smashed around
the eyes, the skin discoloured to a ruddy purple. Her right iris is clear but the
left is suffused with blood, the same scarlet as her painted lips. She stares
into the camera, damaged eye to eye, not so much letting herself be seen as
willing herself to look, conducting her own act of remembrance, adding
herself to the archive of what goes on between human bodies.
This desire to show what really happened, no matter how shocking, had its
roots in childhood experience. Like Wojnarowicz, whom she first met when
they were both living in the East Village, Goldin grew up in the suburbs,
amidst a climate of silence and denial. When she was eleven, her eighteenyear-old sister killed herself, lying down on a train track outside Washington
D.C. ‘I saw the role that her sexuality and its repression played in her
destruction,’ she wrote. ‘Because of the times, the early sixties, women who
were angry and sexual were frightening, outside the range of acceptable
behaviour, beyond control.’
Like Wojnarowicz, she used photography as an act of resistance. In an
afterword to Ballad written in 2012, she declared: ‘I decided as a young girl
I was going to leave a record of my life and experience that no one could
rewrite or deny.’ It wasn’t enough just to take the photos; they also had to be
seen, shown back to their subjects. On Twitter, of all places, I’d once come
across a handwritten, Xeroxed flier, advertising one of the first of the
periodic slideshows she organised of Ballad: 10 p.m. on a May night at
8BC, a club that opened in 1983 in the basement of an old farmhouse, back
when the East Village was almost derelict, block after block burned out or
converted into shooting galleries.
In 1990, Interview published a conversation between Goldin and
Wojnarowicz, one of the wide-ranging, intimate exchanges between artists
that Andy Warhol had envisaged when he first dreamt up the magazine, two
decades before. It opens with them in a café in the Lower East Side, joking
around over the size of their calamari and struck to discover their birthdays
are only a day apart. They talk about their work, discussing anger and
violence, sexual desire and their shared wish to leave a record.
Close to the Knives had only recently been published, and towards the end
of their conversation Goldin asks David what he’d most like his work to
achieve. ‘I want to make somebody feel less alienated – that’s the most
meaningful thing to me,’ he says. ‘I think part of what informs this book is the
pain of having grown up for years and years believing I was from another
planet.’ A minute later, he adds, ‘We can all affect each other, by being open
enough to make each other feel less alienated.’
This sums up exactly how I felt about his work. It was the rawness and
vulnerability of his expression that proved so healing to my own feelings of
isolation: the willingness to admit to failure or grief, to let himself be
touched, to acknowledge desire, anger, pain, to be emotionally alive. His
self-exposure was in itself a cure for loneliness, dissolving the sense of
difference that comes when one believes one’s feelings or desires to be
uniquely shameful.
In all his writing there is a stepping back and forth between different kinds
of material, some very dark and full of disorder, but containing always
astonishing spaces of lightness, loveliness, strangeness. He possessed an
openness that was in itself beautiful, though he sometimes wondered if he
was only capable of reproducing the ugliness he’d seen.
Then too there was his sense of solidarity, his commitment to and interest
in people who were different, who stood outside the norm. ‘I always
consider myself either anonymous or odd looking,’ he once wrote, ‘and there
is an unspoken bond between people in the world that don’t fit in or are not
attractive in the general societal sense.’ Almost all the sexual encounters that
he records — hundreds, if not more — attest to an extraordinary tenderness
towards other people’s bodies and desires, their weirdnesses, the things they
want to do. The only time he sounds truly hostile is when coercion or cruelty
of some kind is involved.
If I had to pick a single paragraph, it would be this one, from Close to the
Knives, about an encounter he had on the pier.
In loving him, I saw men encouraging each other to lay down their arms. In
loving him, I saw small-town laborers creating excavations that other men
spend their lives trying to fill. In loving him, I saw moving films of stone
buildings; I saw a hand in prison dragging snow in from the sill. In loving
him, I saw great houses being erected that would soon slide into the waiting
and stirring seas. I saw him freeing me from the silences of the interior life.
I loved that statement, loved especially the final line. I saw him freeing me
from the silences of the interior life. That’s the dream of sex, isn’t it? That
you will be liberated from the prison of the body by the body itself, at long
last desired, its strange tongue understood.

5
THE REALMS OF THE UNREAL
IT’S FUNNY, SUBLETTING, MAKING A life among someone else’s things, in a
home that someone else has created and long since left. My bed was on a
platform, up three wooden steps so steep I had to pick my way down them
backwards, like a sailor. There was a boarded-up window at the end that
opened on to an air shaft, through which music and conversation would
periodically drift and stick. A dumbbell tenement, the kind described in Low
Life, Luc Sante’s incantatory account of Old New York. People had been
coming and going through those rooms for years, leaving jars of lip balm and
tubes of hand cream in their wake. The kitchen cupboards were filled with
half-finished boxes of granola and Yogi tea bags and no one had watered the
plants or dusted the shelves in months.
During the day I rarely encountered anyone in the building, but at night I’d
hear doors opening and closing, people passing a few feet from my bed. The
man who lived in the next apartment was a D.J., and at odd hours of the day
and night waves of bass would come surging through the walls, reverberating
in my chest. At two or three in the morning the heat rose clanking through the
pipes and just before dawn I’d sometimes be woken by the siren of the
ladder truck leaving the East 2nd Street firehouse, which had lost six crew
members on 9/11.
Everything felt permeable, silted up, like a room without a lock or a
cavern periodically inundated by the sea. I slept shallowly, often getting up to
check my email and then sprawling aimlessly on the couch, watching the sky
turn from black to inky blue above the fire escape, the Chase bank on the
corner. There was a psychic a few doors down and on sunny afternoons
she’d sit in the window of her room beside a model skull, sometimes rapping
on the glass and beckoning me in, no matter how violently I shook my head.
No bad data, no revelations about the future, thanks. I didn’t want to know
who I might or might not meet, what was lying in wait ahead.
It was becoming increasingly easy to see how people ended up vanishing
in cities, disappearing in plain sight, retreating into their apartments because
of sickness or bereavement, mental illness or the persistent, unbearable
burden of sadness and shyness, of not knowing how to impress themselves
into the world. I was getting a taste of it, all right, but what on earth would it
be like to live the whole of your life like this, occupying the blind spot in
other people’s existences, their noisy intimacies?
If anyone can be said to have worked from that place, it’s Henry Darger,
the Chicago janitor who posthumously achieved fame as one of the world’s
most celebrated outsider artists, a term coined to describe people on the
margins of society, who make work without the benefit of an education in art
or art history.
Darger, who was born in the slums of Chicago in 1892, had certainly
existed on the margins. His mother had died of puerperal fever when he was
four, a few days after giving birth to his sister, who was immediately
adopted. His father was crippled, and at the age of eight he was sent away,
first to a Catholic boys’ home and then to the Illinois Asylum for FeebleMinded Children, where he received the dreadful news that his father was
dead. After running away at seventeen, he found work in the city’s Catholic
hospitals, in which uncertain refuge he spent nearly six decades rolling
bandages and sweeping floors.
In 1932, Darger rented a single room on the second floor of a boarding
house at 851 Webster Street, in a run-down, working-class region of the city.
There he stayed until 1972, when he became too ill to care for himself and so
went unwillingly to the St Augustine Catholic Mission, where coincidentally
his father had also died. After he moved out, his landlord, Nathan Lerner,
decided to clean the room of forty years of accumulated rubbish. He hired a
skip and asked another tenant, David Berglund, to assist him by dragging out
piles of newspapers, old shoes, broken eyeglasses and empty bottles, the
collected hoardings of a devoted dumpster diver.
At some point during this process, Berglund began to unearth artworks of
almost supernatural radiance: beautiful, baffling watercolours of naked little
girls with penises, at play in rolling landscapes. Some had charming,
fairytale elements: clouds with faces and winged creatures sporting in the
sky. Others were of exquisitely staged and coloured scenes of mass torture,
complete with delicately painted pools of scarlet blood. Berglund showed
them to Lerner, himself an artist, who immediately recognised their value.
Over the next few months, they discovered a vast body of work, including
over 300 paintings and thousands of pages of written material. Much of it
was set in a coherent otherworld: the Realms of the Unreal, a place Darger
inhabited far more dynamically and passionately than he did the everyday
city of Chicago. Many people live constricted lives, but what is astonishing
about Darger is the compensatory scale as well as richness of his internal
sphere. He’d begun writing about the Realms some time between 1910 and
1912, after he escaped from the asylum, though who knows how long he’d
been thinking about it, or visiting it in his mind. The Story of the Vivian
Girls, in What is Known as the Realms of the Unreal, of the GlandecoAngelinian War Storm, Caused by the Child Slave Rebellion would
eventually run to 15,145 pages, making it the longest known work of fiction
in existence.
As the unwieldy title suggests, The Realms of the Unreal charts the
progress of a bloody civil war. It takes place on an imaginary planet, around
which our own earth circulates as a moon. Like its American counterpart,
this war is being fought over slavery; specifically the slavery of children. In
fact, the role of children is among the most striking elements of the work.
While gorgeously attired adult men fight on either side, the spiritual leaders
of the struggle against the wicked Glandelinians are seven prepubescent
sisters, while the victims of their multiple atrocities are small girl children,
often stripped of their clothes, revealing the presence of male genitals.
The Vivian Girls are endlessly resilient. Like comic book heroines, they
can withstand any amount of violence; escaping every peril. But the other
children are not so lucky. As both the written and visual material makes
graphically clear, the Realms are a place of infinite cruelty, in which naked
little girls are routinely strangled, crucified and disembowelled by uniformed
men in gardens filled with luscious outsized flowers. It is this element of the
work that would later draw accusations of sexual sadism and paedophilia.
Over the years, Darger also wrote a second enormous novel, Crazy
House: Further Adventures in Chicago, as well as an autobiography and
multiple journals. But despite his astonishing productivity, he apparently
never tried to show, promote or even talk about his work, making and
containing it within a succession of three small boarding house rooms. As
such, it’s not perhaps surprising that when Berglund went to the St Augustine
Mission to ask about the thrilling find at Webster Street, Darger refused to
discuss it, making the enigmatic statement it’s too late now and asking that the
work be destroyed. Later, he contradicted himself, saying that it could be
preserved in Lerner’s custody.
Either way, when he died on 13 April 1973, at the age of eighty-one, he
left behind no explanation for the things he’d made, the art he’d created so
painstakingly and over so many years. In the absence of any surviving
relatives, it was Lerner and his wife who took on the roles of advocate and
champion, coordinating and driving Darger’s growing status in the art world,
and selling his increasingly costly paintings to private collectors, galleries
and museums.
It’s rare that a body of work emerges into view so totally severed from its
maker, and it’s particularly problematic when the content is both so
disturbing and so resistant to interpretation. In the forty years since Darger’s
death, theories about his intentions and character have proliferated, put
forward by an impassioned chorus of art historians, academics, curators,
psychologists and journalists. These voices are by no means convergent, but
broadly speaking they have established Darger as an outsider artist
nonpareil: untutored, ignorant, isolated and almost certainly mentally ill. The
extreme violence and physically explicit nature of his work has inevitably
drawn lurid readings. Over the years, he’s been posthumously diagnosed
with autism and schizophrenia, while his first biographer, John MacGregor,
explicitly suggested that he possessed the mind of a paedophile or serial
killer, an accusation that has proved enduring.
It seemed to me that this second act of Darger’s life compounded the
isolation of the first; divesting him of dignity and drowning out or speaking
over the voice he’d managed to raise against considerable odds. The things
he made have served as lightning rods for other people’s fears and fantasies
about isolation, its potentially pathological aspect. In fact, many of the books
and articles written about him seem to shine more light on our cultural
anxieties around the effects of loneliness on the psyche than they do on the
artist as a real, breathing person.
This process troubled me so much, in fact, that I became obsessed with
accessing and reading The History of My Life, Darger’s own unpublished
memoir. Some of its text has been reproduced, but not in its entirety; another
form of silencing, particularly when one considers how many volumes have
been published on his life.
After some digging, I discovered that the manuscript was in New York,
along with all Darger’s written work and many of his drawings, part of a
collection purchased from the Lerners in the 1990s by the American Folk Art
Museum. I wrote to the curator asking if I could visit and she agreed to let me
spend a week, the maximum concession, reading through his papers, the
words he’d actually used to record his existence in the world.
*
The archive was on the third floor of a huge office building near the
Manhattan Bridge, down a maze of shiny white corridors. It doubled as a
store for objects not currently on exhibition and so I sat at a desk surrounded
by a melancholy zoo of wooden animals draped in white sheets, among them
an elephant and a giraffe. Darger’s memoir was in a brown leather binder,
cracking at the corners and stuffed with grubby sheets of blue-lined paper. It
began with page after page of copied passages from the Bible. At last, on
page 39: The History of my life. By Henry Joseph Darger (Dargarius);
written in 1968, when he was retired and time was hanging heavy on his
hands.
Not everyone possesses an instantly distinctive voice, but Darger did.
Precise, pedantic, humorous, elliptical and very dry. The memoir opened: ‘In
the month of April on the 12, in the year of 1892, of what week day I never
knew, as I was never told, nor did I seek the information.’ What’s odd about
this sentence is that the first few words seem to be missing, so that one must
extrapolate that this is Darger’s date of birth. An accident, no doubt, though it
should also serve to make the reader wary, conscious that they are entering
into a narrative of gaps.
Darger’s account of his very early childhood was more benign than I’d
been expecting, partly because he elided the death of his mother, focusing
instead on his relationship with his father. They were poor, yes, but their life
was not entirely devoid of pleasure, though Henry did have the heavy
responsibilities that inevitably fall to children of sick parents. ‘My father
was a tailor and a kind and easy going man.’ ‘Oh how good the coffee he
could produce by boiling – as he was lame I bought the food coffee milk and
other supplies and ran errands.’
His reflections on childhood were interesting. There was never a sense of
a we, of being part of a merry herd. Rather, an impression of himself as
outside, acting first as an aggressor and then protector to those smaller and
more vulnerable than himself. The aggression was caused, he thought,
because he lacked a brother and had lost his sister to adoption. ‘I never knew
or seen her, or knew her name. I would as I wrote before shove them down,
and once foolishly threw with my fingertips ashes in the eyes of a little girl
by the name of Francis Gillow.’
Much has been made of this scene, and another in which he described
being ‘a meany’, pushing a two-year-old to the ground and making it cry:
ballast for building an argument about Darger being a sadist or a madman.
But who didn’t enact some violence on a sibling or stranger when they were
small? You only have to sit by a playground for half an hour to see how
physically aggressive many small children are.
Later, a shift occurred. He began to experience a deep tenderness for
children that would persist right through his life. ‘Then babies at that were
more to me than anything, more than the world. I would fondle them and love
them. At that time just any bigger boy or even grown up dare molest or harm
them in anyway.’ It’s this sort of language that gives rise to the suspicion of
paedophilia, though Darger certainly saw himself as the counter-opposite of
an abuser: the self-styled protector of innocence, alert to vulnerability, to the
possibility of harm.
The boy arising from the grubby pages was bright and stubborn, intolerant
of irrational adult structures. Precocious of mind, able to grasp the failings of
the rote way he was being taught, on one occasion explaining to a teacher the
ways in which the histories of the civil war diverged and contradicted one
another. But despite his intelligence, Darger wasn’t popular at school, due to
his habit of making what he described as strange noises with his nose, mouth
and throat.
He’d expected his antics to amuse his fellow students, but instead they
were annoyed and called him crazy and feeble-minded and sometimes tried
to beat him up. He had another odd habit too, a way of throwing with his left
hand, ‘like pretending it were snowing’. People who saw it thought he was
mad and he said if he’d realised why he’d have done it in private, since the
accusation of insanity would soon have dreadful consequences for him.
By this time, his father had handed him over to the custody of the nuns at
the Mission of Our Lady Home, a place he disliked so much he would have
run away, if only he could have thought of how ‘to be elsewhere taken care
of’. He was eight, a child who despite his ability to shop and run errands
was sensible of his need for adult protection. His father and godmother both
came to visit, but there seemed to be no question of him returning home.
In his final year at the Mission, he was because of his strange habits taken
several times to see a doctor, who told him eventually that his heart was not
in the right place. ‘Where was it supposed to be?’ he wrote ironically. ‘In my
belly? Yet I did not receive any kind of medicine or any kind of treatment.’
Instead, on a grim November day he was hustled out of Chicago and taken by
train to what he described as some kind of home for feeble-minded children.
Decades on, he was still enraged. ‘I a feeble minded kid. I knew more than
the whole shebang in that place.’
In the most recent Darger biography, Henry Darger, Throwaway Boy, the
writer Jim Elledge summons a powerful array of historical testimony,
including a legal case, to prove the appalling conditions at this asylum,
where children were routinely raped, choked and beaten, deceased inmates’
body parts were used in anatomy lectures, one boy castrated himself and a
small girl was scalded to death.
There is no mention of any of these horrors in Darger’s own account.
‘Sometimes was pleasant and sometimes not so,’ he says, and: ‘Finally got to
like the place.’ This doesn’t mean, of course, that he was not among the
abused. The laconic tone might be the stoicism of no choice, or the numbness
that follows on from violence, the isolating, silencing layers of fear and
shame. Perhaps not, though. There has been too much speaking into this kind
of absence; too strong a desire to fill the holes in Henry’s story. It was a
violent place; he was there: those are the facts, the limits of the known.
Here too I must say something about time. As with David Wojnarowicz’s
account of his childhood, the sense of time in Darger’s record is often blurry
or uncertain. There are many sentences along the lines of ‘I do not remember
the number of years I lived with my father’ or ‘I believe I was at the asylum
7 years’. This temporal unsteadiness is a consequence of too many moves
and too little explanation about them, relating too to the absence of a devoted
parent, who helps to organise a child’s memories by telling their story back
to them and keeping them appraised of their chronology, their place. For
Henry, there was no one to keep track; no agency and no control. The world
he inhabited was a place in which things happen to you, abruptly and without
warning, where one’s belief in the predictability of the future is severely
undermined.
A case in point: when he was ‘somewhat older, probably in my early
teens’, Henry was informed that his father had died, that he was completely
at the mercy of the institution, and no longer possessed a family or home. ‘I
did not cry or weep however,’ he writes, his Is like shepherd’s crooks. ‘I had
that kind of deep sorrow that bad as you feel I could not. I’d been better off if
I could have. I was in that state for weeks, and because of it I was in a state
of ugliness of such nature that everyone avoided me, they were so scared . . .
During the first of my grief I hardly even ate anything, and was no friend to
any one.’ Loss after loss, causing withdrawal after withdrawal.
Like time, the subject of home is also a source of puzzlement. At the
bughouse, as people called it, the older boys were made to spend their
summers working on a state farm. Henry liked the labour, but he hated to
leave the asylum. ‘I loved it much better than the farm, but yet I loved the
work there. Yet the asylum was home to me.’ But and yet: devices for yoking
contradictory thoughts together.
In fact, although he enjoyed the meals at the farm, loved to work in the
fields and believed the family who ran it were very good people, he tried
several times to run away. The first escape attempt ended when he was
caught by the farm cowboy, who tied his hands to a rope and made him run
back behind the horse, a scene vividly animated in Jessica Yu’s beautiful
documentary about Darger. It’s hard to think of a more brutal illustration of
being powerless over the course of your life, lashed and dragged in the wake
of larger forces.
Undeterred, he tried a second time, hitchhiking a freight train to Chicago.
After an alarming storm he lost his nerve, giving himself up to the police.
‘What made me run away?’ he asked himself in the memoir, answering: ‘My
protestation at being sent away from the asylum, where I wanted to stay, as
for some reason it was home to me.’
*
In my lunch-breaks, I used to walk down to the waterfront and sit by the
river. There was a carousel on the promenade, a real beauty, and as I ate I
could hear the shouts of children being whirled around on the painted
wooden ponies, chestnut, black and bay. Darger’s phrase about the asylum
had lodged in my mind, and as I sat there I worried over it.
It was home to me is a statement that cuts to a central issue in loneliness
studies: the question of attachment. Attachment theory was developed in the
1950s and 1960s by the British psychoanalyst John Bowlby and the
developmental psychologist Mary Ainsworth. It proposes that children need
to form secure emotional attachments with a caretaker during infancy and
early childhood, a process that contributes to their later emotional and social
development and that if ruptured or otherwise insufficient can have lasting
consequences.
This sounds like common sense, but at the time of Darger’s childhood the
consensus among health care providers of all kinds -from psychoanalysts to
hospital doctors – was that all children required in the way of nourishment
was a germ-free environment and a ready supply of food. The reigning belief
was that tenderness and physical affection were actively detrimental to
development and could in fact ruin a child.
To modern ears, this seems insane, but it was driven by a genuine desire to
improve child survival. In the nineteenth century, child mortality had been
enormously high, especially in institutions like hospitals and orphanages.
Once germ transmission was understood, the preferred strategy of care was
to maintain hygiene by minimising physical contact, moving beds apart and
limiting interactions with parents, staff and other patients as much as
possible. While this did indeed successfully reduce the spread of disease, it
also had an unexpected consequence, which took decades to be properly
understood.
In the newly sterile conditions, children failed to thrive. They were
physically more healthy, and yet they wasted away, particularly the infants.
Isolated and untouched, they went through paroxysms of grief, rage and
despair, before eventually submitting passively to their state. Stiff, polite,
apathetic and emotionally withdrawn, their behaviour made them easy to
neglect, further entrenching them in acute, unspeakable loneliness and
isolation.
As a discipline, psychology was at this stage in its infancy, and the
majority of practitioners either refused or were unable to see a problem. This
was after all the era of the behavioural psychologist B. F. Skinner, who
believed babies should be raised in boxes, protected from the contaminating
presence of the mother, and of John Watson, president of the American
Psychological Association, who mooted bringing up infants in hygienic
camps, in accordance with scientific principles and far from the damaging
influences of their doting parents.
Nonetheless, a handful of practitioners in America and Europe, among
them Bowlby and Ainsworth, Rene Spitz and Harry Harlow, had a strong
instinct that what those institutionalised children were suffering from was
loneliness, and that what they were pining for was love: in particular
affectionate physical contact from a stable and consistent caregiver. They
began to carry out research in hospitals and orphanages on both sides of the
Atlantic, but these studies were dismissed as being too small, too easily
misconstrued. It took Harry Harlow’s infamous experiments with rhesus
monkeys in the late 1950s to really make the case for love.
Anyone who’s seen photographs of Harlow’s monkeys clinging to wire
models or huddled in isolation chambers will know that these are deeply
disturbing experiments, carried out in an uneasy hinterland between the
scientifically valid and the ethically abhorrent. Changing the treatment of
human children mattered to Harlow; for him the monkeys were simply
collateral damage in a larger battle. Like Bowlby, what he was trying to do
was prove the crucial importance of affection and social connection. Many of
his findings tally with current research on loneliness, particularly the notion
that isolation leads to a decline in social sophistication, which in itself
elicits further episodes of rejection.
In the first of his attachment experiments, carried out at the University of
Wisconsin in 1957, he separated infant rhesus monkeys from their mothers,
providing them with a pair of surrogates, one made of wire and one wrapped
in soft cloth. In half the cages, a bottle of milk was attached to the chest of the
wire mothers, and in the other half to the cloth mothers. According to the
dominant theories of the time, the infant monkeys should have selected
whichever surrogate possessed the food, but in fact they exhibited an
absolute preference for the cloth mother, clinging to her whether she had milk
or not, and only darting to the wire mother to suckle before racing back.
Next, Harlow assessed the reactions of the infants to various kinds of
stress. He gave another group access to either a wire or cloth mother, before
introducing a barking toy dog and a marching clockwork bear beating a drum.
Monkeys who only had access to the wire mothers were far more alarmed by
these terrifying apparitions than those provisioned with the more comforting
cloth bodies.
These results align with the slightly later work of Mary Ainsworth, who in
the early 1960s explored how children’s abilities to handle stressful or
threatening situations (the so-called Strange Situation Procedure) depends on
how securely they are attached. It was Ainsworth who came up with the
categorisation still in use today, formulating a distinction between secure or
insecure attachment, the latter of which can be further subdivided into
ambivalent and avoidant attachment. An ambivalently attached child is
distressed by maternal absence and shows its feeling via a mixture of anger,
desire for contact and passivity, while an avoidantly attached child withholds
their reactions on the mother’s return, masking the intensity of their grief and
fear.
Together, these experiments show the intensity of the need an infant has for
an attachment figure. Harlow, however, still wasn’t satisfied that his work
was emphatic enough. For his next experiment, he designed four so-called
monster mothers. Each possessed a comforting cloth body, but they were
also armed respectively with brass spikes, an air-blaster, an ability to fling
their charge away or to rock it so violently you could hear the baby monkey’s
teeth clashing together. Despite the discomfort, the infants kept clinging on,
willing to face even pain in their quest for affection, for something soft to
cuddle up to.
It was the image of these monster mothers that had come back to me when I
read Darger’s statement about loving the asylum. The bleak truth Harlow’s
experiment reveals is that a child’s need for attachment far outweighs its
capacity for self-protection: something that is also apparent when abused
children plead to stay with violent parents. ‘I can’t say whether I was
actually sorry I ran away from the state farm or not but now I believe I was a
sort of fool to have done so,’ Darger had written in his memoir. ‘My life was
like in a sort of Heaven there. Do you think I might be fool enough to run
away from heaven if I get there?’ Heaven: a place in which during his own
time children were regularly beaten, raped and abused.
But the monster mothers wasn’t the only experiment of Harlow’s to
illuminate a key aspect of Darger’s life. In the late 1960s, after he won the
National Medal of Science, Harlow turned his attention from mothering to
what happens to an infant if there is no social interaction whatsoever. He was
becoming increasingly aware that it wasn’t just attachment to the mother that
produced a socially and emotionally healthy infant, but rather a whole
mosaic of relationships. He wanted to understand the role of social contact in
development, and to see what effects a forced experience of loneliness
would produce.
In the first horrifying round of isolation experiments, he placed new-born
rhesus monkeys in solitary confinement, some for a month, some for six
months and some for an entire year. Even the monkeys with the shortest
sentence emerged from their prisons emotionally disturbed, while those who
were isolated for a full year were incapable of exploration or sexual
relations, engaging instead in repeated patterns of behaviour: huddling,
licking and self-clutching. They were aggressive or withdrawn; they rocked
or paced back and forth; they sucked their fingers and toes; they froze into
fixed positions or repeated strange gestures of the hand and arm. Again, it
reminded me of Henry: the compulsive noise-making, the repetitive
movements he made with his left hand.
Harlow wanted to see what would happen if these previously isolated
individuals were introduced to a group environment. The results were
devastating. When placed in the shared enclosure they were almost
invariably bullied, while some aggressively approached larger individuals in
what Harlow termed suicidal aggressions. It was so bad, in fact, that some
had to be re-isolated, to keep them from being killed. In Harlow’s book, The
Human Model, the chapter that deals with these experiments is titled ‘The
Hell of Loneliness’.
If only this were confined to rhesus monkeys. But humans are social
creatures too, and also tend to cast out individuals who do not fit easily into
the group. People who are not socially fluent, who have not been given a
loving training in how to play and engage, how to join in and situate
themselves, are far more likely to elicit instances of rejection (one might
think here of Valerie Solanas, fresh from prison, being spat at by strangers in
the street). For me, this was the most disturbing aspect of Harlow’s work: the
revelation that after an experience of loneliness both the damaged individual
and the healthy society work in concert to maintain separation.
More recent research, particularly with bullied children, suggests that the
targets of social rejection are often those who are deemed either too
aggressive or too anxious and withdrawn. Unhappily, these are precisely the
behaviours that arise from insecure or inadequate attachment or from early
episodes of isolation. What this means in practice is that children who have
had problematic attachment experiences are far more likely to suffer
episodes of rejection than their peers, establishing patterns of loneliness and
withdrawal that can continue entrenching well into adulthood.
This pattern too plays out in Darger’s life. The lacks and losses he
suffered in his childhood are precisely those that shatter attachment, kindling
chronic loneliness. What happens next is the grim old cycle of
hypervigilance, the growth of defensiveness and suspicion, a note audible
everywhere in his memoir. He perpetually revisits old disagreements with
people from his past, ways in which they cheated him or let him down. ‘I
hate my accusers and would have liked to kill them, but did not dare. I never
was their friend, and am their enemy yet, even whether they are dead now or
not.’ The impression is of someone profoundly lacking in social flexibility,
someone routinely picked on, ostracised or bullied, locked into the selfdefeating circuit of suspicion and mistrust which follows on from any
substantial experience of social isolation or shattered bonds.
But what the physiological account of loneliness elides is the part taken by
society itself in policing and perpetuating exclusion, rejecting the unwieldy
and strange. This is the other driver of loneliness, the reason why certain
people – often the most vulnerable and needy of connection – find themselves
permanently on the threshold, if not cast entirely beyond the pale.
*
After Darger made it back to Chicago for good, he found employment in the
city’s Catholic hospitals. Being a janitor was tough, relentless work: long
days, no vacations and only Sunday afternoons off – a common enough
experience, of course, during the years of the Depression. He kept it up for
fifty-four years, all told, excluding a brief spell in which he was drafted for
the army, discharged soon after on account of his poor eyesight. In all that
time his duties remained menial: peeling potatoes, washing pots or scraping
dishes in the boiling kitchens, which during the brutally hot Chicago summers
became so extreme that he was once sick for days with heat exhaustion. An
even worse task was carting trash to be burned, a heck of a job, especially in
winter, when he was often troubled by terrible colds.
What leavened those years, what made them bearable, was the existence of
‘a special friend’, Whillie (as Darger persistently spelt it, although his name
was actually William) Schloeder, who Darger visited every evening in the
years that he was working at St Joseph’s and Grant Hospital. Darger doesn’t
say how he met Whillie, who worked as a night-watchman in the city, but
over time they got close enough that he knew all the family: the sisters and inlaws, the nieces and nephews. Together, they established a secret club they
called the Gemini Society. It was dedicated to the purpose of protecting
children, and Darger made various playful items of documentation for it,
which undermines the notion that no one ever saw his art.
In 1956, Whillie’s mother died and he sold the house and moved with his
sister Catherine to San Antonio, where three years later he died of Asian flu.
‘5 of May, (I forgot the year),’ Darger wrote, ‘and since that happened I am
all alone. Never paled [sic] with anyone since.’ The hospital wouldn’t give
him time off work to go to the funeral and afterwards he could never find out
where Catherine had gone, though he thought it might have been Mexico.
A couple of days after reading about Whillie’s death in the memoir, I was
looking through a slim folder of correspondence – brief notes to priests and
neighbours, mainly – when I found a letter Darger had written to Catherine. It
was dated 1 June 1959 and it began with a formal expression of sorrow. My
dear friend Miss Catherine, surely did not feel at all good, the very sad
news, my dear friend Bill, died May the Second, I feel as if lost in empty
space.
Then there was a long section about a missed phone call, mistaken
identities, another Henry in the kitchens at work. ‘Why didn’t you call where
I live?’ he asks miserably. ‘Then I would have known, and if possible you
could have me at the funeral.’ Because he was off sick he hadn’t got the news
for three whole days. He apologises for not writing sooner, ‘because I was
out of sorts and shaken by the news of his death. He was like a brother to me.
Now nothing matters to me at all and I am going to here after live my kind of
life.’ He promises to have a mass said and asks for a picture or something to
remember Whillie by. He expresses the hope that she will receive
consolation, adding: ‘a loss is hard to take. It sure is to me to lose him for
then too I lost all I had and had a hard time to stand it.’
The letter was stamped RETURNED. Catherine had already vanished.
After the severing of this final bond, Darger never made another friend.
Instead, his world became radically unpeopled, which is perhaps what he’d
meant by that curious statement I will here after live my kind of life. A few
years later, in November 1963, he retired from the hospital, at the age of
seventy-one. His legs were becoming increasingly painful and he was
limping badly, periodically suffering attacks so bad he couldn’t stand. Pain in
his side too, so that he sometimes sat and cursed the saints for hours. One
might have thought retirement would be a blessing, but he said he hated the
lazy life, the lack of tasks to fill the empty days. He started going to mass
more frequently, and spent many hours combing the neighbourhood for useful
pieces of trash, especially string and pairs of men’s shoes.
From the outside – and there are plenty of witness statements, mostly
collected from the other tenants at Webster Street – he seemed increasingly
cranky and withdrawn. He holed up in his room, where he could clearly be
heard talking to himself: either the blasphemous rants that he records in the
memoir or conversations with people from his past; long, aggrieved
arguments in which he would perform both parts.
The History of My Life is not especially forthcoming about this period of
Darger’s life because on page 206 of 5,084 it segues from an autobiography
into an enormously long and rambling story about a tornado called Sweetie
Pie and the horrific damage it caused. A more concrete sense of what his
retirement involved comes from the journal he kept in his last years. The
entries are terse and repetitive, attesting to the outwardly narrow and
constricted contours of his life. ‘Saturday April 12. My birthday. The same
as Friday. Life History. No tantrums.’ ‘Sunday April 27 1969. Two masses
and Communion. Eat Hot dog sandwich. I felt miserable from cold. Went to
bed early in the afternoon.’ ‘Wednesday April 30 1969. Still in bed with a
bad cold. Cold today and tonight much worse. Tormented me terribly. No
mass or Communion. No Life History.’
Hardly any wonder Father Thomas, the parish priest at St Vincent’s,
observed anxiously, ‘he is more helpless than I presumed’. This is a
document of lack, in which there is no mention of friends or social activities
beyond the church. It’s true that he did sometimes interact with neighbours.
There were a few letters in the archive in which he asked David Berglund
for small favours: to help with a ladder, or to give him for Christmas what I
need most, a bar of Ivory soap and a large tube of Palmolive brushless
shaving cream, gifts for which he’d thank him with cards printed with
sentimental verse. Berglund and his wife also nursed Henry when he was ill,
though he doesn’t mention this in his own account. But apart from these
neighbourly interventions, there is a vast paucity of human interaction,
combined with an internal furore of emotion, particularly rage.
The final journal entry comes at the tail end of December, 1971. Darger
hasn’t been writing for a while, checked by a serious eye infection, which
necessitated an operation. During the recovery period he didn’t dare go out,
stopping instead in bed, the kind of laziness he loathed. Now he sounds
miserable and frightened. ‘I had a poor a very poor nothing like Christmas.
Never had a good Christmas in all my life,’ he writes, adding: ‘I am very
bitter but fortunately not revengeful.’ But what, he wonders fretfully, will the
future hold for him. ‘God only knows. This year was a very bad one. Hope
not to repeat.’ The final words are ‘What will it be?’ followed by a dash –
an expression of suspension, be it of time or disbelief.
*
My desk at the archive faced a set of metal shelves. On them were piled 114
boxes in varied shades of buff and grey. They looked drab and officey, the
sort of thing you might use to store minutes or accounts, but what they
actually held was evidence of Darger’s secret life: as the artist self, the
maker of worlds, an identity he mentioned only in passing in his life history.
(‘To make matters worse now I’m an artist, been one for years and cannot
hardly stand on my feet because of my knee to paint on the top of the long
picture.’)
As an artist, he was entirely self-taught. Although he possessed a
remarkable gift for composition and had loved colouring since very early
childhood, he was burdened by the belief that he couldn’t draw. Many artists
are opposed to or uncomfortable about working free-hand, committing their
own lines to the page. Sometimes this is about wanting to avoid determinism,
à la Duchamp, who said about one randomised work: ‘The intention
consisted above all in forgetting the hand.’
This desire resurfaces in the work of Warhol, who though magically gifted
at drawing wanted to erase the evidence of the hand, preferring instead the
chancy happenstance of machine processes, especially screen printing.
Others simply doubted their abilities. Whenever David Wojnarowicz was
asked how he got started as an artist, he’d say that as a boy he used to trace
pictures – ocean panoramas, say, or images of planets circulating in outer
space – presenting them to kids at school as his own work. Eventually a girl
confronted him, insisting he draw freehand in front of her. To his surprise he
found he could, and from then on the anxiety he’d felt about drawing fell
away.
Darger never really experienced a lessening of that fear, but like Warhol
he did find elaborate ways of circumventing line drawing, sharing too his
pleasure at making art out of actual pieces of the world. How did he do it,
though: making painting after painting with no training, a punishing job and
only limited resources? The curator at the archive was himself an artist, and
in between fetching boxes he explained Darger’s career to me, the
painstaking way he’d honed and developed a working practice.
He’d started with found images, sometimes backing them on card or
doctoring them in subtle ways, especially by painting over them, adding hats
or costumes or simply piercing the eyes. Next, he progressed to collages,
cutting images out of newspapers and magazines and pasting them into
increasingly complex composites. The problem with this technique was that
each component image could only be used once, meaning that he had to find
more and more raw materials, either at the hospital or by going through the
trash. It was wasteful of resources, and also frustrating, having to surrender a
favoured image, to commit it to just one picture, just one scenario.
This is where tracing came in. With tracing, he could liberate a figure or
object from its past context and reuse it dozens if not hundreds of times,
inserting it by way of carbon paper into a diversity of scenes. It was
economical, a thrifty process, and it also let him magically possess the image
in a way that scissors didn’t, transferring it first on to tracing paper and then
again through the blue sheets of carbon into the painting proper. One of his
favourites was a doleful little girl holding a bucket, one finger in her mouth.
Once you’ve spotted her, she crops up over and again, a picture of abject
misery and desolation. The Coppertone Girl, too: often with horns, or
transformed into one of the winged creatures Darger called blengins, a
world away from where she’d begun.
There were thousands of these source images: folder after folder filled
with pictures clipped from colouring books, comics, cartoons, newspapers,
adverts and magazines. They attested to an obsessive love of popular culture
that reminded me again of Warhol, a hoarding and repurposing of just the
kind of ordinary things that would later be embraced by Pop Art, something
Darger never mentioned and quite possibly never saw.
Despite the rumours about his disorderly, chaotic habits, Darger had
evidently been meticulous in organising this raw material, establishing
thematic groupings: sets of clouds and girls, images of the Civil War, of boys,
men, butterflies, disasters – all the divergent elements, in fact, that together
make up the universe of the Realms. He’d stored them in stacks of filthy
envelopes, which were carefully labelled with his own idiosyncratic
descriptions: ‘Plant and child pictures’, ‘Clouds to be drawn’, ‘Special
picture Girl bending with stick and another jumping away in terror’, ‘One
girl with some one’s finger under chin Maybe sketch maybe not’. Some of
these so-called special images were further labelled ‘to be drawn only
once’, as if multiple replication would divest or drain them of their uncanny
power.
His working practice became even more sophisticated when in 1944 he
discovered that he could get images turned into photographic negatives and
then enlarged at the drugstore on North Halsted, three blocks away from his
house. Enlargement facilitated the extraordinary complexity of his work,
allowing him to play with scale and perspective, to compose elaborate
scenes using foreground and background, to create kinetic and receding
layers.
One box was stuffed with envelopes from the lab, each containing the
original, the negative and the enlargement. The receipts were also preserved;
seemingly small sums of $5 and $4 and $3.50, until you remembered that in
all Darger’s life his salary never exceeded $3,000 a year, and that in the
decade of his retirement he lived off social security. Nothing is more
declarative of someone’s priorities than how they spend their money,
particularly when they don’t have much of it. Hot dogs for lunch, begging his
neighbours for the gift of soap, but 246 enlargements of children, clouds,
flowers, soldiers, tornadoes and fires, so that he could incorporate actual
beauty and disaster into his unreal world.
All the time that I was working in the archive, I was aware that there was
a painting behind me, draped in sheets. It was enormous, at least twelve feet
long, so that it was hard to imagine how Darger had stored it, let alone
worked on it in his cramped little room. On my final day, I asked if I could
see it and so the curator drew back the covers and let me look my fill.
It was made from multiple materials: watercolour, pencil, carbon tracing
and collage. A caption had been handwritten on a pasted sheet of plain white
paper: This scene here shows the murderous massacre still going in before
the winged blengins arrived from the sky. They came so quick how however
that those fastened to the trees, or board, and those on the run escaped the
murderist rascals or were rescued, and flown to permanent safty and
security. [sic]
Like many of Darger’s paintings, it showed a rural landscape, partially
wooded and coloured in a lovely symphony of greens. There was a palm
tree, a tree with huge hanging grapes, an apple tree, a pale tree giving forth
large white blooms. In the foreground, there was a great profusion of
flowers, spreading outward from a clump of crocuses, which rose like
snakeheads from the bottom of the canvas.
All the trees bore strange fruit. There were girls tied to them, girls hanging
from them, girls lashed to boards and girls running screaming from an army
made up of uniformed soldiers and cowboys; one on horseback, the others
hurtling through the bush. Some of the girls were naked, especially the ones
in the trees, though most of them had managed to keep their socks and Mary
Janes, their hair in incongruously neat plaits tied with ribbons. Elaborately
coloured butterflies moved among them, drifting through an expanse of rosepink sky.
The girl with the pail was right at the back, also dressed in pink, her finger
in her mouth. ‘I have to stop this,’ she says by way of a speech bubble. ‘But
how, by myself?’ She’s not the only speaker. This is a highly verbal painting.
‘We could only get a few. The others would escape. We will signal to our
friends flying in the sky,’ says a naked girl crouching at the far left of the
painting. ‘Let’s go at the murderers,’ her friend replies. Two of the cowboys
are arguing nearby, shouting: ‘She’s mine I tell you. I won’t let go’ and: ‘You
let go, will you. She’s the one I’m supposed to hang, not you. Yours is on the
run.’ They’re wrestling for control of a rope, which vanishes upward,
presumably to an unseen branch. From the other end a girl is hanging, naked
but for blue socks and shoes, her tongue protruding from her livid fuchsia
face.
I stood by the painting for a long time, writing detailed notes about colour
and position. Three dimensionality by having half of each face/body
painted a darker pink. Actual lines drawn in to divide pale from dark.
Three naked save for socks and shoes. Girl’s throat crushed in crook of
elbow, red hair mauve face. Dark purple almost black dress matched to
socks. Kicking her legs, knee and hand lost in foliage/flowers. One
brighter yellow and with plaits with white ribbons.
I was starting to feel a little dizzy. There was a squirrel in the tree, a
dangling bunch of grapes. Seizing on details was a way of resisting the
overwhelming impact of the painting, its orchestrated violence, the way it
invited and resisted interpretation in the same field of time. A blond soldier
had two girls by the throat, one in each meaty fist. His uniform had gold
buttons and his large blue eyes were gazing vacantly into the middle distance,
totally disconnected from the actions of his body.
Pain was everywhere in the painting, though not everyone was capable of
acknowledging it. In fact, it was a profound investigation into three kinds of
gazes: the gaze of agony, the gaze of empathy, and the gaze of disassociation:
an account of pain and horror registering on multiple faces. It was hard to
know which were the most disturbing, the agonised girls or the blank-faced,
wooden men, who didn’t understand that they were causing pain, or didn’t
care; who were unable to register or engage with the harm that they were
doing to another body, another sentient being. The result was chaos, a tumult
of limbs and mouths and hair, carried out in a landscape of indifference, the
blooming ground on which all wars occur.
What was Darger doing, all those years alone in his room? You might paint
something like that once, but imagine doing it again and again, consecrating
your life to an analysis of violence and vulnerability in all their many
permutations. How does one make sense of it, this work that anyway wasn’t
meant to be seen? For months now I’d been gathering up responses, different
tacks that people had taken.
One in particular had stuck in my mind. It was from John MacGregor’s
biography, a work that was evidently the product of many years of devoted
thought and labour. All the same, there were statements in it I found hard to
take. He wanted to dispel the notion that Darger was a conscious artist, was
in fact an artist at all, rather than someone mentally ill, making work as a
symptom, a compulsion as meaningless as that odd hand gesture that looked
like he was throwing snow.
‘This endless stream of words and images,’ MacGregor wrote:
. . . was born from his mind with the same inevitability and force as the feces
thrown off from day to day by his body. Darger wrote at the urgent prompting
of internal necessity . . . At no point was his vision arrived at freely, as a
spontaneous, or willed, manifestation of creative choice. His written and
pictorial products are the direct and unavoidable expression of a strange,
irresistibly powerful, and far from normal, mental state. The unique personal
style which we have been examining in the context of his writing is
unmistakably the product of psychiatric, perhaps even neurological,
anomalies which were present throughout his life.
It was hard to square that statement with the things I’d seen: folder after
folder attesting to creative decisions, to choices made and problems solved,
though if I’d never read anything by David Wojnarowicz, I might have been
more likely to accept it. But the Darger story looks different if you are
familiar with Wojnarowicz, which is to say familiar with issues of violence
and abuse, of poverty and the devastating effects of shame. Wojnarowicz was
a courageous and eloquent advocate for his own work, but the things he said
about himself, about his motivations and intentions, also have wider
applications. At the very least, they ought to make one ask questions about
agency and class and power in the work of vulnerable or socially excluded
artists.
You can’t think about people like Darger, or Solanas, for that matter,
without thinking too about the damage society wreaks upon individuals: the
role that structures like families and schools and governments play in any
single person’s experience of isolation. It’s not only factually incorrect to
assume mental illness can entirely explain Darger; it’s also morally wrong,
an act of cruelty as well as misreading. One of the saddest and most telling
things in all his work is the declaration of child independence he wrote for
the Realms. Among the rights he chose are: ‘to play, to be happy, and to
dream, the right to normal sleep of the night’s season, the right to an
education, that we may have an equality of opportunity for developing all that
are in us of mind and heart’.
How many of those rights had he actually been granted in his own life?
The one that really got me was the right to an education. It underscored the
brutal, careless way that he’d been treated. You can destroy a person without
resorting to the graphic violence of the Realms; can crush hopes and
squander dreams, waste talent, refuse to train and educate an able mind, but
rather keep a person in a prison of work, without praise or prospects, and
certainly unable to develop what is in them of mind and heart.
Extraordinary, in this light, that Darger managed to create so much, to leave
such luminous traces in his wake.
What MacGregor saw in Darger’s work was a compulsive and sexualised
desire to cause pain. He believed that his identification was with the men
who choked and hung and slaughtered the defenceless, naked girls. Other
critics have suggested that on the contrary he was compulsively replicating
traumatic scenes of his own abuse. Perhaps both are true, since it is very rare
that any single act occurs for just one motive. At the same time, what this
leaves out is the possibility that Darger was actually carrying out a conscious
and courageous investigation into violence: what it looks like; who its
victims and perpetrators are. Bigger questions, too: like what it means to
suffer, and whether anyone can truly understand the existence of another
person’s internal world.
For me, they were paintings made by someone who’d mustered the resolve
to look again and again at all the multiple forms of damage committed in the
world. This possibility was first given serious weight in 2001, when the
touring exhibition Disasters of War, curated by Klaus Biesenbach, brought
Darger’s paintings together with work by the Chapman Brothers and Goya.
The show contextualised him within art history, not as a maddened outsider,
but as a diligent practitioner of a kind of imaginative reportage of violence, a
subject that has always been within the purview of the artist.
While I was in the Darger archive, there were multiple child abuse cases
in the news, images of massacres, of people murdering their neighbours: all
the component elements of the Realms, the accesses of cruelty and brutality
that never seem to end. In fact, there’s a way in which his work is the
opposite of imaginative, being composed entirely from things that actually
existed: from newspaper reports or adverts; the desirable as well as
loathsome elements of our own elaborate social world. Ours is the culture of
sexualised little girls and armed men. Darger simply thought to put them
together, to let them freely interact.
*
Even Darger’s hoarding changes aspect when considered in terms of larger
social forces. A few weeks after my stint in the archive, I went briefly to
Chicago to see the replica of his room at Webster Street in INTUIT, the
museum of outsider art. It was smaller than I’d expected, cordoned behind a
scarlet rope. I thought the attendant would stay to supervise while I craned on
tiptoes, but to my surprise they unhooked the clip and left me there alone.
It was very dark inside. Everything was covered in a fine black powder,
maybe charcoal dust or grime. The walls were painted an oily brown and
covered in Darger’s pictures, including many hand-coloured portraits of the
Vivian Girls. There were stacks of scrap books and magazines, boxes of
cutting blades, brushes, buttons, pen knives and coloured pens. But what
really caught my attention were two things: a table piled high with paints and
crayons, many of them designed for children, and a laundry basket filled with
dirty balls of brown and silver string.
People who hoard are often socially withdrawn. Sometimes the hoarding
causes isolation, and sometimes it is a palliative to loneliness, a way of
comforting oneself. Not everyone is susceptible to the companionship of
objects; to the desire to keep and sort them; to employ them as barricades or
to play back and forth between expulsion and retention. On an autism
website, I’d come across a discussion on the subject, in which someone had
encapsulated the desire beautifully, writing: ‘Yes, very much a problem for
me and while I’m not sure if I personify objects I do tend to develop some
weird sort of loyalty to them and it’s difficult to dispose of them.’
Something of this sort was clearly going on with Darger, and yet the place
of poverty must also be considered: both in terms of the need to be thrifty
with resources and the physically confined space in which he lived. Despite
the dirt, despite the staring portraits of the Vivian Girls, their pupils
scratched out, it didn’t feel like the room of a mad person. It felt like the
room of someone poor, creative and resourceful, someone who must be
wholly self-reliant, who knows they won’t be getting anything from anyone
else, but must instead gather it for themself from among the discards, the
leavings of the city.
He worked his pencils down to stubs, fashioning lengthening devices out
of syringes to eke the last inch out. He hoarded rubber bands in old chocolate
boxes, mending them with tape rather than throwing them away. He made his
paints by pouring tempura into lids, often keeping great heaps of them
unused: a symbol of wealth, perhaps; a gesture of ownership and plenty. They
were neatly hand-labelled, sometimes conventionally – Rose Madder,
Oriental Turquoise Blue, Mauve, Cadmium Medium Red – and sometimes
with more personal or punning titles: Storm Cloud Purple or Seven not
heaven dark green colours.
The issue of space was also significant. The same pathologising rhetoric
that affects Darger is also active around the Chicago photographer and nanny
Vivian Maier. Like him, she worked in isolation, never showing her
photographs to anyone and often not even developing her film. In her
seventies, she was forced to go into hospital and could no longer afford the
upkeep on the locker where her possessions were stored. As is customary in
such cases, the contents were auctioned off, falling into the hands of at least
two collectors who understood the value of a street photography archive of
this quality and scale. Gradually, her 15,000 photographs are being
developed, exhibited and sold, commanding, like Darger’s work,
increasingly high prices, a queasy spectacle when the artists themselves were
so poor. Two documentaries have been made, piecing her life together by
interviewing the families for whom she worked.
All these people talk about her hoarding, the pack-rat way she went
through life. Watching, I couldn’t help but feel their reactions were at least
partly about money and social status; about who has the right to ownership
and what happens when people exceed the number of possessions that their
circumstance and standing would ordinarily allow. I don’t know about you
but if I was asked to put everything I own in a small room in someone else’s
house, I might well look like a hoarder. Although neither extreme poverty nor
wealth makes one immune to craving an excess of possessions, it’s worth
asking of any behaviour presented as weird or freakish whether the boundary
being transgressed is class, not sanity at all.
All the same, it would be foolish to suggest that Darger was not
undamaged by his past, not the subject of some kind of breach with the
external world. One of the strangest items I’d come across in the archive was
a medium sized notebook which had been labelled Predictions, June 1911 –
December 1917. It looked like an account book, with vertical pink columns
filled with a tiny, cramped hand. As I deciphered the entries, I realised it
represented an attempt to bargain with God, to make desired events take
place in the real world by threatening violence against the Christian
Angelinian forces in the Realms of the Unreal. These threats mostly
concerned lost manuscripts and pictures, which if not returned would be
avenged by dreadful losses in Darger’s imaginary war. Sometimes, though,
they involved more practical problems, which one might have thought
entirely divorced from the world of the Realms.
Grahams bank went to smash. Great sums of savings lost or threatening to be
lost. Loss inescapable . . . Either Vivian girls or Christian nations shall suffer
if money is not returned within January 1 1919. No mercy will be shown.
Or:
Christians will be saved now only if God permits me to gain the means of
owning property so that I can adopt children without suffering them the
dangers of unsupport. Only chance now left there will be no others under any
condition – conditions so serious that progress on manuscript is delayed.
The threat-making began when Darger lost a newspaper photograph of a
murdered child, Elsie Paroubek. In the wake of this apparently cataclysmic
loss, Darger began his campaign against God. Some of his protests were
carried out in the real world of Chicago – refusing, for example, to attend
mass for four full years. The majority of his struggle, however, took place in
the counter-world of the Realms. He sent avatars of himself, alter-egos like
General Henry Joseph Darger, into the war on the side of the wicked
Glandelinians. Worse, he tipped the scales of the conflict, making the
Glandelinians win battle after battle, torturing and killing hundreds of
thousands of child slaves, before cutting their bodies to pieces, so that the
ground for miles around was covered in a hellish array of human organs:
hearts, livers, stomachs and intestines.
Was God watching? How could he look away? But perhaps he didn’t exist
at all or was already dead – a nightmarish, blasphemous thought that Darger
had one of the pious Vivian Girls put into words, sobbing over the desolating
notion of arriving to an empty heaven, of inhabiting a universe devoid of
other beings. If there was no God, then Darger really was completely alone.
Commit atrocities, become a windmill of slaughter: anything to get the
attention of the divine eye, to prove that at least one being was aware of him,
and felt his presence to be significant.
It’s not easy to make sense of this material, not just because of its extreme
violence, but also because of the blurring of the distinction between the real
and unreal, the sense that the two have become conflated or fused. Was the
war in the Realms a way of letting violent impulses spill over without
harming any actual human beings? If so, this would suggest that it was safely
fictional, a contained place. On the other hand, does the book of threats
reveal a genuine belief that what happened in the Realms counted in the
universe at large; that it could in fact alter the heart of God?
It seems to be the latter, judging from a document Darger made in 1930. On
a piece of paper, he’d typed a kind of self-interview about why his desire to
adopt a child had been unsuccessful, despite praying consistently for thirteen
years. It was apparent from his questions that he hadn’t done anything
practical to achieve his aim. Instead, he was trying to force God’s hand by
his behaviour in the Realms. ‘Is his threat about making the Christians lose
the war if it is not answered anything to do with it?’ he asked himself, though
the only answer given is an enigmatic letter C.
This is obviously not what one could call sane behaviour. It suggests a
breach in object relations, an inability to understand the proper workings of
the world, to be able to differentiate reliably between the internal and the
external, the boundaries between self and other, imaginary and actual. At the
same time it seemed to me entirely understandable that someone so wholly
impotent and isolated in their own life might begin to construct a
compensatory universe, populated by powerful figures, in which all the
disordered and tumultuous feelings – the grief and longing, the terrible rage –
could be permitted range and scope.
Was it possible that creating the Realms could be a healthy urge, a way of
containing and controlling the disorderliness, the threatening psychic
disarray? I couldn’t stop thinking about the way Darger had ended his
memoir, the history of his life, by talking for thousands of pages about the
destruction caused by a tornado: a great gout of words that attested simply to
monumental destruction, to things smashed to smithereens by wild forces, the
pieces scattered far and wide.
The notion of a psyche that is broken into bits is central to the
psychoanalyst Melanie Klein’s theory of loneliness. Klein is often
misunderstood or mocked by the too literal-minded, with her talk of good and
bad breasts, but of all Freud’s heirs, she is the most adept at conjuring the
dark world of the psyche, its competing impulses and sometimes damaging
defence mechanisms. In 1963, while Harlow was locking monkeys into
isolation chambers, Klein published the paper ‘On the Sense of Loneliness’.
In it, she applied her theories of ego development to the condition of
loneliness, particularly ‘the sense of being alone regardless of external
circumstances’.
Klein believed that loneliness was not just a desire for external sources of
love, but also for an experience of wholeness, what she termed ‘an
unattainable perfect internal state’. It was unattainable in part because it was
based on the lost loveliness of the infantile experience of gratification, of
being understood without the need for words, and in part because the internal
landscape of everyone will always be comprised to some degree of warring
objects, of unintegrated fantasies of destruction and despair.
In Klein’s model of development the infantile ego is dominated by splitting
mechanisms, dividing its impulses into good and bad and projecting them
outward into the world, separating it too into good and bad objects. This
splitting derives from a desire for security, preserving the good ego from
destructive impulses. In ideal conditions, the infant moves towards
integration (towards being the operative word: in Klein’s seasoned vision
full and permanent integration is never a possibility), but conditions are not
always ideal for the painful process of reuniting the warring impulses of love
and hatred. A weak or damaged ego cannot integrate, because it is too afraid
of being overwhelmed by destructive feelings, which threaten to endanger or
annihilate the prized and carefully preserved good object.
To get stuck in what Klein termed the paranoid-schizoid position (itself a
normal stage of childhood development) is to experience the world in
irreconcilable pieces, and to find oneself likewise in bits. In the most
extreme manifestations of this state, such as one might see in schizophrenia, a
grave co-mingling takes place, so that needful parts of the psyche are lost or
scattered and unwanted or despised parts of the world forcefully injected
into the self.
‘It is generally supposed,’ Klein writes:
. . . that loneliness can derive from the conviction that there is no person or
group to which one belongs. This not belonging can be seen to have a much
deeper meaning. However much integration proceeds, it cannot do away with
the feeling that certain components of the self are not available because they
are split off and cannot be regained. Some of these split-off parts . . . are
projected into other people, contributing to the feeling that one is not in full
possession of one’s self, that one does not fully belong to oneself or,
therefore, to anybody else. The lost parts too, are felt to be lonely.
Loneliness here is a longing not just for acceptance but also for integration. It
arises out of an understanding, however deeply buried or defended against,
that the self has been broken into fragments, some of which are missing, cast
out into the world. But how do you put the broken pieces back together? Isn’t
that where art comes in (yes, says Klein), and in particular the art of collage,
the repetitive task, day by day and year by year, of soldering torn or sundered
images together?
I was thinking a lot at the time about glue, how it functions as a material.
Glue is powerful. It holds fragile structures together and stops things getting
lost. It allows the depiction of images that are illicit or hard to access, like
the homemade pornography David Wojnarowicz used to make as a child from
Archie cartoons, taking a razor and turning Jughead’s nose into a penis; that
sort of thing. Later, he used to wheatpaste discarded supermarket ads on
walls and hoardings in the East Village, on to which he’d spray-painted
stencils of his own design, making his visions adhere to the skin of the city,
its outward shell. Later still, he worked intensely with collage, bringing
together disparate images – fragments of maps, pictures of animals and
flowers, scenes from pornographic magazines, scraps of text, the haloed head
of Jean Cocteau – to construct the complicated and densely symbolic
paintings of his maturity.
But collage can also be dangerous work. In 1960s London, the playwright
Joe Orton and his boyfriend Kenneth Halliwell started stealing library books
and giving them weird new covers: a tattooed man on John Betjeman’s
poems; a leering monkey’s face grimacing from a flower on the Collins
Guide to Roses. For this crime of aesthetic transgression they were sent to
prison for six months.
Like Wojnarowicz, they understood the rebellious power of glue, the way
it lets you reconstruct the world. In their tiny bedsit in Islington, Halliwell
painstakingly covered all the walls in a fantastically elaborate and
sophisticated collage, cutting up Renaissance art books to create surreal
friezes, face after regarding face rising above the bookcase, the desk and the
gas fire. It was in this room that he beat Orton to death with a hammer on 9
August 1967, in a frenzy of loneliness and fear of abandonment, splattering
the collaged wall with blood before killing himself by drinking grapefruit
juice laced with sleeping pills.
Halliwell’s act demonstrates just how potent and destructive the forces
Klein identified can be, and what it means to be truly overwhelmed by them.
But this is not what happened to Henry Darger. He didn’t hurt another person,
not in actuality. What he did instead was dedicate his life to making images
in which the forces of good and evil could be brought together, into a single
field, a single frame. It mattered to him, this act of integration, of devoted
labour, of taken care. The reparative impulse, Klein called it: a process that
she believed involved enjoyment, gratitude, generosity; perhaps even love.

6
AT THE BEGINNING OF THE END OF THE WORLD
SOMETIMES, ALL YOU NEED IS permission to feel. Sometimes, what causes the
most pain is actually the attempt to resist feeling, or the shame that grows up
like thorns around it. During my lowest period in New York, almost the only
thing I found consoling was watching music videos on YouTube, curled on
the sofa with my headphones on, listening again and again to the same voices
finding the register for their distress. Antony and the Johnsons’ miraculous,
grieving ‘Fistful of Love’, Billie Holiday’s ‘Strange Fruit’, Justin Vivian
Bond’s triumphant ‘In the End’, Arthur Russell singing ‘Love Comes Back’,
with its lovely permissive refrain, being sad is not a crime.
It was during this period that I first came across Klaus Nomi, mutant
chantant, who made an art of being an alien, like no one else on earth. He
had one of the most extraordinary voices I’d ever heard, soaring through the
registers, a counter-tenor assaulting electro-pop. Do you know me, he sings.
Do you know me now. His appearance was as bewitching as his voice:
small, with an elfin face, his delicate features accentuated by make-up, his
skin powdered white, his widow’s peak sharply delineated into a bootblack
fin, his lips painted in a black cupid’s bow. He didn’t look like a man or a
woman but something else entirely, and in his music he seemed to give voice
to absolute difference, to what it is like to be the only one of your kind.
I watched his videos repeatedly. There were five of them: 1980s New
Wave fantasias with their crudely magical effects. A hyperstylised cover of
‘Lightning Strikes’, in which he was dressed as a space-age Weimar puppet,
all set for a cabaret on Mars. The same wonderful falsetto, the same
strangely touching artificiality: the face now deadpan, now mystified, now
sinister, now emphatic, a robot trying human emotions on for size. In ‘Simple
Man’, he prowls the city as a private detective, then walks into a cocktail
party in his alien getup, clinking glasses with glamorous women, singing all
the while a refrain about never being lonely again.
Who was he? What was he? His real name, I discovered, was Klaus
Sperber, and he was a German immigrant to New York City who became a
star of the downtown scene and then briefly the world in the late 1970s and
early 1980s. ‘I might as well look as alien as possible,’ he once said of his
idiosyncratic appearance, ‘because it reinforces a point I am making. My
whole thing is that I approach everything as an absolute outsider. It’s the only
way I can break so many rules.’
Sperber was an outsider par excellence, a gay immigrant who didn’t quite
fit even in the world of fabulous misfits that was the East Village. He was
born in January 1944 in Immenstadt, near the border with Lichtenstein, during
the final throes of the Second World War. He learned to sing by listening to
records of Maria Callas and Elvis, but his beautiful voice was against him.
He was a counter-tenor at a period when there was no place for male
counter-tenors within the closed, conservative world of opera. For a while,
he worked as an usher at the Deutsche Oper in West Berlin, and then in 1972
he moved to New York, settling on St Mark’s Place, just as Warhol had
before him.
In another YouTube video, a snippet from a French television interview, he
lists all the menial jobs he did back then: dishwashing, delivery boy,
delivering flowers, cooking, chopping vegetables. Eventually he became a
pastry chef at the World Trade Center, work at which he was exceptionally
skilled. At the same time he began performing his idiosyncratic fusion of
opera and electro-pop in downtown clubs.
The film I liked best was of his very first appearance, at Irving Plaza on
15th Street in 1978, performing at a night called New Wave Vaudeville. He
appears on stage in a see-through plastic cape, with wings painted around his
eyes. A science-fiction figure, gender indeterminate, he opens his mouth and
out comes ‘Mon creur s’ouvre à ta voix’, my heart opens to your voice, from
Saint-Saëns’ Samson et Dalila. His voice is almost inhuman, climbing higher
and higher. La flèche est moins rapide à porter le trépas, que ne l’est ton
amante à voler dans tes bras. The arrow is less rapid in bringing death,
than is your lover to fly into your arms.
‘Holy shit’, someone shouts. There is a barrage of stray claps and cheers
from the audience, then total silence, total attention. He gazes unseeing, that
theatrical entranced Kabuki stare (the gaze that can cure epidemics, the gaze,
nirami, that makes the invisible visible), the sound pouring from him. Versemoi, verse-moi l’ivresse. Fill me, fill me with ecstasy. Then there is a series
of bangs and the stage fills with smoke. ‘I still get goose pimples when I
think about it,’ his friend and collaborator Joey Arias remembered. ‘It was
like he was from a different planet and his parents were calling him home.
When the smoke cleared, he was gone.’
Nomi’s career exploded from that moment. At first, his shows were put
together by a group of friends, who collaborated on writing songs, making
videos and creating costumes, developing together the Nomi universe, the
New Wave alien aesthetic. On 15 September 1979 he appeared with Arias as
backing singers for David Bowie on Saturday Night Live, both dressed in
robes by Thierry Mugler. There was an elaborate live show, growing
crowds, a tour of America.
Nomi wanted success, but he didn’t find it quite as fulfilling as he’d
expected. According to the testimony of Andrew Horn’s affecting 2004
documentary, The Nomi Song, the alien act arose in part from a refined and
hypermodern theatrical sensibility – that post-punk, Cold War infused
infatuation with the apocalypse and outer space – and in part from a genuine
sense of being freakishly other. As his friend, the painter Kenny Scharf, says
in the film: ‘Everyone was a freak, but he was a freak among the freaks. But
at the same time, he was a human being as well and I think he longed to have
a boyfriend, relationship, more like love.’ His manager Ray Johnson put it
even more strongly, observing that despite the sell-out shows, the crowds of
fans, it was apparent ‘you were witnessing one of the loneliest persons on the
earth’.
In the 1980s Nomi’s career shifted up a gear. He got a record deal, and
made two albums, Klaus Nomi and Simple Man, recorded with session
musicians, his old friends sidelined. Simple Man went gold in France and in
1982 he toured Europe, culminating in December with his last recorded
performance, at Eberhard Schoener’s Classic Rock Night in Munich, with a
full orchestra, in front of an audience of thousands.
Again, you can conjure it from the vaults. He walks with his stiff puppet’s
gait up the steps to the stage, dressed in a scarlet doublet and white ruff, his
legs very thin in black stockings and black heeled shoes, his face dead white,
even the palms of his hands unnaturally pale: an uncanny figure, stepping
straight from the court of King James II. He looks around him like a
sleepwalker, like someone beholding an apparition, his eyes staring from his
head. And then he starts to sing, of all things, the aria of the Cold Genius
from Purcell’s King Arthur, the song of a winter spirit summoned unwillingly
to life. Hands raised, his voice climbs stutteringly upward to the
accompaniment of strings, a weird mixture of dissonance and harmony.
What power art thou, who from below
Hast made me rise unwillingly and slow
From beds of everlasting snow?
See’st thou not how stiff, how stiff and wondrous old,
Far, far unfit to bear the bitter cold,
I can scarcely move or draw my breath?
Let me, let me freeze again to death.
I am not the first person to observe that there was a prophetic quality to these
words, or a depth of feeling to the performance that went far beyond Nomi’s
always sophisticated stagecraft. He sings the last line three times, and then,
as the orchestra plays the final bars, he descends from the stage, a small, very
upright figure, moving almost painfully in his gorgeous, anachronistic
clothes.
It was evident that something was very wrong when he returned to New
York at the beginning of 1983. In an interview with Attitude magazine Joey
Arias describes his appearance. ‘He was always thin. But I remember him
walking into a party looking like a skeleton. He was complaining of flu and
exhaustion, and the doctors couldn’t diagnose what was wrong with him.
Later he had breathing difficulties and collapsed, and he was taken into
hospital.’
At the hospital, Nomi’s immune system was found to be practically nonfunctioning, making him susceptible to a myriad of normally uncommon
infections. His skin was covered in sore and unsightly purple lesions – the
reason he’d worn the ruff in Munich. It was diagnosed as Kaposi’s sarcoma,
a rare and usually indolent skin cancer. Rare, that is, until 1981, when
doctors in California and New York began seeing virulent cases among
young gay men. Like Nomi, these men were suffering from an underlying
immune disease so new that it had only been named the previous summer, on
27 July 1982: Acquired Immune Deficiency Syndrome, or AIDS, also known
at the time as GRID, Gay-Related Immune Deficiency.
Gay cancer, most people were calling it, or else gay plague, though it was
increasingly being observed in other populations too. There was no
treatment, and the cause, the Human-Immunodeficiency Virus, wouldn’t be
identified until 1986. AIDS wasn’t fatal in itself, but left the person
susceptible to opportunistic infections, many of them previously unusual or
mild in humans. Candidiasis, cytomegalovirus, herpes simplex,
mycobacterium, pneumocystis, salmonella, toxoplasmosis, cryptococcosis,
bringing with them blindness, wasting, pneumonia, sickness.
Nomi was prescribed Interferon for the Kaposi’s sarcoma, but it didn’t
help. He went on a macrobiotic diet and spent much of that spring at home in
his apartment on St Mark’s Place, watching his own old videos on repeat. If
they saw my face, he sings in ‘Nomi Song’, would they still know me now –
another line that shifts its meaning. In the summer he went back into
Memorial Sloan Kettering Cancer Center. Arias again:
He began to look like a monster: his eyes were just purple slits, he was
covered in spots and his body was totally wasted. I had a dream that he’d
recover his strength and go back on stage, but that he’d have to veil himself
like the Phantom of the Opera. He laughed, he liked that idea, and he actually
seemed to be getting better for a while. That was on a Friday night. I was
going to go and see him again on the Saturday morning, but they called me
and told me that Klaus had passed away in the night.
The story of Nomi’s short life haunted me. To resist loneliness, to make a
joyous art of difference, and then to die in such profoundly isolating
circumstances seemed brutally unfair, though it would soon be a common
experience in the world he had inhabited. What did it mean to have AIDS at
that time, when diagnosis was an almost certain death sentence? It meant
being perceived as a monster, an object of terror even to medical personnel.
It meant being trapped in a body that was regarded as repellent, toxic,
unpredictable and dangerous. It meant being shunned by society, subject to
pity, disgust and horrified fear.
In The Nomi Song, there is a distressing section in which Klaus’s friends
discuss the climate that surrounded his diagnosis. Man Parrish, his long-term
collaborator: ‘A lot of people took off. They didn’t know how to deal with it.
I didn’t know how to deal with it. Is this something I could catch? Does he
have typhoid or the plague? You heard rumours. You heard stuff in the
underground. No one knew what was going on.’ Page Wood, the art director
of Nomi’s stage shows: ‘I remember seeing him at dinner and usually I’d go
over and give Klaus a hug, and give him a European kiss on each cheek. And,
I was just afraid to. I didn’t know if this was contagious . . . I sort of went up
to him and I hesitated, and he just put his hand on my chest and said “It’s
alright, don’t worry about it,” which made me start to tear up and I think that
was the last time that I saw him.’
These responses were by no means uncommon. The intense fear generated
by AIDS was in part an understandable reaction to a new and rapidly fatal
disease. This is especially true of the very early years, in which both cause
and mode of transmission were undetermined. Could it be spread by saliva?
What about surfaces on the subway? Was it safe to hug a friend? Could you
breathe the same air as a sick colleague? These are reasonable questions to
ask, but fear of infection rapidly became entangled with more insidious
concerns.
Between 1981 and 1996, when combination therapy became available,
over 66,000 people died of AIDS in New York City alone, many of them gay
men, in conditions of the most horrifying isolation. People were sacked from
jobs and rejected by their families. Patients were left to die on gurneys in
hospital corridors, assuming they’d managed to get admitted in the first
place. Nurses refused to treat them, funeral parlours to bury their bodies,
while politicians and religious leaders persistently blocked funding and
education.
What was happening was a consequence of stigmatisation, the brutal
process by which society works to dehumanise and exclude people who are
perceived not to fit, who exhibit unwanted behaviours, attributes and traits.
As Erving Goffman explains in his landmark 1963 study, Stigma: Notes on
the Management of Spoiled Identity, the word stigma derives from the
Greek and was originally coined to describe a system of ‘bodily signs
designed to expose something unusual and bad about the moral status of the
signifier’. These marks, which were burnt or cut into the flesh, at once
advertised and confirmed the bearer’s status as an outcast, with whom
contact must be avoided for fear of infection or pollution.
Over time, usage expanded to refer to any signifier of unwanted difference
– unwanted, that is, by society at large. A source of stigma might be visible
or invisible, but once identified it acts to discredit and devalue the person in
others’ eyes, revealing them not only as different but as actively inferior,
‘reduced . . . from a whole and usual person to a tainted, discounted one’.
You can see this process at work in the way that Henry Darger’s eccentric
behaviours led to his institutionalisation, or in the treatment received by
Valerie Solanas after she was released from prison; even in the way that
Warhol was excluded from galleries for seeming too camp, too gay.
AIDS, especially in the early years, primarily affected three groups: gay
men, Haitians and intravenous drug users. As such, it served to inflame
existing stigma, amplifying already entrenched homophobia, racism and
contempt for addicts. As these previously discountable populations became
simultaneously hyper-visible, outed by the ravages of AIDS-related
infections, and apparently lethal, the carriers of a potentially fatal disease,
they were confirmed as people to be protected from, rather than people who
required care and treatment.
Then there was the matter of sickness itself. Stigma frequently attaches to
disorders of the physical body, especially if they affect or draw attention to
regions that are already considered shameful, or that are required to be in
pristine condition. As Susan Sontag observes in her 1989 book AIDS and Its
Metaphors, stigma tends to accompany conditions that alter physical
appearance, particularly the face, the signifier of identity – one of the reasons
that leprosy, though notably hard to transmit, has been regarded almost
universally with such unconcealed horror, and that the lesions spreading over
Nomi’s face had been so devastating.
Stigma is also at work around sexually transmitted diseases, particularly
those that spread via what a society has designated as deviant or shameful
sexual practices. In America of the 1980s, this chiefly meant sex between
men, especially if it involved promiscuity or anal sex, a practice that
Reagan’s Health Secretary throughout the AIDS years, Margaret Heckler,
was shocked to discover existed, and which the White House press secretary
found hysterically amusing to contemplate whenever a journalist did succeed
in raising the subject.
With this dismal material in mind, it’s not hard to see why people with
AIDS were the target of so much fear and hatred, such irradiating dislike.
Objects of stigma are always understood to be somehow polluting or
contaminating, and these fears fuelled AIDS panic, with its fantasies around
quarantine and exclusion, its anxieties about contact and spread.
Then there’s the issue of blame. In the grip of this peculiarly malign kind
of magical thinking, there is a tendency to believe that the stigmatised
condition isn’t random, a matter of chance, but is instead somehow deserved
or earned, a consequence of moral failing in the bearer. This is particularly
marked when it results from volitional behaviour, from what is construed as
individual choice, be it taking drugs, engaging in illicit activities or having
non-sanctioned sex.
With AIDS, this manifested as a widespread tendency to see the disease as
a moral judgement, a punishment for deviancy (something that is especially
visible in the rhetoric around its so-called innocent or blameless victims, the
haemophiliacs, and later the babies born of HIV-positive women). ‘There is
one, only one, cause of the AIDS crisis,’ Reagan’s former director of
communications Pat Buchanan announced in his syndicated column in 1987:
‘the wilful refusal of homosexuals to cease indulging in the immoral,
unnatural, unsanitary, unhealthy, and suicidal practice of anal intercourse,
which is the primary means by which the AIDS virus is being spread through
the “gay” community, and, thence, into the needles of IV drug abusers.’
Considering that stigmatisation is a process designed to deny contact, to
separate and shun; considering that it always serves to dehumanise and
deindividualise, reducing a person from a human being to the bearer of an
unwanted attribute or trait, it is not surprising that one of its main
consequences is loneliness, which is further accelerated by shame, the two
things amplifying and driving one another. Appalling enough to be critically
ill, to be exhausted, in pain and with limited mobility, without also becoming
literally untouchable, a monstrous body that should be quarantined, islanded
away from what is inevitably designated the normal population.
Added to this is the fact that AIDS stigmatised and made potentially lethal
habits of sexual practice that had themselves been the source of intimacy and
contact, antidotes to shame and isolation: the world that Wojnarowicz had
documented so lovingly in Close to the Knives. Now the piers, which Nomi
had also frequented, were increasingly being regarded as a site of danger, a
place of contact in the sense not of touch but of infection and transmission.
As the critic Bruce Benderson puts it in the essay ‘Towards the New
Degeneracy’, in his collection Sex and Isolation:
Then came the sledgehammer. AIDS simultaneously ruined my momentary
escape from a decent curtailed identity and smashed the idea I had of
promiscuity as an effortless expander of social consciousness. In the early
eighties, before it was known exactly how AIDS spread – before safer sex –
I was catapulted into a panicked loss of a principal means of self-expression
and contact with other humans. Now fucking casually meant more than a
flouting of middle-class standards and a mockery of middle class hygiene. It
meant illness and death – deterioration . . . Being part of the AIDS risk group
made me feel unclean, expendable and marginalized.
Bearing in mind that both loneliness and rejection are stressful experiences,
which have ravaging effects on the body, it’s shocking but not exactly
surprising to discover that being subject to stigma has a powerful physical
effect. In fact, psychologists at UCLA working on the relationship between
stigma and AIDS discovered that HIV-positive people who suffer social
rejection also experience accelerated HIV progression, both proceeding to
full-blown AIDS faster and dying more quickly from AIDS-related infections
that those who are not exposed to or who are protected from social rejection.
The mechanism here is broadly the same as in loneliness itself – a decline
in immune function due to ongoing exposure to the stress of being isolated or
rejected by the group. To make matters worse, the act of being closeted, of
needing to conceal a stigmatized identity, is also stressful and isolating, and
is likewise associated with a lower T cell count and consequently a greater
susceptibility to AIDS-related infections. In short, being stigmatised is not
just lonely, or humiliating, or shameful; it also kills.
Klaus Nomi died on 6 August 1983, a few weeks shy of his fortieth
birthday. Six weeks earlier, on 20 June, New York Magazine had run its first
AIDS cover story, ‘AIDS Anxiety’ by Michael Daly. It described the climate
of the time, the kind of reactions occurring across the city. A woman whose
husband had been diagnosed, and whose child was being shunned at school.
People who were asking if they should wear plastic gloves on the subway, or
avoid public swimming pools. Among these anecdotes is a description of a
police officer who ‘found herself frightened as she assisted a homosexual
who had injured his head in a fall’.
She remembers, ‘At first, you feel itchy. The blood was the same color red,
but I thought, “Oh, wow, I wonder if this guy’s got it.” Then I thought, “Oh
well, I can’t let this guy bleed to death.” It was like a leper or something.
You don’t treat people like that, but the fear is there. I found myself scrubbing
with peroxide.’
This was not, to reiterate, a person with AIDS, but rather a person from a
population that had become doubly suspect; a member, as Sontag put it, of ‘a
community of pariahs’. In the same article another woman described the
death of the male model Joe MacDonald: how he’d wasted away, how all the
gay men she knew were thinking of going straight, how her model friends
planned to avoid contact with brushes belonging to make-up artists they knew
to be gay.
Fear is contagious, converting latent prejudice into something more
dangerous. That same week, Andy Warhol recorded in his diary that at a
photo shoot, ‘I used my own make up after reading the AIDS piece in New
York.’ He’d known Joe personally, though their acquaintance hadn’t helped to
dispel the gathering frost, the outcast status. Back in February 1982, Andy
had avoided Joe at a party, telling the Diary: ‘I didn’t want to be near him
and talk to him because he just had gay cancer’ – the past tense a painful
reminder of the brief period in which no one even knew that the infection
was permanent, the disease incurable.
Warhol’s diaries of the 1980s are full of scenes like this, manifestations of
the poisonous currents of paranoia that were circling the city. Always a
mirror of society’s concerns, his entries reflect back the ways in which
homophobia and hypochondria had begun to intertwine.
11 May, 1982:
The New York Times had a big article about gay cancer, and how they don’t
know what to do with it. That it’s epidemic proportions and they say that
these kids who have sex all the time have it in their semen and they’ve
already had every kind of disease there is – hepatitis one, two, and three, and
mononucleosis, and I’m worried that I could get it by drinking out of the same
water glass or just being around these kids who go to the Baths.
24 June, 1984:
We went and watched the Gay Day parade . . . And there were guys in
wheelchairs being pushed by their lovers. I’m serious! It looked like
Halloween but without the costumes.
4 November 1985:
You know, I wouldn’t be surprised if they started putting gays in
concentration camps. All the fags will have to get married so they won’t have
to go away to camps. It’ll be like for a green card.
2 February, 1987:
Then they picked me up for the black-tie dinner at the Saint . . . And we were
all afraid to eat anything because the Saint has the gay taint from when it used
to be a gay disco. It was so dark there and they were serving the food on
black plates.
Lest it be forgotten, Warhol was himself a gay man, and in addition a major
supporter of AIDS charities. But his personal reactions demonstrate the ways
in which stigma spreads and gathers momentum, affecting even fellow
members of a stigmatised population.
Warhol was particularly susceptible to this process because of his lifelong
terror of sickness and disease, his obsession with contaminating bodies and
the dangers they present. In the grips of this peculiarly paralysing
hypochondria, he acted in ways that seem actively cruel, refusing to see or
even contact acquaintances, friends and former lovers who had or might have
AIDS. When he was told on the phone about the death of Mario Amaya, the
critic who was with him when he was shot and who insisted that the doctors
at the hospital restart his heart, he tried to make light of the news. And when
his own former boyfriend Jon Gould died of AIDS-related pneumonia in
September 1986, he absolutely refused to discuss the subject in the Diary,
announcing only that he would not comment on ‘the other news from L.A.’
In some ways his reaction is unique, a product of a fear of death so intense
that he didn’t attend his own mother’s funeral or tell even his closest friends
that she had died, saying instead whenever he was asked about her that she
was shopping in Bloomingdale’s. But it also encapsulates the way that stigma
functions to isolate and separate, especially when death comes out of the
dark and begins to serve its black plates.
*
Klaus Nomi was the first famous person to die of AIDS, but within a handful
of years the disease was running like wildfire through the community he came
from: the close-knit world of downtown New York, composed of artists,
composers, writers, performers, musicians. As the writer and activist Sarah
Schulman puts it in Gentrification of the Mind, her trenchant history of AIDS
and its consequences, the disease, at least in the early years,
disproportionately affected ‘risk-taking individuals living in oppositional
subcultures, creating new ideas about sexuality, art and social justice’. Many
were queer or otherwise antagonistic to the family values promoted by
conservative politicians, and though their work varies wildly, much of it,
even before the AIDS crisis, existed in resistance to the isolation that comes
from being marginalised or legislated against, made to feel not just different
but unwanted and irrelevant.
One of these people was the photographer Peter Hujar, who was
diagnosed with full-blown AIDS on 3 January 1987. Hujar was an old
acquaintance of Warhol’s, and had appeared in several of his Screen Tests,
as well as his film Thirteen Most Beautiful Boys. He was an exceptionally
talented photographer in his own right. Working always in black and white,
and moving fluidly between landscapes, portraits, nudes, animals and ruins,
his images possess a graveness, a formal perfection that is very rarely
attained.
As such, he was much in demand for fashion and studio work. He was
friends with the Vogue editor Diana Vreeland, and his subjects included
William Burroughs and Susan Sontag, the famous portrait of her lying on a
couch in a ribbed sweater, her hands behind her head. He was also
responsible for the picture of the Warhol Superstar Candy Darling on her
deathbed, surrounded by white roses, later the cover of Antony and the
Johnsons’ second album, I Am a Bird Now.
Hujar’s own work patrols something of the same milieu as that of another
friend, Diane Arbus. Both were drawn to drag queens and street people, to
those whose bodies and experiences were outside the norm. But while
Arbus’s work is sometimes alienating and estranging, Hujar looked at his
subjects with the eye of an equal, a fellow citizen. His gaze is just as steady,
but it has a deeper capacity for contact – the tenderness of an insider, rather
than the chilliness of a voyeur.
Despite his talent, Hujar was perpetually indigent, living on the very edge
of destitution in his loft on Second Avenue, above what is now the Village
East cinema, where I sometimes went to while away Saturday afternoons.
And despite his capacity for intimacy, his exceptional gifts at both listening
and speaking, let alone his promiscuous genius for sex, he was also
profoundly isolated, separate from the people around him. He’d flared up at
almost every magazine editor and gallerist in the city and fought with most if
not all of his wide and varied circle of friends, exploding into paroxysms of
terrifying anger. According to Stephen Koch, a close friend and later Hujar’s
executor, ‘Peter was probably the loneliest person I’ve ever met. He lived in
isolation, but it was a highly populated isolation. There was a circle drawn
around him that no one crossed.’
If anyone did manage to make it inside that circle, it was David
Wojnarowicz. Hujar was one of the most important people in David’s world:
first as a lover, and then as best friend, surrogate father, surrogate brother,
soulmate, mentor and muse. They’d met in a bar on Second Avenue back in
the winter of 1980, or perhaps early in 1981. The sexual aspect of their
relationship hadn’t lasted long, but the intensity of their connection never
slackened, though Hujar was almost twenty years older. Like David, he’d had
an abusive childhood in New Jersey, and like David he carried around a
reservoir of bitterness and rage.
Somehow, they got through each other’s defences (Stephen Koch again:
‘David became part of the circle. He was in it’). It was because of Hujar’s
interest and belief that David started to take himself seriously as an artist.
Hujar persuaded him to take up painting, insisting too that he stop dabbling
with heroin. His protection and love helped David step aside at least a little
from the burdens of his childhood.
Though they took multiple portraits of each other, the only image I’ve ever
seen of them together is by Nan Goldin, their mutual friend. They’re in the
corner of a dark room, standing side by side, their shirts flaring white in the
flash. David is smiling, his eyes closed behind big glasses, like a happy,
gawky kid. Peter is smiling too, his head tilted conspiratorially. They look at
ease, these two men who often weren’t.
In September 1987, Hujar went as he often did to a restaurant on 12th
Street, right next to his apartment. While he was eating, the owner came over
and asked if he was ready to pay. Sure, Peter said, but why? Bruno held out a
paper bag, saying: ‘You know why . . . just put your money in here.’ A minute
later he brought the change back in another paper bag, which he tossed on
Peter’s table.
This story comes from Close to the Knives, which in addition to
documenting the magical pre-AIDS world of the piers records the gathering
horror of the epidemic as it began to annihilate David’s world. When he
heard what had happened to Hujar, his first impulse was to go to the
restaurant and pour ten gallons of cow blood over the grill. Instead, he went
in at lunchtime, when the place was packed, and screamed at Bruno,
demanding an explanation, until ‘every knife and fork in the place stopped
moving. But even that wasn’t enough to erase this rage.’
It wasn’t just one intolerant restaurant owner that was making him feel
almost insane with fury. It was the way the sick were being dehumanised in
the eyes of others, reduced to infectious bodies against which people sought
to protect themselves. It was the politicians getting up bills to quarantine the
HIV positive in camps, and the newspaper columnists suggesting people be
tattooed with their infection status. It was the massive surge in homophobic
attacks, ‘the rabid strangers parading against AIDS clinics in nightly news
suburbs’. It was the governor of Texas saying, ‘If you want to stop AIDS
shoot the queers,’ and the mayor of New York running to a sink to wash his
hands after distributing cookies to children who had AIDS. It was your best
friend dying in front of your eyes, without a cure in sight, taking typhoid shots
made from human shit prescribed by a quack on Long Island to try and shock
his failing immune system into life.
Peter was terrified by the prospect of dying, and his terror made him
furious, livid at everyone and everything. After his diagnosis, David saw him
almost every day, visiting him at the loft or in hospital rooms high above the
city. He went with him on quixotic, exhausting errands to find faith healers
and doctors who promised miracle cures. He was there when Peter was ill,
and he was there at the Cabrini Medical Center when Peter died on 26
November 1987, at the age of fifty-three, only nine months after he’d
received his diagnosis.
After everyone left the room David closed the door, picked up his Super 8
camera and filmed Peter’s emaciated body, lying in a spotted gown on the
hospital bed. After he finished sweeping up and down, he got his camera and
took twenty-three photographs of Peter’s body, his feet and face, ‘that
beautiful hand with the hint of gauze at the wrist that held the i.v. needle, the
color of his hand like marble’.
Peter was here. Peter is gone. How to configure the transition or
translation, the monumental change? In the suddenly empty room he tried to
speak to whatever spirit was hovering, perhaps afraid, but found himself
unable to find the right words or make the needful gesture, saying at last
helplessly, ‘I want some kind of grace.’
In the reeling weeks that followed, he drove out to the Bronx Zoo to film
the Beluga whales in their tanks. The first time he went, the glass case had
been emptied for cleaning. Too much, this sign of absence. He got in his car
immediately and drove away, coming back later to capture the image that he
wanted: the whales rolling and drifting in circles, the light falling through the
water in grains and sheaves.
Later, he made a film for Hujar that was never finished, intercutting the
whales with the footage of Peter’s dead body on the hospital bed. I’d
watched it on a monitor in Fales Library, tears streaming down my face. The
camera moved tenderly, grievingly over Peter’s open eyes and mouth, his
bony, elegant hands and feet, a hospital bracelet looped around his skinny
wrist. Then white birds by a bridge, a moon behind clouds, a shoal of
something white moving very fast in the dark. The fragment ended with a reenactment of a dream: a shirtless man being passed through a chain of
shirtless men, his supine body slipping gently from hand to tender hand. Peter
held by his community, conducted between realms. David cut it with footage
of baggage on a carousel: movement again, but this time beyond the domain
of the human.
Peter’s was one death in a matrix of thousands of deaths; one loss among
thousands of losses. It makes no sense to consider it in isolation. It wasn’t
just individuals; it was a whole community that was under attack, subject to
an apocalypse that no one outside even seemed to notice, except to demonise
the dying. Klaus Nomi, yes, but also the musician and composer Arthur
Russell, the artist Keith Haring, the actress and writer Cookie Mueller, the
performance artist Ethyl Eichelberger, the artist and writer Joe Brainard, the
filmmaker Jack Smith, the photographer Robert Mapplethorpe, the artist
Félix González-Torres: these and thousands of others, all gone before their
time. ‘The beginning of the end of the world’, Sarah Schulman called it in the
opening sentence of her 1990 novel about AIDS, People in Trouble. No
wonder David described being filled with rage like a blood-filled egg, or
fantasised about growing to superhuman size and wreaking vengeance on the
people who considered his life and the lives of those he loved expendable.
A few weeks after Peter’s death, David’s partner, Tom Rauffenbart, found
out that he too had AIDS and in the spring of 1988 David was also
diagnosed. His immediate reaction was of intense loneliness. Love, he wrote
that day: love wasn’t enough to connect you, to ‘merge one’s body with a
society, tribe, lover, security. You’re on your own in the most confrontational
manner.’ He’d moved by then into Hujar’s loft on Second Avenue, was
sleeping in Hujar’s bed.
During the AIDS years he kept painting a repeating image of creatures
attached to one another by pipes or cords or roots, a foetus to a soldier, a
heart to a clock. His friends were sick, his friends were dying; he was in
deep grief, thrust face to face with his own mortality. Again and again with
his brush, painting the cords that tethered creatures together. Connection,
attachment, love: those increasingly imperilled possibilities. Later, he’d
express this urge in words, writing: ‘If I could attach our blood vessels so
we could become each other I would. If I could attach our blood vessels in
order to anchor you to the earth to this present time I would. If I could open
up your body and slip inside your skin and look out your eyes and forever
have my lips fused with yours I would.’
Though David’s first reaction was loneliness, how he chose to deal with
that feeling was to join forces, to make alliances and to fight for change; to
resist the silencing and isolation he’d suffered from lifelong; and to do it not
alone but in the company of others. In the plague years, he became deeply
involved in non-violent resistance, part of a community that was combining
art and activism into an astonishingly creative and potent force. There wasn’t
much to find inspiring about the AIDS crisis, except the way that it was
combated not by people contracting into couples or family groupings, but by
communal direct action.
Fight back: the idea was beginning to gain currency in the city that year.
Act up! Fight back! Fight AIDS! was one of the rallying cries of the direct
action group ACT UP, the AIDS Coalition to Unleash Power, which had been
established in New York in the spring of 1987, a few weeks, as it happened,
after Hujar’s diagnosis. Or I’ll never be silent again, which I remember
shouting on London Bridge during Gay Prides of my own childhood, perhaps
two or three years later.
David started attending ACT UP meetings in 1988, shortly after his
diagnosis. At its height, the group had thousands of members, and spawned
chapters across the globe. One of its greatest strengths was its diversity. You
don’t have to spend long reading the interviews in the ACT UP Oral History
Project to realise how complex it was, in terms of both membership and
agenda. It was emphatically heterogeneous, mixing gender, race, class and
sexuality, and organised not hierarchically but by consensus. Many of the
members were artists, among them Keith Haring, Todd Haynes, Zoe Leonard
and Gregg Bordowitz.
During the late 1980s and early 1990s, this group of people at the very
margins of society succeeded in forcing their country to change its treatment
of them: a reminder of how powerful collective action is as a force for
resisting the processes of isolation and stigmatisation. Among its many
successes, ACT UP persuaded the Food and Drug Administration, the F.D.A.,
to change the approval process for new drugs and to alter the protocols of
clinical trials so that they became accessible to addicts and women (who
couldn’t otherwise legitimately access experimental drugs, vital in an era in
which the only approved treatment was AZT, a drug so toxic many people
couldn’t tolerate it). It used sit-ins to force pharmaceutical companies to
lower the price of AZT, initially the most expensive drug ever launched;
organised a die-in of thousands during mass at St Patrick’s Cathedral to draw
attention to the Catholic Church’s stand against safe sex education in New
York public schools; and lobbied the Center for Disease Control to change
their definition of AIDS so that women as well as men were eligible for
Social Security benefits.
David attended many of these protests, including the October 1988
demonstration at the F.D.A., where he and fellow affinity group members
staged a die-in, clutching the styrofoam tombstones that would swiftly
become a staple at AIDS actions. In United in Anger, a documentary about
ACT UP made by two surviving members, Sarah Schulman and the
filmmaker Jim Hubbard, he can periodically be seen standing amongst a
crowd, identifiable by his height and by the jacket that he wore, on the back
of which was printed a pink triangle and the words IF I DIE OF AIDS –
FORGET BURIAL – JUST DROP MY BODY ON THE STEPS OF THE
F.D.A.
Making even the clothes on your back communicate: during those years,
David fused language and image, using every means at his disposal –
photography, writing, painting and performance – as a way of bearing
witness to his times. In April 1989, he was featured in Silence = Death, a
documentary about activism in New York in the early years of the epidemic
made by the German filmmaker Rosa von Praunheim. He appears repeatedly:
a tall, rangy man in glasses, wearing a white t-shirt hand-painted with the
words FUCK ME SAFE. He stands in his apartment, talking in a deep
agitated voice about how it feels to live with homophobia and hypocritical
politicians, to watch your friends die and to know that your own body
contains the virus that will kill you.
What’s striking about this film is not just the intensity of his anger, but the
depth of his analysis. In an era in which people with AIDS tended to be
portrayed as helpless and isolated, dying wasted and alone, he refuses the
identity of victim. Instead, he sets about explaining, in rapid, lucid sentences,
how the virus reveals another kind of sickness, at work inside the system of
America itself.
David’s work had always been political. Even before AIDS, he’d dealt
with sexuality and difference: with what it’s like to live in a world that
despises you, to be subject every single day of your life to hatred and
contempt, enacted not just by individuals but by the supposedly protective
structures of society itself. AIDS confirmed his suspicions. As he put it in
both the film and Close to the Knives: ‘My rage is really about the fact that
when I was told that I’d contracted this virus it didn’t take me long to realise
that I’d contracted a diseased society as well.’
One of the strongest of his explicitly political art works is ‘One Day This
Kid’, which he made in 1990. It shows David at the age of eight, a
reproduction of the only childhood photograph he had. He’s grinning, a little
all-American boy in a check shirt, jug-eared, his teeth enormous. Running
either side of his head are two columns of text. ‘One day politicians will
enact legislation against this kid,’ it begins:
One day families will give false information to their children and each child
will pass that information down generationally to their families and that
information will be designed to make existence intolerable for this kid . . .
This kid will be faced with electro-shock, drugs, and conditioning therapies
in laboratories . . . He will be subject to loss of home, civil rights, jobs, and
all conceivable freedoms. All this will begin to happen in one or two years
when he discovers he desires to place his naked body on the naked body of
another boy.
It was his story, but it was also the story of his community, of a whole strata
of America, of the world itself. The piece’s power derives from the way it
scrapes away at the accretions of stigma, the poisonous mess civilisation has
made out of sex. It returns to basics, to the first small flowering of adolescent
desire, to what I am tempted to spell as innocence or purity, had those words
not been so thoroughly co-opted by conservatives. All that isolation, all that
violence and fear and pain: it was the consequence of wishing to make
contact by way of the body. The body, the naked body, burdened and
miraculous, all too soon food for flies. Raised Catholic, David placed what
faith he had in redemption here. As he said elsewhere, smell the flowers
while you can.
*
Innocence, what a joke. In 1989, David got caught up in one of the most
gruelling and public battles of the culture wars, when some of his collages,
which contained miniature photographs of sexual activity, were used by the
American Family Association, a right-wing, fundamental Christian lobbying
group, in an attempt to discredit the funding decisions of the National
Endowment of the Arts. In the end, he took the A.F.A. to court for using his
images out of context, winning a landmark case about how an artist’s work
can be reproduced and used.
In his testimony from the trial, which I’d read at Fales, he talked with an
intense eloquence about his paintings, explaining the context and meaning of
all their intricate parts. In addition, he addressed the use of explicit imagery
in his work, telling the judge:
I use images of sexuality . . . to deal with what I have experienced, and the
fact that I think sexuality and the human body should not be a taboo subject
this late in the 20th century. I also use images of sexuality to portray the
diversity of people, and their sexual orientations, and one of the biggest
reasons I feel uncomfortable about the idea of the human body being a taboo
subject is that, had the human body not been a taboo subject in this decade, I
might have gotten the information from the Health Department, from elected
representatives, that would have spared me having contracted this virus.
After the trial, after that gruelling and stressful brush with censorship, he
made a book about sex. Memories That Smell Like Gasoline combines
fragments of memoir with watercolour drawings and sketches of people in
porn cinemas. He wanted to celebrate the old wildness before it vanished
altogether, though he was also adamant about the need for safer sex.
In fact, sometimes the recklessness of people in the cinemas appalled him.
In one essay he talked about going in immediately after visiting a friend in
hospital, and being shocked by the riskiness of the behaviour on display. He
fantasised then about filming his friend’s face, covered in lesions, his newly
blind eyes, dragging in a projector and hooking it up with copper cables to a
car battery and projecting the film on to the dark wall above everybody’s
heads. ‘I didn’t want to ruin their evening,’ he wrote, ‘just wanted maybe to
keep their worlds from narrowing down too far.’ Denial was always David’s
target, whether that meant right-wing preachers who couldn’t abide talk of
sex or hedonists who didn’t want to admit to the possibility of death.
Memories was packed tight with his own sexual experiences, among them
the story of how he’d been violently raped as a boy. The memory of this
terrifying afternoon had come back to him when he’d happened to pass the
guy in a cinema. It was decades later, but he was still instantly recognisable,
his skin somehow greyish, like something manufactured, something dead.The
incident had happened when he was hitching back from swimming in a lake
in New Jersey, his clothes still drenched. The man had tied him up and raped
him in the back of a red pick-up truck, shoving a wad of mud and sand in his
mouth and battering him repeatedly. He thought he was going to die: saw in a
flash his own body drenched in lighter fuel and seared like a side of beef, to
be found by hikers tossed in a ditch. Seeing the man again, he was so
overcome that he felt like he was being bled, like he’d been shrunk back to
the size of a boy, like he’d lost the faculty of speech.
And yet, despite holding dozens of these experiences inside himself, he
could still celebrate the act of sex, the act of opening consensually to another
body, another psyche. He was nauseous a lot the year that he worked on
Memories, sitting at his cluttered kitchen table, chain-smoking, thinking over
all those anonymous acts. But sex wasn’t responsible for his sickness. It was
the route of transmission, yes, but as he kept on saying, the virus didn’t have
a moral code, unlike the decision makers who wilfully blocked education
and funding, who kept allowing the disease to spread.
As he got sicker, as he felt increasingly more weary and more ill, he began
to cut himself off from people, to hole up in Hujar’s loft, as he still called it,
hiding away from the world. He’d started writing in his diary again, logging
dreams about machinery gone wrong, about abandoned animals that needed
to be rescued and cared for. Two baby birds left on a sidewalk in Times
Square. A tarantula that someone was dropping from a great height, not
realising they die if they’re subjected to a fall. He dreamt of kissing a guy
with Kaposi’s, and of finding an apartment full of natural history books, their
pages richly embellished with pictures of snakes and turtles. He wished he’d
known the man who lived there, who shared his interests but also had money
and a family. ‘He’s loved,’ he wrote in his journal the next day, and
underlined the words.
The overwhelming sensation in that period was loneliness: the same
loneliness he’d felt at the moment of his diagnosis, the same loneliness he’d
felt as a kid, abandoned into one perilous situation or another. No one could
touch the burdens he was lugging around; no one could help him with his
feelings of need or paralysing fear. ‘David has a problem,’ he wrote bitterly
in his journal, ‘he feels pain being alone but can’t stand most people. How
the fuck do you solve that?’
In his final piece of published writing, the essay that ends Memories, he
wrote about how he was feeling increasingly invisible, how he was starting
to hate people for being unable to see where he was, beyond the blunt fact of
his body, which still looked healthy enough from the outside. He’d gone, he
thought; he’d ceased to exist. There was a vaguely familiar shell, but inside
there was nothing: a stranger people kept thinking they recognised or knew.
He’d always hated the way AIDS activism insisted on positivity, on
refusing to admit the possibility of death. Now he poured it all out: the
absolute isolation of being terminally ill. He was thirty-six that year. He was
a deeply gregarious man, an inveterate collaborator whose letters, diaries,
packed phone logs and answering machine tapes attest to how deeply loved
he was, how committed to friendship, how embedded in his community. And
yet:
I am glass, clear empty glass . . . No gesture can touch me. I’ve been dropped
into all this from another world and I can’t speak your language any longer
. . . I feel like a window, maybe a broken window. I am a glass human. I am a
glass human disappearing in the rain. I am standing among all of you waving
my invisible arms and hands. I am shouting my invisible words . . . I am
disappearing. I am disappearing but not fast enough.
Invisibility and speechlessness, ice and glass: the classic imagery of
loneliness, of being cut off. Later, these extraordinary words appeared again
on the final spread of 7 Miles a Second, a graphic novel about David’s life
made in collaboration with his friends, the artists James Romberger and
Marguerite Van Cook.
The image on the facing page shows Hujar’s loft from the street outside, a
Hopperesque perspective. It’s evening. The sky, in Van Cook’s exquisitely
lurid watercolours, is turning navy, the side of the building going up in flames
of rose and gold. A mailbox, sheets of newspaper blowing down the street.
The windows of the loft are glowing, but there’s no one visible behind the
glass. NYC 1993, it says at the bottom of the page, which is to say at least six
months after David died up there, on 22 July 1992, in the company of his
lover, his family and friends, one of the 194,476 people killed by AIDSrelated infections in America that year.
*
I’d been haunting the Wojnarowicz archive at NYU ever since I first saw the
Rimbaud photograph. Some weeks I went in every day to look through his
diaries or listen to his audio journals. Everything David made was touching,
but those tapes articulated feelings of such rawness that it was devastating to
hear them. And yet, as with Nomi’s singing, I found the act of listening
somehow alleviated my own sense of loneliness, simply because I could hear
someone voicing their pain, giving space to their difficult and humiliating
feelings.
Many were recorded on waking, or in the middle stretches of the night.
Often you can hear car horns and sirens, people talking on the street outside.
Then David’s deep voice, struggling upward out of sleep. He talks about his
work and his sexuality and sometimes he walks to the window, opens the
curtains, and reports on what he sees there. A man in the apartment opposite,
combing his hair beneath a bare bulb. A dark-haired stranger standing
outside the Chinese laundry, who meets his eyes and doesn’t look away. He
talks about what dying will feel like, about whether it will be frightening or
painful. He says he hopes it will be like slipping into warm water and then
on the crackling tape he starts to sing: low plaintive notes, rising and falling
over the surf of morning traffic.
One night, he wakes after a bad dream and switches on the machine to talk
it out. He’s dreamt about a horse being caught in some train tracks, its spine
broken, unable to escape. ‘It was very much alive,’ he says, ‘and it was just
so fucking upsetting to see this thing.’ He describes how he tried to free it,
and how instead it was dragged into a wall and skinned alive. ‘I haven’t the
faintest idea what it means for me. And I feel horror and a very deep sadness
about something. Whatever the tone of the dream carries it was just so sad
and so shocking.’ He says goodbye then, and shuts off the machine.
Something alive, something alive and lovely caught and damaged in the
mechanisms, the gears and rails of society. When I thought about AIDS, when
I thought about the people who have died, and the conditions they
experienced; when I thought about those who have survived and who carry
inside themselves a decade of mourning, a decade of missing people, I
thought of David’s dream. When I cried while listening to the tapes, which I
did periodically, surreptitiously wiping my eyes on my sleeve, it wasn’t just
out of sadness, or pity. It was out of rage that this courageous, sexy, radical,
difficult, immensely talented man died at the age of thirty-seven, that I lived
in a world in which this kind of mass death had been permitted, in which
nobody in a position of power had stopped the train and freed the horse in
time.
Wojnarowicz articulated a sense of being not just outside society, but
actively antagonistic to its strictures, its intolerance of different life-forms.
‘The pre-invented world’, he’d started calling it, the pre-invented existence
of mainstream experience, which seems benign, even banal, its walls almost
invisible until you are crushed against them. All his work was an act of
resistance against this dominating force, driven by a desire to contact and
inhabit a deeper, wilder mode of being. The best way he’d found to fight was
to make public the truths of his own life, to create work that resisted
invisibility and silence; the loneliness that comes from having your existence
denied, from being written out of history, which after all belongs to the
normal and not to the stigmatised.
In Close to the Knives, he set out very clearly what he thought a work of
art could do, writing:
To place an object or writing that contains what is invisible because of
legislation or social taboo into an environment outside myself makes me feel
not so alone; it keeps me company by virtue of its existence. It is kind of like
a ventriloquist’s dummy – the only difference is that the work can speak by
itself or act like that ‘magnet’ to attract others who carried this enforced
silence.
These feelings about the public and the private informed his thinking about
death, too. He didn’t want a memorial, his friends weeping or too numb to
weep in another anonymous room. He didn’t want his or anyone’s death to be
abstract, to pass by unnoticed in the world at large. At the memorials he’d
been attending with increasing frequency over the past few years, he’d
sometimes felt the urge to run screaming into the streets, to force every single
passing stranger to see the destruction that was taking place.
He wanted to find a way to make each loss tangible, to make death count.
The essay in which he first set down these ideas ends with a fantasy that
whenever a person died of AIDS their body would be taken by their friends
and lovers and loaded into a car and driven to Washington and dumped on the
front steps of the White House. It was a vision of accountability, of breaking
down the divide between private grief and state responsibility, a divide that
had permitted so much suffering to go by unseen.
As such, it’s fitting that his memorial was the first political funeral of the
AIDS epidemic, the first of many memorials in the form of protest marches.
At 8 p.m. on Wednesday 29 July 1992 a crowd of mourners gathered in the
street outside Hujar’s loft. Hundreds of people processed in near silence
through the East Village, forcing the traffic to a standstill. Down Avenue A,
passing over the tarmac where David had once painted a giant cow’s head to
amuse Hujar. Along East Houston and back up the Bowery, walking behind a
black banner that announced in big white letters:
DAVID WOJNAROWICZ
1954–1992
DIED OF AIDS
DUE TO
GOVERNMENT NEGLECT
In a parking lot opposite Cooper Union some of his work was read out loud,
and some of it was projected on a wall, just as years before he’d stencilled
his own images on to the surfaces of the city. One of the phrases read was:
‘To make the private into something public is an action that has terrific
repercussions on the pre-invented world.’ Then the banner was burned in the
street: a funeral pyre for someone who had fought lifelong simply for the
right to be seen, to coexist, to live his life without the threat of violence or
arrest, to enjoy desire in the way he pleased.
A few months later, on 11 October, ACT UP organised the Ashes Action, a
march on Washington that was a kind of political funeral on a vast scale. It
was a crushingly bleak time. There was still no cure for AIDS, no reliable
treatment. People were in a state of exhaustion, of grief and gathering
despair. Hundreds met on the steps of the Capitol building at 1 p.m., bringing
with them the ashes of their loved ones. Then they marched on George Bush’s
White House. When they got there, they began to empty the ashes on the lawn,
upending caskets and plastic bags and pouring them through the chain-link
fence. David Wojnarowicz’s ashes were among them, scattered by his lover
Tom.
Years before, David used to buy grass seed from a store on Canal Street
and roam the piers scattering it in handfuls, Johnny Appleseed in sneakers,
wanting to make something beautiful from the rubble. My favourite picture of
him showed him lounging on a meadow he’d planted in one of the abandoned
baggage or departure halls: grass scattered with debris, grass growing out of
disintegrating plaster and particles of soil. Anonymous art, unsignable art, art
that was about transformation, about alchemising what was otherwise only
waste.
I was reminded of that picture when I first watched the footage on
YouTube of the ashes falling, the clouds of greyish dust, the last remains of
dozens, perhaps hundreds of people, a tiny proportion of the hundreds of
thousands, now millions, lost. It was one of the most heart-breaking things I’d
ever seen, a gesture of absolute despair. At the same time, it was an act of
intense symbolic power. Where is David now? Like Klaus Nomi, like all the
artists who have died of AIDS, he lives on in his work, and in everyone who
sees that work, as he suggested years before, when he told Nan Goldin in the
conversation recorded in Interview, ‘once this body drops, I’d like some of
my experience to live on’. And he is also scattered across the White House
lawn, which is to say at the absolute heart of America, resisting exclusion to
the end.

7
RENDER GHOSTS
‘TO MAKE THE PRIVATE INTO something public is an act that has terrific
repercussions on the pre-invented world,’ Wojnarowicz had said, but it
hasn’t worked out quite like he imagined, not by any means.
In the early spring my sublet in the East Village came to an end and I
moved instead to a temporary room on the corner of West 43rd Street and
Eighth Avenue, on the tenth floor of what had once been the Times Square
Hotel. If I looked south, I could see the mirrored windows of the Westin. The
gym was at eye level, and at odd hours of the day or night I’d sometimes
catch a figure churning circles on an exercise bike. The other window looked
down on to a run of camera stores, bodegas, peep shows and lap-dancing
clubs, PLAYPEN and LACE, a stream of men in backpacks and baseball caps
passing through the doors.
It never gets dark in Times Square. It was a paradise of artificial light, in
which the older technologies, the neon extravagances in the shape of whisky
glasses and dancing girls, were in the process of being made obsolete by the
unremitting flawlessness of light-emitting diodes and liquid crystals. Often
I’d wake at two or three or four in the morning and watch waves of neon pass
through my room. During these unwanted apertures of the night, I’d get out of
bed and yank the useless curtain open. Outside, there was a jumbotron, a
giant electronic screen cycling perpetually through six or seven ads. One had
gunfire, and one expelled a cold blue pulse of light, insistent as a metronome.
I’d found the new apartment the way I always did: by putting an ad on
Facebook. It belonged to an acquaintance of an acquaintance, a woman I’d
never met. In an email she told me that the room was very small, with a
kitchenette and bathroom, warning me too about the traffic and the neon ads.
What she didn’t mention was that the building was a refuge: a flagship
development run by the charity Common Ground, which rented cheap single
rooms to working professionals in addition to housing a more or less
permanent population of the long-term homeless, particularly those with
AIDS and serious mental health problems. This was explained to me by one
of the two security guards on the front desk, who gave me the white
electronic card I needed to enter and exit the lobby and took me up to the
room to show me how to operate the locks. He’d just started the job, and in
the elevator he told me about the building’s population, saying of things I
might or might not see if we’re not worried about it you don’t need to be.
The halls were painted hospital green, flushed red and white by wall
lights, ceiling lights and EXIT signs. My room was just big enough to fit a
futon and a desk, a microwave, a sink and a small fridge. There were Mardi
Gras beads hanging in the bathroom, and the walls were lined with books
and cuddly toys. The sound of stereos and televisions seeped through the
walls, and outside crowds of people surged intermittently up from the
subway at Port Authority.
It was the epicentre of the twenty-first century, and I lived in it
accordingly. Every day I’d wake up and before my eyes were even properly
open I’d drag my laptop into bed and lurch seamlessly into Twitter. It was the
first thing I looked at and the last, this descending scroll from mostly
strangers, institutions, friends, this ephemeral community in which I was a
disembodied and inconstant presence. Picking through the litany, the
domestic and the civic: lens solution, book cover, news of a death, protest
picture, art opening, joke about Derrida, refugees in the forests of
Macedonia, hashtag shame, hashtag lazy, climate change, lost scarf, joke
about Daleks: a stream of information, sentiment and opinion that some days,
most days maybe, received more attention than anything actual in my life.
And Twitter was only the gateway, the portal into the endless city of the
internet. Whole days went by on clicking, my attention snared over and over
by pockets and ladders of information; an absent, ardent witness to the
world, the Lady of Shalott with her back to the window, watching the
shadows of the real appear in the lent blue glass of her magic mirror. I used
to read like that, back in the age of paper, the finished century, to bury myself
in a book, and now I gazed at the screen, my cathected silver lover.
It was like being a spy, carrying out perpetual surveillance. It was like
becoming a teenager again, plunging into pools of obsession, moving on,
riding the rocking swells, the changing surf. Reading about hoarding or
torture or true crime or the iniquities of the state; reading misspelled
chatroom conversations about what happened to Samantha Mathis after River
Phoenix died, sorry to sound partonizing but are you sure you WATCHED
this interview? The plunge through, the drift, the awful k-hole of recessive
links, clicking deeper and deeper into the past, stumbling out into the horrors
of the present. Courtney Love and Kurt Cobain getting married on a beach, a
child’s bloodied body on the sand: images that generated emotion,
overlapping the pointless, the appalling and the desirable.
What did I want? What was I looking for? What was I doing there, hour
after hour? Contradictory things. I wanted to know what was going on. I
wanted to be stimulated. I wanted to be in contact and I wanted to retain my
privacy, my private space. I wanted to click and click and click until my
synapses exploded, until I was flooded by superfluity. I wanted to hypnotise
myself with data, with coloured pixels, to become vacant, to overwhelm any
creeping anxious sense of who I actually was, to annihilate my feelings. At
the same time I wanted to wake up, to be politically and socially engaged.
And then again I wanted to declare my presence, to list my interests and
objections, to notify the world that I was still there, thinking with my fingers,
even if I’d almost lost the art of speech. I wanted to look and I wanted to be
seen, and somehow it was easier to do both via the mediating screen.
It’s easy to see how the network might appeal to someone in the throes of
chronic loneliness, with its pledge of connection, its beautiful, slippery
promises of anonymity and control. You can look for company without the
danger of being revealed or exposed, discovered wanting, seen in a state of
need or lack. You can reach out or you can hide; you can lurk and you can
reveal yourself, curated and refined.
In many ways, the internet made me feel safe. I liked the contact I got from
it: the small accumulation of positive regard, the favouriting on Twitter, the
Facebook likes, the little devices designed and coded for maintaining
attention and boosting client egos. I was willing enough to be the sucker, to
disseminate my information, to leave the electronic snail-trail of my interests
and allegiances for future corporations to convert into whatever currency it is
they use. Sometimes, in fact, it seemed like the exchange was working in my
favour, especially on Twitter, with its knack for facilitating conversation
between strangers along shared lines of interest and allegiance.
In the first year or two that I was there it felt like a community, a joyful
place; a lifeline, in fact, considering how cut off I otherwise was. At other
times, though, the whole thing seemed insane, a trading-off of time against
nothing tangible at all: a yellow star, a magic bean, a simulacrum of intimacy,
for which I was surrendering all the pieces of my identity, every element
except the physical carcass in which I was supposedly contained. And it only
took a few missed connections or lack of likes for the loneliness to resurface,
to be flooded with the bleak sense of having failed to make contact.
Loneliness triggered by virtual exclusion is just as painful as that which
arises out of real life encounters: a miserable rush of emotion that almost
every person on the internet has experienced at one time or another. In fact,
one of the tools psychologists use to assess the effects of ostracism and
social rejection is a virtual game called Cyberball, in which the participant
plays catch with two computer-generated players, who are programmed to
pass the ball normally for the first few tosses, before throwing it exclusively
between themselves – an experience identical to the minute smart of having a
conversation in which your @self, your avatar, is abruptly excised.
But what did I care, when I could drift away from conversation, and be
succoured instead by the addictive act of looking itself? The computer
facilitated a pleasurably fluid, risk-free gaze, since nothing I looked at was
precisely aware of my observing presence, my fluctuating regard, though I
left a trail of cookies to mark my path. Strolling the lit boulevards of the
internet, pausing to glance at the exhibitions people have made of their taste,
their lives, their bodies, I could feel myself becoming a kind of cousin to
Baudelaire, who in the prose-poem ‘Crowds’ sets out a manifesto for the
flâneur, the uncommitted apolitical wanderer of the city, writing dreamily:
The poet enjoys the incomparable privilege of being able to be himself or
someone else, as he chooses. Like those wandering souls who go looking for
a body, he enters as he likes into each man’s personality. For him alone
everything is vacant.
I walked all the time, but I’d never walked through a city like that. I found the
idea abhorrent, in fact, a dandyish disinclination to engage with the reality of
other people. But on the internet, it was hard to remember that there were
fleshy, feeling selves behind the avatars. Other people had a tendency to
become increasingly abstract, increasingly unreal, their identities blurring
and reforming.
Or perhaps it was Edward Hopper I was morphing into. Like him, I found
myself becoming a peeper, a creeper, a connoisseur of open windows,
patrolling in search of stimulating sights. Like him, my attention was often
caught by the erotic. I wandered around the personal ads on Craigslist in just
the same way that I wandered around the delis on Eighth Avenue, gazing
blankly into the lit racks of sushi, yoghurt, ice cream, Blue Moon and
Brooklyn beer, wondering what it was that I wanted, what it was that would
satisfy or settle me, eating with my eyes.
No one I knew would admit to liking Craigslist, but I always found it
weirdly cheering. The unashamed display of need, the sheer range and
specificity of things that people wanted was far more reassuring and
democratic than the preening, exacting profiles that appeared on the more
sanitised dating sites. If the internet was a city, Craigslist was its Times
Square, a site of cross-class, cross-racial contact, temporarily levelled by
sexual desire. Cross-entity too, considering how hard it sometimes was to
distinguish the human from the bot. We can both get what we want out of
this. I just want a tan Asian girl! I love eaten. Drinks and conversation
with a Harvard grad. LET ME SHOVE MY COC IN U long-term 420 sweet
princess Chelsea Midtown Midtown West cuddle kitty licked submissive
BUSTY game-players tons of baggage plant flowers in my front yard type
REAL in the subject of your response. Sprawled on the futon in my
apartment I spent hours scrolling through the ads, encouraged by how many
other people were going frantic with longings of every possible dimension
and heft.
But the looking didn’t only go one way. Part of the allure of the computer
was that I could be seen through the screen, could put myself out for virtual
inspection and validation while remaining in control, remote from the
possibility of physical rejection. The latter was an illusion, of course. Twice,
I put ads on Craigslist. The first, written while I was still in Brooklyn
Heights, was hyper-specific and drew mostly angry men or men who quickly
became angry. Ignorant cunt go burn bitch beg to be raped, one responder
wrote, an email that felt like a punch to the chest, a minor explosion of
hostility in the larger war enacted on the internet against women. I didn’t
reply. I logged out of the email account, itself in an assumed name, and never
went back, withdrawing this time not because of hypervigilance to social
rejection but because of the opposite – because the screen permitted people
to make threats and use language that most of them would – I’m guessing here
– never countenance in real life.
This is the thing about screens: you can never be sure how clear they are.
The disinhibition throwawayemayl@gmail.com evidently felt was a darker
aspect of the same freedom I often experienced in my nocturnal journeys, my
frictionless hauntings: a freedom that arose because of the way screens
facilitate projection and encourage individual expression while at the same
time dehumanising the countless others concealed or embedded behind their
own more or less lifelike avatars. What’s hard to know, though, is whether
this means that what emerges is magnified or distorted, or if anonymity and
consequenceless speech (seemingly consequenceless, anyway) simply
permits real feelings to seep into the light.
In the second ad, I was vague to the point of absurdity. 479 replies. Grew
up on a farm, you need a strong black man in your life, 6’3 shaved head,
care to chat a little, please please no headgames. These messages were
often accompanied or supplanted altogether by pictures of men under trees,
men reflected in mirrors, men sometimes whole and sometimes in parts,
cropped down to naked chests and engorged penises, one of which was
paired with a perplexing picture of its owner standing on a bed, a striped
comforter hanging from his shoulders like a superhero’s cape.
Some of those emails made my skin crawl, but the majority were touching,
with their intimations of loneliness as well as horniness, their hopes for
contact. I wrote back to a few, and went nervously on a handful of dates, but
none of it went anywhere. Though I wasn’t exactly heartbroken any more,
something in me – some structure of confidence or esteem – had crumbled. I
didn’t see anyone a second time. Instead, I stayed indoors and carried on
patrolling, looking for connection of an easier, less exposing kind.
Sometimes, as I was scrolling pages, I’d catch my face in the mirror,
pallid, absent, glowing. Inside, I might be fascinated or agitated or absolutely
enraged, but from the outside I looked half-dead, a solitary body enraptured
by a machine. A few years later, watching Spike Jonze’s Her, I saw the exact
replica of this face on Joaquin Phoenix’s Theodore Twombly, a man so
bruised and leery of actual intimacy that he falls in love with his operating
system, a reboot of Warhol marrying his tape recorder. It wasn’t his
incredulous joy I recognised, the scenes of him spinning in circles with his
phone. It was a scene right at the beginning, in which he gets home from
work, sits down in the dark and begins to play a videogame, manically
jiggling his fingers to propel an avatar up a slope, his face pathetically
engaged, his slumped body dwarfed by the giant screen. He looked hopeless,
ridiculous, absolutely divorced from life, and I recognised him immediately
as my twin: an icon of twenty-first-century isolation and data dependency.
It no longer seemed absurd by then that someone might have a romantic
relationship with an operating system. Digital culture was undergoing hyperacceleration, moving so fast it was hard to keep track. One minute something
was sci-fi, palpably ridiculous; the next a casual ritual, part of the everyday
texture of life. The first year that I was in New York, I read Jennifer Egan’s A
Visit from the Goon Squad. Part of it is set a little in the future, and involves
a business meeting between a young woman and an older man. After talking a
while, the girl becomes agitated by the demands of speech and asks the man
if she can ‘T’ him instead, though they are sitting side by side. As information
silently flushes between their two handsets, she looks ‘almost sleepy with
relief’, describing the exchange as pure. Reading it, I can distinctly
remember thinking that it was appalling, shocking, wonderfully far-fetched.
Within a matter of months it seemed instead merely plausible, a little gauche,
but entirely understandable as an urge. Now it’s just what we do: texting in
company, emailing colleagues at the same desk, avoiding encounters, DMing
instead.
The relief of virtual space, of being plugged in, of having control.
Everywhere I went in New York, on the subway, in cafés, walking down the
street, people were locked into their own network. The miracle of laptops
and smartphones is that they divorce contact from the physical, allowing
people to remain sealed into a private bubble while they are nominally in
public and to interact with others while they are nominally alone. Only the
homeless and the dispossessed seemed exempt, though that’s not counting the
street kids who spent every day hanging out in the Apple store on Broadway,
keeping up on Facebook even – especially, maybe – if they didn’t have
anywhere to sleep that night.
Everyone knows this. Everyone knows what it looks like. I can’t count
how many pieces I’ve read about how alienated we’ve become, tethered to
our devices, leery of real contact; how we are heading for a crisis of
intimacy, as our ability to socialise withers and atrophies. But this is like
looking through the wrong end of a telescope. We haven’t just become
alienated because we’ve subcontracted so many elements of our social and
emotional lives to machines. It’s no doubt a self-perpetuating cycle, but part
of the impetus for inventing as well as buying these things is that contact is
difficult, frightening, sometimes intolerably dangerous. Despite an advert
then prevalent on the subway that declared Your favourite part of having a
smartphone is never having to call anyone again, the source of the gadget’s
pernicious appeal is not that it will absolve its owner of the need for people
but that it will provide connection to them – connection, furthermore, of a
risk-free kind, in which the communicator need never be rejected,
misunderstood or overwhelmed, asked to supply more attention, closeness or
time than they are willing to offer up.
According to the psychologist Sherry Turkle, a professor at MIT who has
been writing about human-technology interactions for the past three decades
and who has become increasingly wary of the ability of computers to nourish
us in the ways we seem to want them to, part of the screen’s allure is that it
facilitates a dangerously pleasurable self-forgetfulness in something of the
same manner as the analyst’s couch. Both spaces offer up a complicated set
of possibilities, an alluring oscillation between the dyad of hidden and seen.
Lying on their back, witnessed by but unable to glimpse the observer who
watches over them, the analysand dreamily narrates their life story.
‘Likewise, at a screen,’ Turkle writes in Alone Together:
. . . you feel protected and less burdened by expectation. And, although you
are alone, the potential for almost instantaneous contact gives an encouraging
feeling of already being together. In this curious relational space, even
sophisticated users who know that electronic communications can be saved,
shared, and show up in court, succumb to its illusion of privacy. Alone with
your thoughts, yet in touch with an almost tangible fantasy of the other, you
feel free to play. At the screen, you have a chance to write yourself into the
person you want to be and to imagine others as you wish them to be,
constructing them for your purposes. It’s a seductive but dangerous habit of
mind.
Alone Together was published in 2011. The third in a trilogy about
relationships between humans and computers, it’s the result of years of
research projects, of observing and discussing how technology is used and
feels with many different kinds of people, from school children nervously
mothering Tamagotchis and teenagers struggling with the demands of virtual
and real social lives to isolated seniors coddling therapeutic robots in
nursing homes.
In Turkle’s first two books, The Second Self (1984) and Life on the
Screen (1992), computers are presented as primarily positive objects. The
first, written before the advent of the internet, considers the computer itself
as other, ally, even friend, while the second explores the way that networked
devices facilitate entry into a liberating zone of exploration and identity play,
where anonymous individuals can reinvent themselves, forming connections
with people all over the world, no matter how niche their interests and
proclivities.
Alone Together is different. Subtitled Why We Expect More from
Technology and Less from Each Other, it’s a frightening book, conveying an
oncoming dystopia in which no one talks or touches, in which robots take on
the role of caregivers and people’s identities become increasingly imperilled
and unstable as they are simultaneously succoured and surveilled by
machines. Privacy, concentration, intimacy: all are lost, worn away by our
fixation with the world inside the screen.
How far ahead can you see? For most of us, committed Luddites aside,
these more sinister aspects of virtual existence are only just beginning to
crest into visibility, two decades after the public launch of the world wide
web. But there have been warnings, both by scientists and psychologists and
broadcast through the prescient medium of art. One of the strangest in this
latter category was made over fifteen years ago – and not even by an artist
but by a dotcom millionaire with money to burn. Prophecy is a strong word,
but the things Josh Harris created at the turn of the new millennium have
something of the quality of predictive text, capturing not just the shape of the
future but also the urges that brought it into being.
*
Josh Harris was an internet entrepreneur, the cigar-chomping poster-boy for
the excesses of Silicon Alley, the nickname for the digital industries that
burgeoned in New York towards the end of the twentieth century. In 1986, at
the age of twenty-six, he’d set up Jupiter Communications, the first internet
market research company. It went public in 1988, making him a millionaire.
Six years later, he founded a pioneering internet television network, Pseudo,
which produced multiple channels of entertainment, each catering for and
made by different subcultures, from hip hop and gaming to erotica – the same
panoply of communities, in fact, that still colonise the web today.
Years before social media, before Facebook (2004) and Twitter (2006),
before Grindr (2009), ChatRoulette (2009), Snapchat (2011) and Tinder
(2012), before even Friends Reunited (2000), Friendster (2002), MySpace
(2003) and Second Life (2003), not to mention the broadband that made them
viable, Harris understood that the internet’s most powerful appeal was not
going to be as a way of sharing information, but rather as a space in which
people could connect with others. He foresaw from the beginning that there
would be an appetite for interactive entertainment and he also foresaw that
people would be willing to pay a good deal in order to participate, to have a
presence in the virtual world.
What I am trying to say is that Harris predicted the internet’s social
function, and that he did so in part by intuiting the power of loneliness as a
driving force. He understood the strength of people’s longing for contact and
attention and he also grasped the counterweight of their fear of intimacy, their
need for screens of every kind. As he put it in the documentary We Live in
Public: ‘If I’m in a certain mood and stuck with my family or friends, the
alleviation to that are virtual worlds’ – a statement that seems obvious now
but that in the 1990s was met with amused bafflement, if not outright ridicule.
It seems he knew all this not just instinctively, but because his own early
experiences had shaped him into an exceptionally ideal tenant of unreal
spaces. There are at present two documentaries about Harris’s strange and
turbulent life: We Live in Public, which was directed by Harris’s long-term
collaborator Ondi Timoner, and Harvesting Me, an episode of Errol
Morris’s First Person series. There is also a book, Totally Wired by Andrew
Smith, which charts the rise and fall of the dotcom bubble by way of a
wonderfully forensic account of Harris’s exploits over the years. All of these
works contain scenes in which Harris describes his childhood, in
characteristically aphoristic (also confusing, paranoid and unfinished)
sentences, as notably unpeopled and friendless, his emotional support
provided more by television sets than human beings.
He grew up in California, though there was also a stint in Ethiopia: the
youngest child in a family of seven, his brothers already well into high
school while he toiled through elementary. His father often disappeared, once
for so long that the family home was repossessed. His mother worked with
delinquent children, drank heavily and was not, by his own or his siblings’
accounts, a nourishing, warm or even very present presence. He grew up
semi-feral, foraging for himself and spending most of his time alone, glued to
the TV, Gilligan’s Island a particular fixation. ‘I think,’ he said in We Live in
Public:
. . . that I love my mother virtually and not physically. I was bred by her to sit
in front of a TV set for hours on end. That’s how I’ve been trained. You know
the most important friend to me growing up was in fact the television . . . My
emotionality is not derived from other humans . . . I was emotionally
neglected but virtually I could absorb the electronic calories from the world
inside the television.
It’s the sort of thing you can imagine Warhol saying – not so much the neglect,
but the sense of kinship with machines, the craving for electronic calories,
the desire to enter into an artificial, looking-glass world. Both men maybe
saw it as something like an equation, in which the need for intimacy and the
fear of it create a stalemate, paralysis, and that rather than struggling in this
lonely maze one might simply co-opt devices – cameras, tape recorders,
televisions – using them as shields, distractions, safe zones.
In fact, the two were frequently compared. In the 1990s, the press dubbed
Harris the Warhol of the Web, though at the time this was more to do with his
penchant for throwing parties and surrounding himself with downtown
characters, particularly performance artists, than because he actually
produced art himself. All the same, the lineaments of his childhood meant
that, like Warhol, he understood the weirdly protective quality of screens, the
sense that participating in virtual spaces might be a way of medicating a
sense of isolation, a feeling of being left out or going unregarded, without
requiring the subtle social skills necessary for IRL interactions. And after all,
what better antidote to being alone, all one, than entering the replication
machine of the internet, by which the virtues of celebrity could be made
available to all.
Harris established Pseudo along the now-familiar lines of social media
corporations, with their breakout zones and cheerfully infantile, playinducing furnishings. It was based in a loft at 600 Broadway, a space that a
wry New York Magazine profile from 1999 described as being large enough
to park a fleet of double-decker buses. Inside, Harris built himself a private
apartment, making a personal enclave in what was otherwise a non-stop 24/7
zone of sociability, a frenetic combination of television studio and
happening.
Pseudo was conceived and run as a participatory domain, though as with
Warhol’s Factory, it was always the same person who settled the bills. The
door to the street was left open day and night, and there were endless parties,
many of them filmed and uploaded on the station, blurring the distinctions
between work and play, meat and cyberspace. Gamers playing Doom, The
Matrix projected on to a wall, a queue of models and pop stars snaking
down the street: the stuff of dreams, assuming the dreamer had been a nerdy
friendless kid in Ventura with his nose to the tube.
Towards the end of the 1990s, Harris’s interest in Pseudo began to wane
in favour of an ambitious new project, which might be described as a monthlong party, a psychology experiment, an art installation, a durational
performance, a hedonistic prison camp or a coercive human zoo. Quiet was
conceived as an investigation into surveillance and group living: an
experiment designed to test the effects of the oncoming collapse of
boundaries between the public and the private that Harris was convinced the
internet would bring about. ‘Andy Warhol was wrong,’ he informed a
journalist. ‘People don’t want fifteen minutes of fame in their lifetime, they
want it every night. The audience want to be the show.’
In the winter of 1999, he rented a dilapidated empty warehouse in Tribeca
and set about transforming it into an Orwellian chamber of enchantment,
helped by a team of artists, chefs, curators, designers and builders and
backed by a seemingly unlimited budget of personal funds. The idea was that
sixty people would spend the final month of the millennium living in a
communal pod hotel he’d built in the basement. They would be unable to
leave, though the public would be free to come and go, enjoying a bountiful
libidinal playpen, in which all urges could be gratified, be it guzzling
unlimited liquor at the free bar, dancing in a nightclub called Hell or
discharging one’s aggression in a shooting range in the basement that was
stocked with submachine guns and live ammo.
Like Pseudo, Quiet was open to all-comers. Over the month of December,
the bunker was a honeypot for the fin de siècle downtown scene, drawing
queues right down the block. The novelist Jonathan Ames was among the
crowd and in his ‘City Slicker’ column for New York Press he described his
adventures there. ‘People,’ he wrote, ‘gathered night after night to drink,
smoke pot, grab one another and see strange performances. It was like the
Beat generation meets the Internet. Not the best combination perhaps, but
amusing and unusually vital, though there was the sense of great waste; I think
the Beat generation cultivated their madness on a much lower budget, which
seems more virtuous, but that’s only because I have a poor man’s prejudice
and snobbery when it comes to money.’
All the beds in the pod hotel were rapidly filled, despite the exacting
conditions of entry, which included the necessity of dressing in grey shirts
and orange trousers – a uniform that is now disturbingly reminiscent of
Guantanamo Bay. The space in which the new citizens of Quiet were
confined offered no privacy whatsoever. The bunks were crammed into a
single subterranean dormitory, army style. There was only one shower. It had
glass walls, and was situated in full view of the dining hall, where elaborate
gourmet meals were served free of charge three times a day.
In fact, everything at Quiet was free. The price of entry into the bunker
wasn’t money, but rather a willingness to surrender control over one’s
identity. There were surveillance cameras everywhere, even in the toilets,
streaming to the web. Furthermore, each of the sleeping pods was fitted with
a two-way audio-visual system, a camera plus television set. These devices
converted Quiet into a panopticon and its citizens into both prisoners and
jailers, at once the subject and the object of scrutiny.
They could look as much as they liked, flicking through the channels,
settling on this or that pod, watching people eating or defecating or having
sex. They could gorge themselves on feasts of the eye, but they couldn’t hide.
They could watch whatever face or body took their fancy, but they could not
protect themselves from being regarded by the camera’s unstinting gaze,
though they could work to generate an audience, to acquire the glitter that
comes from being regarded by multiple eyes, the high wattage sheen lent by
mass attention. Quiet wasn’t just a metaphor for the internet. It was the thing
itself, enacted by real bodies in real rooms; its feedback loops of voyeurism
and exposure.
Like the internet, what seemed transient was actually permanent, and what
seemed free had already been bought. In his understanding of this, Harris was
notably prescient, something that can be seen when one contrasts Quiet with
an essay written the same year by the critic Bruce Benderson about cybersex
and the effect of the internet on communities and cities, entitled ‘Sex and
Isolation’. In it, he writes: ‘We are very much alone. Nothing leaves a mark.
Today’s texts and images may look like real carvings – but in the end they are
erasable, only a temporary blockage of all-invasive light. No matter how
long the words and pictures stay on our screens, there will be no
encrustation; all will be reversible.’ This statement captures the anxieties of
the web 1.0, its now painful innocence, and fails to foresee what Josh did:
the grim permanence of the web to come, where data has consequences and
nothing is ever lost, not arrest logs, not embarrassing photos, not Google
searches, not the torture logs of entire nations.
On arrival, the citizens of Quiet signed away the rights to their own data,
just as we do when we persist in treating corporate spaces of the web as
private diaries or zones of conversation. Everything recorded was owned by
Harris, including information gathered by way of increasingly brutal and
intrusive interrogations, apparently carried out by a genuine former CIA
operative. These interrogations form one of the most distressing aspects of
the documentary We Live in Public. Over and over, clearly vulnerable
people are grilled by uniformed guards about their sexual proclivities and
mental health, with one weeping woman asked to demonstrate exactly how
she’d cut her wrists, the speed and angle of the blade.
It sounds like hell, and the footage looks like hell, the uniformed people
fucking in their kennels, as a rattled-sounding Josh says on camera: ‘There’s
all these people around you at close quarters and the more you get to know
each other the more alone you become. That’s what this environment is doing
to me.’ And yet most people seem on balance to have relished their time in
Quiet, or at least to have been glad they’d been through it, though they also
attested to increasing fights, as drug use and proximity and lack of privacy
ate away at the inmates.
The party came screeching to a halt in the early hours of the new
millennium, when Quiet was raided and shut down by the police and the
Federal Emergency Management Agency, apparently because of concerns that
it was a millennial cult (the noise of guns being discharged, audible from the
street outside, cannot have helped). The bust was part of Mayor Rudy
Giuliani’s clamp down on licentiousness and crime, his attempt to clean and
order the city by way of what was known euphemistically as the Quality of
Life Task Force, the same mechanism responsible for the sanitisation and
desexing of Times Square. As dawn broke over Manhattan, as the twentyfirst century began, the citizens of Quiet were thrown out into the street, the
machinery of closeness abruptly shut off.
The sadism that makes Quiet appalling as a viewing spectacle also clouds
its purpose. It reveals people’s greed for attention, yes, but the message of
danger is diminished by the suspicion that a single person is manipulating the
situation, ratcheting up the stakes. Watching the footage of interrogations, or
of a group of orange-clad people ogling two strangers having athletic sex
inside a shower, one has the sense that someone invisible is yanking the
strings: someone who will do anything to generate effects, create drama,
keep the viewer hooked. On some level, Harris must have grasped this,
because his next project was simpler, more self-exposing and far more
declarative.
In We Live in Public (the documentary takes its name from the work),
Harris turned the cameras on himself and his girlfriend Tanya Corrin, a
former employee and his first serious relationship. Having exposed people’s
desire for participation, their frantic need to be witnessed, he now wished to
assess the cost of this kind of surveillance, to see the human effects of
collapsing whatever boundaries exist between the public and the private, the
real and the virtual. Again, let me restate that this is in 2000, three years
before MySpace was founded and four years before the launch of Facebook,
when social media had not yet begun, let alone become entrenched enough to
generate the kind of anxiety that is familiar today. The television show Big
Brother had recently begun on television, but that simply put people into a
decreasingly comfortably appointed prison and let unseen viewers vote them
out. What Harris wanted to do was open the channels, to let audience and
show bleed into one.
That fall, he filled his apartment with sophisticated recording equipment,
including dozens of automated cameras. For 100 days, he and Tanya would
live entirely in public, come what may. The footage harvested was streamed
on to the project’s website, where it appeared on a split screen, the other half
of which was dedicated to discussion by a shifting online community, who
not only watched but also responded and engaged. At the project’s height,
thousands of people were logging on, watching Josh and Tanya eating,
showering, sleeping, having sex.
At first, the relationship bloomed under these artificial lights, but as the
scrutiny intensified cracks began to form. From the beginning, the watchers
commented on what they saw, a relentless chorus, a talking mirror, by turns
flattering and savage. What was being said? Better check, the two of them in
separate rooms, assessing their feedback, comparing their popularity,
tweaking their behaviour in accordance with demands. When they fought, the
watchers took sides, generally Tanya’s, advising her on ways of handling
Josh, telling her to make him sleep on the couch, telling her to force him to
move out.
Under this kind of barrage, this seeping of the virtual into the actual, Josh
became progressively more isolated and embittered, not helped by the fact
that his fortune was leaking away, the millions vanishing as swiftly as they’d
materialised. 2000: the year of the stock market crash, the bursting of the
dotcom bubble. Eventually Tanya left, a humiliating public separation, and he
stayed on in the loft alone with a hostile crowd of spectators, trapped in a
malicious room of knowing ghosts. Then the audience too began to dwindle,
and as they melted away Josh felt the elements of his personality
disappearing with them. Without the attention, without the scrolling
responses, did he even exist? An abstract question, Philosophy 101, until you
look at the footage of him moving between rooms, spooked and bloated,
something blank about his face, like a man who has suffered a blow to the
head.
*
I first saw the documentary We Live in Public in a way that would have been
unthinkable ten years before. A friend I knew from Twitter, Sherri
Wasserman, inaugurated a film festival designed for the internet. At first, the
idea was to watch films about isolation while physically isolated but
technologically connected. Over time, the focus shifted to prisons both real
and imagined, among them the two designed by Harris.
There were six of us at the first Co-Present festival, scattered across
America and Europe, watching on our laptops and talking via Gchat. We got
to We Live in Public last, after a triple bill of Into the Abyss, Escape from
New York and Tokyo Drifter, which is to say blindsided by images, by hours
and hours spent immersed in the glowing innards of our computers. All those
films were beautiful and disturbing, relevant in different ways, but We Live
in Public felt like confronting something personal, something ugly and
increasingly uncomfortable. Looking at the chatlog now, we all sound
stunned. SW: this increasingly looks like the cocky internet startup mogul’s
version of the Stanford Experiment. ST: I feel like I’m going crazy. AS: it’s
seriously fucked.
I can’t speak for the others, but I was frightened by what I saw, and
frightened by what it meant for me. Somehow, I’d woken up in the future. I
think we’re all in Josh’s room now. I think the salient point about the new
world we’ve been drifting into is that all the walls are falling down,
everything blurring into everyone else. In this atmosphere of perpetual
contact, perpetual surveillance, intimacy falters. Hardly any wonder Josh
fled the city the day after We Live in Public ended, spending the next few
years hiding out on an apple farm upstate, recovering or recalibrating his
sense of boundaries, drawing his self back into the outer casing of his skin.
Collapse, spread, merging, union: these things sound like the opposite of
loneliness, and yet intimacy requires a solid sense of self to be successful
and satisfying. In conversation after a screening of We Live in Public at the
MoMA, the director Ondi Timoner said of Quiet that though it was in many
ways a totalitarian space, ‘it didn’t matter . . . It was more important to get
the attention of the camera if at all possible, and there were 110 of them, so it
was like a candy store for people who wanted to feel that they were part of
something’, adding emphatically: ‘What I did not realise at the time was that
this was what the internet would become.’ She saw the film explicitly as a
warning, saying: ‘I think we have to be conscious of what we’re after when
we’re posting our photo. I think we all have a desire not to feel alone and to
feel connected and that’s a basic desire, but in our society celebrity has
become the golden lamb . . . if I can get that, I won’t feel alone and will
always feel loved.’
Love without risk. Love that is simply the dissemination of one’s own
face, its incessant replication. In the Errol Morris documentary Harvesting
Me, Harris muses on his life in a way that implicitly conflates identity with
the experience of being watched. ‘My only friend was the tube . . . I’m a
celebrity. There are people who watch me . . . I’ve got this Greek chorus
watching me me me.’ It’s as if each extra set of eyes enlarges and reinforces
the object of the gaze, that fragile, swollen me, though they are also capable
of tearing it to pieces.
Once again, this recalls Warhol, who possessed a similarly intense desire
to get inside the tube, using it as a way to broadcast himself, to seed his
image throughout the world. Or, alternatively, to put other people in there, the
better to enjoy them. All sorts of aspects of his work echo through Harris’s
projects, as they do through the internet at large. Take the so-called boring
films, with their gratuitously lingering glances, their static, silvery regard of
people engaged in the ordinary, quotidian activities of their titles: Sleep or
Haircut, Kiss or Eat. They testify to the desire to watch a body perform its
rites: the same urge that is present in cruder form in Harris’s endless
recording of people defecating or washing, sleeping or having sex; an urge
that has itself subsequently flowered out in vast profusion on the internet, that
kingdom of self-portraiture, that enclave of the fetishised and the banal.
Surveillance art, I suppose you could call it, made before the term was even
in circulation.
The difference between Warhol and Harris, of course, is that Warhol was
an artist, engaged in the production of something beautiful – a gleaming
surface, an affectless mirror for the world – and not simply in social
experiment and self-aggrandisement and what sometimes seems like
unnecessarily cruel exposure. Though perhaps that last clause is not quite
fair. Watching footage of Quiet, its sadism and manipulation, I was reminded
more than once of Warhol’s nastier films, the ones in which he and Ronnie
Tavel provoke mania or nudge the doe-eyed participants into humiliating
acts. Ondine slapping Rona Page, Mary Woronov torturing International
Velvet in Chelsea Girls, beautiful Mario Montez in Screen Test No. 2,
ecstatically mouthing the word diarrhoea, his lovely face determined,
anxious to please (at the beginning of the film, obsessively rearranging his
luxuriant wig, the camera’s eye upon him, he confesses dreamily, ‘I feel like
I’m in uh another world now. A world of fantasy.’)
If there is a current animating Warhol’s work, it is not sexual desire, not
eros as we generally understand it, but rather desire for attention: the driving
force of the modern age. What Warhol was looking at, what he was
reproducing in paintings and sculptures and films and photographs, was
simply whatever everyone else was looking at, be it celebrities or cans of
soup or photographs of disasters, of people crushed beneath cars and flung
into trees. In gazing at these things, in rollering them out over curtains of
colour, in reproducing them endlessly, what he was attempting to distil was
the essence of attention itself, that elusive element that everyone hungers for.
His study began with stars, with all those heavy-lidded, bee-stung divas,
Jackie, Elvis, Marilyn, their faces vacant, stunned by camera lenses. But it
didn’t end there. Like Harris, Warhol could see that technology was going to
make it possible for more and more people to achieve fame; intimacy’s
surrogate, its addictive supplanter.
At the Warhol Museum in Pittsburgh there is a room filled with dozens of
televisions, all dangling from chains. Each one broadcasts a different
episode of the two chat-shows he made in the 1980s, Andy Warhol’s T.V. and
Andy Warhol’s Fifteen Minutes. Each set contains a miniature Andy, his false
hair sprouting upwards, unhindered by gravity. Uneasy behind his glasses,
but loving the broiling lights, directed on his face. Television was the
medium he most desired entering into, the pinnacle of his ambitions.
According to the curator Eva Meyer-Herman: ‘The mass medium of
television, which proliferates into every living room, is the utmost extreme of
reproduction and repetition that he could imagine.’ In The Philosophy of
Andy Warhol, he reflected on the magical capacity of television, the way it
makes you big no matter how small you feel.
If you were the star of the biggest show on television and took a walk down
an average American street one night while you were on the air, and if you
looked through windows and saw yourself on television in everybody’s
living room, taking up some of their space, can you imagine how you would
feel? No matter how small he is, he has all the space anyone could ever
want, right there in the television box.
That’s the dream of replication: infinite attention, infinite regard. The
machinery of the internet has made it a democratic possibility, as television
never could, since the audience in their living rooms necessarily far
outnumbered the people who could be squeezed into the box. Not so with the
internet, where anyone with access to a computer can participate, can
become a minor deity of Tumblr or YouTube, commanding thousands with
their make-up advice or ability to decorate a dining table, to bake the perfect
cupcake. A prepubescent in a sweater with a knack for throwing shade can
grip 1,379,750 subscribers, declaring it’s hard to explain myself so those
are what my videos are for!! And then you run the hashtag lonely through
Twitter, can’t vibe with anybody lately #lonely, seven favourites; I love
seeing people that I asked to do things with not reply to me and then do
things without me. #lonely, one favourite; I’m having one of those nights.
Too much thinking time #lonely I sound like a fucking sook with lots of
cats. I wish I had a cat, no favourites.
Meanwhile, what? Meanwhile, the life forms on the planet that we inhabit
diminish by the hour. Meanwhile, everything becomes steadily more
homogenised, more intolerant of difference. Meanwhile, teenagers kill
themselves, leaving suicide notes on Tumblr, against a backdrop of flinching,
flickering Hello Kittys, I was completely alone for 5 months. No friends, no
support, no love. Just my parent’s disappointment and the cruelty of
loneliness.
Something wasn’t working. Somehow the spell of the replication machine
had failed. Somehow where we’d got to wasn’t all that desirable, all that
habitable, all that swell. If I tore myself away from my computer and looked
out of my window what I was confronted by instead were the screens of
Times Square: a giant watch, Gordon Ramsay’s craggy face, magnified to a
hundred times the size of life.
Marooned inside this unnatural landscape, I could have been anywhere at
all: London, Tokyo, Hong Kong, any of the technologically modified cities of
the future, which seem increasingly to have been modelled on Ridley Scott’s
Blade Runner, with its floating adverts for Coca Cola and Off-World
Colonies, its anxieties about the blurring between the artificial and the
authentic.
Blade Runner portrays a world devoid of animals, a visionary precursor
of the robotic moment that Sherry Turkle predicted. What is it that Sebastian
says, the prematurely ancient man-child, living alone in the leaking, debrisstrewn splendour of a deserted Bradbury Building in a futuristic, sodden
L.A.? The replicant Pris asks him if he is lonely and he says no, as real
people almost always do, telling her in his halting way: ‘Not really. I make
friends. They’re toys. My friends are toys. I make them. It’s a hobby. I’m a
genetic designer.’ So there’s another room we’re stuck inside, thronged with
programmed companions, friends we invented and invested with life. Never
mind emigrating off-world; what we have done is emigrate online.
I wonder, is it a coincidence that computers achieved their dominance at
just the moment that life on earth became so cataclysmically imperilled? I
wonder if that was a driver, if part of the urge to escape feeling, to plug the
need for contact with the drug of perpetual attention, comes from the anxiety
that we will one day be the last ones left, the last species surviving on this
multifarious, flowered planet, drifting through empty space. That’s the
nightmare, isn’t it, to be abandoned in perpetuity? Robinson Crusoe on his
island, Frankenstein’s monster disappearing on to the ice, Solaris, Gravity,
Alien, a weeping Will Smith in I am Legend wandering the desolate,
unpeopled, post-plague city of New York, begging a mannequin in an
abandoned video store to please say hello to me, please say hello to me: all
these horror stories revolve around the terror of solitude without prospect of
cure, loneliness without the hope of alleviation or redemption.
I wonder too, if AIDS is part of what laid the ground for all this. In Illness
as Metaphor, Susan Sontag makes a connection between the disease and the
then-nascent world of computers, the way their metaphors rapidly became
shared and entangled. The use of the word virus, for a start, migrating from
an organism that attacks the body to programs that attack machines. AIDS
colonised the imagination at the end of the last millennium, filling the
atmosphere with dread, so that when the future rolled in it was thick with the
fear of contamination, of sickening bodies and the shame of living inside
them. A virtual world: why not, yes please, calling time on the tyranny of the
physical, on the long rule of old age, sickness, loss and death.
Then too, as Sontag points out, AIDS exposed the alarming realities of the
global village, the world in which everything is in perpetual circulation, the
goods and garbage, the plastic sucky-cup in London washing up in Japan, or
trapped in the squalid gyre of the Pacific trash vortex, breaking down into
pelagic plastics that are themselves eaten by sea turtles and albatross.
Information, people, illnesses: everything is on the move. No one is separate,
every element is constantly morphing into something else. ‘But now,’ Sontag
writes at the close of her book, which was published in 1989:
. . . that heightened modern interconnectedness in space, which is not only
personal but social, structural, is the bearer of a health menace sometimes
described as a threat to the species itself; and the fear of AIDS is of a piece
with attention to other unfolding disasters that are the byproducts of advanced
society, particularly those illustrating the degradation of the environment on a
world scale. AIDS is one of the dystopian harbingers of the global village,
that future which is already here and always before us, which no one knows
how to refuse.
To which the twenty-first-century citizen might add #overit or #tl;dr, the same
emotion of despair compressed into the microlanguage we now seem
compelled to confine ourselves inside.
*
One night, walking home at 2.30 in the morning, I saw a carriage horse
bolting down a deserted 43rd Street. Another evening, I passed in the crowd
on 42nd a man shouting to no one in particular New York! We’re drowning in
colours! In the elevator at the Times Square Hotel, I stepped in and out of
conversations. Two women interrogating a man with greased-back hair about
Louis Vuitton bags. What colour you want? Black. When you going? She’s
going in an hour and a half. There was a world outside, if I could make
myself go into it, though it increasingly resembled the sanitised world inside
the screen.
The same forces that have driven our migration online were also evident
in the fabric of the neighbourhood itself. Every city is a place of
disappearances, but Manhattan is an island, and to reinvent itself must
literally bulldoze the past. The Times Square of Samuel Delany and Valerie
Solanas and David Wojnarowicz, the Times Square of the Rimbaud
photograph, the place where bodies could come together, had in the
intervening decades undergone a drastic shift, a movement towards
homogeneity. The great clean-up operation of gentrification: Giuliani and
Bloomberg between them sweeping away the porn cinemas, the hookers and
dancing girls, replacing them with corporate offices and high-end magazines.
It was the same fantasy of purification expressed by Travis Bickle in his
famous monologue from Taxi Driver, the voice-over given as he drives
through 1970s Times Square in his cab in the rain, past the green aquariums
of the peepshows, the pink letters spelling out FASCINATION, the girls in
their lemon hot-pants and platform heels, the headlights spilling red and
white across wet tarmac. ‘All the animals come out at night – whores, skunk
pussies, buggers, queens, fairies, dopers, junkies. Sick, venal. Someday a
real rain will come and wash all this scum off the streets.’ And now the rain
had come. Now Times Square was populated by Disney characters and
tourists and scaffolders and the police. Now the Victory, which in the
Rimbaud photo was screening X-rated movies, was a gleamingly restored
children’s theatre, while the New Amsterdam had shown nothing but Mary
Poppins since 2006.
It’s ironic that Manhattan is becoming a kind of gated island for the superrich, when one considers that in the 1970s it was closer to a gated prison for
the poor, its reputation as a dangerzone exploited in the sci-fi film Escape
from New York, the one we’d watched as part of the first Co-Present film
festival. Back in that period, the building I was living in, the old art-deco
liner of the Times Square Hotel, had been a welfare hotel, its empty rooms
used to warehouse the overflow of homeless people from the city’s teeming
shelters. Valerie Solanas was a frequent incumbent of these places, and in 7
Miles A Second, the graphic novel about his childhood, David Wojnarowicz
remembered times when he was forced to stay in them, with their rotting
mattresses and doors sawed two feet from the floor, so that any creep could
crawl in while you slept. Even exhausted, he preferred the relative openness
of the streets.
I don’t know if he ever visited the Times Square itself, but as a kid he
certainly turned tricks in places like it. He wrote about them later: the
middle-aged men who’d pick him up, the grubby little rooms they’d take him
to. One time, the john made him watch another couple through a peephole in
the wall. When the woman turned around he saw that there were unhealed
knife wounds all over her belly. In 7 Miles A Second, there’s a picture of her
torso, coloured in inked swatches of red and pink and brown. ‘What really
twisted my brain,’ kid David says, ‘was how that guy could fuck that woman’
– a hooker he recognised from outside Port Authority – ‘with those fresh
wounds staring him in the face! Like he couldn’t conceive of pain attached to
the body he was fucking.’
This is what the Times Square Alliance was supposed to have erased: the
panhandlers, the hustlers, the damaged and hungry bodies. And yet it’s
doubtful that the impulse was wholly humanitarian, driven by a wish to
improve or make safe the lives of people on the margins. Safer cities, cleaner
cities, richer cities, cities that grow ever more alike: what lurks behind the
rhetoric of the Quality of Life Task Force is a profound fear of difference, a
fear of dirt and contamination, an unwillingness to let other life-forms
coexist. And what this means is that cities shift from places of contact, places
where diverse people interact, to places that resemble isolation wards, the
like penned with the like.
This is the subject of Gentrification of the Mind, Sarah Schulman’s
extraordinary polemic, which ties the physical process of gentrification to the
losses of the AIDS crisis. Her book calls on us to realise that not only is it
healthier to live in complex, dynamic, mixed communities than uniform ones,
but also that happiness that depends on privilege and oppression cannot by
any civilised terms be described as happiness at all. Or as Bruce Benderson,
another denizen of the old Times Square, puts it in Sex and Isolation: ‘The
closing of the center city is loneliness for everyone. The abandonment of the
body is isolation, the triumph of pure fantasy.’
There are consequences to physical environments, just as there are
consequences to virtual worlds. During the period that I lived in Times
Square, Wojnarowicz’s phrase kept drifting through my head. Like he
couldn’t conceive of pain attached to the body he was fucking. Like he
couldn’t conceive of pain attached to the body. It’s a statement about
empathy, about the capacity to enter into the emotional reality of another
human being, to recognise their independent existence, their difference; the
necessary prelude to any act of intimacy.
In the fantasy world of Blade Runner, empathy is what distinguishes
humans from replicants. In fact, the film opens with a replicant being forced
to undertake the Voight-Kampff test, which uses a kind of polygraph machine
to assess whether a suspect is truly human by measuring the degree of their
empathic response to a series of questions, most of them about animals in
distress. The tortoise lays on its back, its belly baking in the hot sun,
beating its legs trying to turn itself over, but it can’t. Not without your
help. But you’re not helping . . . Why is that, Leon?, a line of questioning
that is abruptly terminated when Leon shoots the interrogator from beneath
the desk.
The irony of the film is, of course, that it’s the humans who are devoid of
empathy, who fail to conceive of suffering on the part of the replicants, the
stigmatised skin jobs, with their radically shortened life spans. It’s only after
the replicant Roy Batty nearly kills him – Quite an experience to live in fear,
isn’t it? – before saving his life that the Blade Runner Deckard, the hardboiled detective, learns to empathise, dissolving with it some of the ice of
his own pervasive loneliness, his isolation in the city.
I wonder now: is it fear of contact that is the real malaise of our age,
underpinning the changes in both our physical and virtual lives. St Patrick’s
Day. In the morning Times Square was filled with drunken teenagers in green
baseball caps, and I walked right down to Tompkins Square Park to escape
them. By the time I turned for home it had begun to snow. The streets were
almost deserted. At the top of Broadway I passed a man sitting in a doorway.
He must have been in his forties, with cropped hair and big cracked hands.
When I paused he started to speak unstintingly, saying that he had been sitting
there for three days, saying that not a single person had stopped to talk to
him. He told me about his kids – I got three beautiful babies on Long Island
– and then a confusing story about work boots. He showed me a wound on
his arm and said I got stabbed yesterday. I’m like a piece of shit here.
People throw pennies at me.
It was snowing hard, the flakes whirling down. My hair was soaked
already. After a while, I gave him five bucks and walked on. That night I
watched the snow falling for a long time. The air was full of wet neon,
sliding and smearing in the streets. What is it about the pain of others? Easier
to pretend that it doesn’t exist. Easier to refuse to make the effort of empathy,
to believe instead that the stranger’s body on the sidewalk is simply a render
ghost, an accumulation of coloured pixels, which winks out of existence
when we turn our head, changing the channel of our gaze.

8
STRANGE FRUIT
IT GOT COLDER AND THEN it got warmer, the fizz of pollen in the air. I left
Times Square, moving instead to my friend Larry’s temporarily vacant
apartment on East 10th Street. It was good to be back in the East Village. I’d
missed the neighbourhood, the community gardens decorated with fairy lights
and scrap sculpture, the way you could hear a dozen languages a minute on
Avenue A. Urbanity: providing, as Sarah Schulman puts it in Gentrification
of the Mind, ‘the daily affirmation that people from other experiences are
real’, though the old diversity of race and sexuality and income was palpably
imperilled by the unstoppable rise of condos and fro-yo outlets, the
escalating rents.
Larry’s apartment was packed with an ecstatic clutter of Americana, a
collection that included but was by no means limited to a lovingly assembled
library of celebrity biographies – P for Dolly Parton, H for Keith Haring –
alongside perhaps a hundred empty bottles of Jack Daniels, dozens of
crocheted blankets, musical instruments and throw cushions, a bust of Elvis
in sunglasses and a lanky blow-up alien embracing a bloated scarlet King
Kong.
Arising from out of this joyful disorder were Larry’s artworks, chief
among them a cape he’d been working on for all the time I’d known him. This
cape was patchworked from hundreds of discarded embroidery projects
gathered in thrift stores and rummage sales over decades, many of them
unfinished. After stitching them together, Larry had begun to embellish the
empty spaces with millions of sequins, each one of them hand-sewn.
Aeroplanes, butterflies, ducks, a train drawing behind it a skein of coloured
smoke: all these endearing leavings, these absolute discards of culture and
good taste, had been drawn together, alchemised into a celebration of the
anonymous, the domestic and the homespun.
The cape was an imposing presence in the apartment. It was huge, for a
start, perhaps the brightest, most intensely coloured object I’d ever laid eyes
on. I liked living alongside it. It felt nourishing, somehow, a totem object of a
kind of collaboration that had not involved actual contact, actual proximity,
but that had nonetheless created links, drawing together a community of
strangers, scattered through time. I liked the way it gestured too at the
invisible presence of the body, partly because it was so obviously a garment,
hanging in the empty space of Larry’s studio, and partly because it had been
made by dozens of human hands, attesting in every stitch to human labour, to
the human desire to make things not because they are useful but because they
are pleasing or consoling in some way.
Art that repairs, art that longs for connection, or that finds a way to make it
possible. It was around this time that I came across Zoe Leonard’s
extraordinary work of mourning, Strange Fruit (for David). Strange Fruit is
an installation, completed in 1997 and now part of the Philadelphia Museum
of Art’s permanent collection. It’s made from 302 oranges, bananas,
grapefruits, lemons and avocados, their contents eaten and their torn skins
dried before being sutured back together with red, white and yellow thread,
embellished with zippers, buttons, sinew, stickers, plastic, wire and fabric.
The results are exhibited sometimes together and sometimes in small
groupings, laid in state across the gallery floor, where they continue on their
implacable business of rotting or shrinking or mouldering away, until in time
they will turn to dust and vanish altogether.
This piece, which is clearly part of the vanitas tradition in art, the practice
of depicting matter as it passes from radiance to decomposition, was made in
memory of David Wojnarowicz, who had been a close friend of Leonard’s.
They first met back in 1980, when they worked together at the nightclub
Danceteria, the after-hours headquarters of the downtown New Wave scene.
Later, they were both members of ACT UP, and were for a time also in the
same affinity group, which is to say that they’d made art and talked about art
and attended protests and been arrested together for over a decade.
David’s death in 1992 coincided with a period in which ACT UP began to
fragment and factionalise, its membership buckling under the strain of trying
to transform entrenched and toxic systems while caring for and mourning
beloved friends. Many people withdrew around that time, among them
Leonard, who left New York, travelling to India before spending stints in offseason Provincetown and then in Alaska. Strange Fruit was made during
those years of solitude, arising if not in response to then certainly as a
consequence of the mass losses of the AIDS years, the exhaustion of
labouring to bring about political change.
In an interview in 1997 with her friend, the art historian Anna Blume,
Leonard talked about how the first fruits came into being.
It was sort of a way to sew myself back up. I didn’t even realize I was
making art when I started doing them . . . I was tired of wasting things.
Throwing things out all the time. One morning I’d eaten these two oranges,
and I just didn’t want to throw the peels away, so absentmindedly I sewed
them back up.
The results immediately recalled David’s own stitched works, which recur in
a variety of mediums, among them objects, photographs, performances and
scenes in films. A cut loaf of bread, the two halves loosely darned back
together, so that the space between them is filled with a cat’s cradle of
scarlet embroidery thread. A famous photograph of his own face, his lips
stitched shut, the points where the needle has apparently entered marked with
dots of what looks like blood. These are among the signature works of the
AIDS crisis, pieces that attest to silencing and endurance; to the isolation of
being denied a voice. Sometimes the sewing seems redemptive, but more
often it is used to expose and draw attention to censorship and hidden
violence, to the kind of sundering and shunning that was going on everywhere
in David’s world.
The fruit are recognisably objects from the same war. The title picks up on
the ugly slang word fruit for gay men, the strange produce, the outcasts of
society. And it alludes too to Billie Holiday’s song about lynching: hatred
and discrimination enacted physically, with extreme violence, on the twisted
and burned bodies hanging in the trees. Billie Holiday, who gave voice to
loneliness both personal and institutional, who lived and died inside it, a life
short on love and brutalised by racism. Billie Holiday, who was called
Blackie to her face and made to take the back door even in venues where she
was herself the headline act, wounds that she attempted to medicate with the
poisonous ameliorators of alcohol and heroin. Billie Holiday, who in the
summer of 1959 collapsed in her room on West 87th Street while eating
custard and oatmeal, and who was taken first to the Knickerbocker and then
to the Metropolitan Hospital in Harlem, where she was left – as so many
AIDS patients would be in the years that followed, particularly if they too
had black or brown skin – on a gurney in a corridor, just another dope case.
The worst thing about this act of dehumanisation and denial of care was
that it had happened before, back in 1937, when a stranger telephoned to tell
her that her father Clarence was dead and where should they ship the body,
the blood still staining his white dress shirt. Pneumonia, she recorded in her
autobiography, Lady Sings the Blues: ‘And it wasn’t the pneumonia that
killed him, it was Dallas, Texas. That’s where he was and where he walked
around, going from hospital to hospital trying to get help. But none of them
would even so much as take his temperature or take him in. That’s the way it
was.’
She sang the song ‘Strange Fruit’ in protest against his death, its lyrics
seeming ‘to spell out all the things that had killed Pop’. And then all those
same things killed her too. She never got out of the Metropolitan. She was put
under arrest for possession of narcotics, and spent the final month of her life
dying in a hospital room guarded by two policemen, the humiliations metered
out to the stigmatised being apparently unlimited.
In its work, ACT UP attempted to address at least some of these things, to
untangle and challenge the systemic forces that made some bodies matter less
than others, that made the bodies of homosexuals and drug addicts and people
of colour and the homeless seem expendable. In the late 1980s, it was agreed
by the ACT UP floor that their work should broaden out beyond gay men, to
become more inclusive and to address the needs of other populations, among
them drug users and women, particularly prostitutes.
Leonard’s own work, which she describes in the ACT UP Oral History
Project, was centred around needle exchanges, then a radical way of
preventing the spread of AIDS. Though needle exchanges had briefly been
established in New York City by Mayor Koch, under the zero tolerance ethos
of the Giuliani administration they had become illegal, as they were in many
other places both in America and globally. Leonard helped to establish a
project that provided clean works and AIDS education for addicts, an
activity for which she was arrested, charged, tried and risked a lengthy jail
sentence in order to challenge the legality of syringe possession laws.
Strange Fruit is needlework of a different kind. It isn’t activism, not like
attending a protest or willingly breaking the law, and yet it deals with some
of the same forces. It takes the pain of exclusion and loss and isolation, and
holds them, quietly. It is political, yes, but it is also personal, attesting to
experiences that are the inescapable consequence of embodiment.
Speechless, very silent, the fruit convey in their smallness, their particularity,
the pain of breakage, of vanishing, of longing for something beloved that has
departed and will not come again.
Their entreaty survives even the translation to a computer screen. Looking
at them as .jpgs – a sutured orange, a banana wound absurdly with string – it
is hard not to feel a tug of emotion, both in response to the damage and to the
inadequate, attentive, hopeful, stubborn work of mending that had been done
to them, stitch by stitch, zipper by button.
I was not the only person to find the fruit affecting. In a monograph for
Frieze about Zoe Leonard’s work, the critic Jenni Sorkin describes seeing
the installation for the first time while wandering irritably around the
Philadelphia Museum of Art some time around the beginning of the
millennium. ‘From a distance,’ she writes, ‘it looked like detritus. Then I got
closer and stopped being annoyed and instead became very sad and felt
suddenly very alone – despair hit me like a truck. The sewn fruit was
absurdly, inexplicably, intimate.’
Loss is a cousin of loneliness. They intersect and overlap, and so it’s not
surprising that a work of mourning might invoke a feeling of aloneness, of
separation. Mortality is lonely. Physical existence is lonely by its nature,
stuck in a body that’s moving inexorably towards decay, shrinking, wastage
and fracture. Then there’s the loneliness of bereavement, the loneliness of
lost or damaged love, of missing one or many specific people, the loneliness
of mourning.
All this, though, could be conveyed with dead fruit, with drying skins on a
gallery floor. What makes Strange Fruit so deeply touching, so intensely
painful, is the work of stitching, which makes legible another aspect of
loneliness: its endless agonising hope. Loneliness as a desire for closeness,
for joining up, joining in, joining together, for gathering what has otherwise
been sundered, abandoned, broken or left in isolation. Loneliness as a
longing for integration, for a sense of feeling whole.
It’s a funny business, threading things together, patching them up with
cotton or string. Practical, but also symbolic, a work of the hands and the
psyche alike. One of the most thoughtful accounts of the meanings contained
in activities of this kind is provided by the psychoanalyst and paediatrician
D. W. Winnicott, an heir to the work of Melanie Klein. Winnicott began his
psychoanalytic career treating evacuee children during the Second World
War. He worked lifelong on attachment and separation, developing along the
way the concept of the transitional object, of holding, and of false and real
selves, and how they develop in response to environments of danger and of
safety.
In Playing and Reality, he describes the case of a small boy whose mother
repeatedly left him to go into hospital, first to have his baby sister and then to
receive treatment for depression. In the wake of these experiences, the boy
became obsessed with string, using it to tie the furniture in the house together,
knotting tables to chairs, yoking cushions to the fireplace. On one alarming
occasion, he even tied a string around the neck of his infant sister.
Winnicott thought these actions were not, as the parents feared, random,
naughty or insane, but rather declarative, a way of communicating something
inadmissible in language. He thought that what the boy was trying to express
was both a terror of separation and a desire to regain the contact he
experienced as imperilled, maybe lost for good. ‘String,’ Winnicott wrote,
‘can be looked upon as an extension of all other techniques of
communication. String joins, just as it also helps in the wrapping up of
objects and in the holding of unintegrated material. In this respect, string has
a symbolic meaning for everyone,’ adding warningly: ‘an exaggeration of the
use of string can easily belong to the beginning of a sense of insecurity or the
idea of a lack of communication’.
The fear of separation is a central tenet of Winnicott’s work. Primarily an
infantile experience, it is a horror that lives on in the older child and the
adult too, returning forcibly in circumstances of vulnerability or isolation. At
its most extreme, this state gives rise to the cataclysmic feelings he called the
fruits of privation, which include:
1) going to pieces
2) falling for ever
3) complete isolation because of there being no means for
communication
4) disunion of psyche and soma
This list reports from the heart of loneliness, its central court. Falling apart,
falling forever, never resuming vitality, becoming locked in perpetuity into
the cell of solitary confinement, in which a sense of reality, of boundedness,
is rapidly eroded: these are the consequences of separation, its bitter fruit.
What the infant desires in these scenes of abandonment is to be held, to be
contained, to be soothed by the rhythms of the breath, the pumping heart, to be
received back through the good mirror of the mother’s smiling face. As for
the older child, or the adult who was inadequately nurtured or has been cast
backwards by loss into a primal experience of separation, these feelings
often spark a need for transitional objects, for cathected, loved things that can
help the self to gather and regroup.
One of the most interesting things about Winnicott’s account of the small
string-obsessed boy is that though he’s at pains to insist the behaviour is not
abnormal, he does perceive dangers associated with it. If contact was not
renewed, he thought the individual could potentially topple from grief into
despair, in which case the object play would become instead what he called
perverse. In this unwelcome state of affairs, the function of the string would
change ‘into a denial of separation. As a denial of separation string becomes
a thing in itself, something that has dangerous properties and must needs be
mastered’.
When I first read that statement, I immediately recalled the big wicker bin
in Henry Darger’s room that I’d visited in Chicago. It was filled with the
salvaged coils and snippets of string that he gathered from gutters and trash
cans across the city. Back home, he spent hours each day unravelling them,
smoothing out the strands before tying them together. It was an occupation
that he found deeply emotional, to judge from his journal, in which he
records not much more than attendance at mass and tangles and difficulties
with cord and brown twine.
29 March 1968: ‘Tantrums over tangles and tied knots slipping in twine.
Threaten to throw ball at sacred images because of this difficulty.’ 1 April
1968: ‘Over tanglement of twine, difficult to do. Some severe tantrums and
swear words.’ 14 April 1968: ‘From 2 to Six P. M. undid tangle of white
twine to wrap around ball. More tantrums because sometimes the two ends of
twine won’t stay tied together.’ 16 April 1968: ‘Had trouble again with
twine. Mad enough to wish I was a bad tornado. Swore at God.’ 18 April
1968: ‘Lots of twine and cord. Not tough tangles this time. Did singing
instead of tantrums and swearing.’
There is in this record such emotional intensity, such profound swells of
anger and distress, that one gets a visceral sense of what it might be like to
regard string as a dangerous material: to see it as something that must be
subdued, something into which larger anxieties could be channelled,
something that if handled wrongly could unleash an outpouring of
overwhelming grief or rage.
But according to Winnicott, this kind of activity could do more than simply
deny separation or displace feeling. The use of transitional objects like string
could also be a way of acknowledging damage and healing wounds, binding
up the self so that contact could be renewed. Art, Winnicott thought, was a
place in which this kind of labour might be attempted, where one could move
freely between integration and disintegration, doing the work of mending, the
work of grief, preparing oneself for the dangerous, lovely business of
intimacy.
*
It seems funny to think that healing or coming to terms with loneliness and
loss, or with the damage accrued in scenes of closeness, the inevitable
wounds that occur whenever people become entangled with one another,
might take place by means of objects. It seems funny, and yet the more I
thought about it the more prevalent it was. People make things – make art or
things that are akin to art – as a way of expressing their need for contact, or
their fear of it; people make objects as a way of coming to terms with shame,
with grief. People make objects to strip themselves down, to survey their
scars, and people make objects to resist oppression, to create a space in
which they can move freely. Art doesn’t have to have a reparative function,
any more than it has a duty to be beautiful or moral. All the same, there is art
that gestures towards repair; that, like Wojnarowicz’s stitched loaf of bread,
traverses the fragile space between separation and connection.
In the final five years of his life, Andy Warhol also worked with stitching,
sewing photographic images together to form 309 organic, homespun
versions of the old multiples. One of the most beautiful in this series is a
patchwork of nine black and white photographs of his friend Jean-Michel
Basquiat. They have been made a little imperfect during their passage
through the sewing machine: the edges crimped, uncut threads trailing from
the margins.
In the photograph, Basquiat is eating, tucking into a fantastic spread. His
eyes are closed and he’s almost crouching at the table, propelling into a
mouth so open you can see his molars a forkful of what looks to be French
toast. Full flash, a blur or shadow at his jaw. He’s dressed all in white, white
light bouncing off his face. On the crammed table in front of him are piled
plates, which only slowly resolve into the classic components of a diner
brunch. Fruit cup, chrome milk and coffee jug, salt and pepper cellars, a jar
of paper twists of sugar and a foaming glass of liquid, maybe beer. The
impression is of opulence, richness, plenitude: all the abstract qualities, in
fact, that Basquiat craved in his headlong pursuit of the never enough, his
insatiable hunger that neither money, drugs nor fame could fill, and which
was partly about being a black man trying to achieve recognition in a society
that continually rejected him even as he was lauded and encircled.
In both the shape and cause of his hunger, Basquiat was not unlike his hero
Billie Holiday. Like her, he was dogged no matter how famous he became by
racism: mistaken for a pimp; refused entry to smart parties; unable even to
get a cab to stop on the street, but forced instead to hide while white
girlfriends did the hailing. His exquisite, inscrutable, magical art was set
against all that, formulating its own deliberate language of dissent, creating a
spell of resistance, speaking out in a rebellious tongue against systems of
power and of malice. No wonder he was haunted when he discovered that
Holiday didn’t have a gravestone, spending a consumed few days designing
one to suit her: an object that would rightly mark the manner of her living and
the manifest cruelty of her death.
Warhol may not have understood all this, though he certainly witnessed
scenes in which Basquiat was humiliated and excluded, collaborating with
him too on a portrait of Billie Holiday, reclining in red shoes over a bluedout Del Monte sign. All the same, despite their many differences, these two
men became inseparable.
Warhol loved Basquiat, in the same way that he had once loved Ondine. They
first met in 1980, when Jean-Michel, then a grubby young graffiti artist who
went by the tag SAMO, Same Old Shit, came up to him in the street and
hustled him into buying a painting he didn’t want.
‘One of those kids who drive me crazy,’ reports the first diary entry to
mention his name, 4 October 1982, but soon it is went to meet Jean Michel
at the office, or cabbed to meet Jean Michel; soon they are working out at
the gym together and having their nails done; soon Jean-Michel is calling at
all hours, sometimes to gossip and sometimes to spill a circuitry of anxiety
and paranoia, of which Warhol observes: ‘But actually if he’s even on the
phone talking to me, he’s okay.’
In some ways Warhol shared Basquiat’s greed for sensation, though not
when it came to sex or drugs. According to the evidence of the diaries, in
which Basquiat appears on 113 of the 807 pages, his heroic consumption
both fascinated and repelled Warhol. Describing Basquiat’s lengthy holiday
with a girlfriend, he asked querulously, ‘I mean, how long can you suck
dick,’ a question that tripped him into a very rare statement of regret about
his own withdrawal from the arena of the physical: ‘Oh, I don’t know. I guess
I’ve missed out on a lot in life – never pickups on the street or anything like
that. I feel life has passed me by.’
He worried over Basquiat, longed for his company, and fretted over his
heroin use, the times he’d come up to the studio and slump over a painting,
taking five minutes to tie his shoe, or curling up and falling asleep right there
on the Factory floor. What he loved most was the creativity of their
friendship, the way they made work together, side by side or even on the
same canvas, their lines merging as Warhol increasingly adopted Basquiat’s
vernacular, his fabulously distinctive style. Basquiat brought him back to
painting, introducing him too to a more creative crowd, the kind he’d been
surrounded by in the 1960s and had lost touch with over the course of his
vacuum-packed, tinsel years.
Some of this ardency leaks into the photograph, along with a palpable
concern about where appetite is going, what its final destination might be. It
often seems that there is a body-snatching quality to Warhol’s portraiture,
something vampiric about his desire to snap other people’s countenances, to
store and reproduce and multiply their essences. But I sometimes wonder if
what he was trying to do was snatch them out of danger, by which I mean the
danger of death that lurks everywhere in his work, from the paintings of
electric chairs to Empire, his slow-motion, single-shot eight hour and five
minute film of the Empire State Building over the course of an entire night,
that long steady look at time washing over the face of the world.
One thing to confront it in your art, quite another to do it in real life.
Warhol was always jittery around illness or any sign of physical decay, still
the little boy who’d hidden under his bed right through his father’s wake. His
terror of death drove the phobia of hospitals he shared with Billie Holiday.
The place, he called them, demanding that cab drivers make detours so that
he could avoid catching so much as a contaminating glimpse of their front
doors. His friendship with Basquiat coincided precisely with the gathering
AIDS crisis, the entries interleaving in his journal.
Death and disappearance everywhere; death and disappearance explicitly
yoked to appetite, to eros and to the fleeting, unstoppable ecstasy of getting
high.
Warhol must have felt an intimation of threat, some premonition of
potential loss, watching his friend twisting on the hook of heroin, shuttling
between paranoia and somnambulance. As it happens, though, death being
perverse above all things, it was he who died first, slipping quietly away in
the early hours of Sunday 22 February 1987 in a private room in New York
Hospital while recovering from apparently uneventful emergency surgery to
remove his damaged gallbladder, an operation he had tried desperately to
evade. Unlikely as it might once have seemed, Basquiat outlived him by
eighteen months before overdosing on heroin in the summer of 1988 in the
building on Great Jones Street, in pre-gentrification Soho, that he rented from
Andy.
In its obituary, the New York Times observed: ‘Mr. Warhol’s death last
year removed one of the few reins on Mr. Basquiat’s mercurial behavior and
appetite for narcotics.’ Perhaps Warhol’s sense of being a rein on Basquiat, a
tethering thread, is part of why the stitched portrait seems of a piece with the
Extinction silkscreens he made in 1983, at the behest of environmental
activists: a series which also communicates his anxiety about beloved
creatures being lost or snatched away. Each one displays a species that was
imperilled, that was running out of time, among them an African elephant, a
black rhino and a bighorn ram, the sadness and gravity of their regard
undiminished by the pop colours, the commercial cheer. Mementos from a
time of disappearances, the first intimations of the uncountable losses with
which we’re now confronted, the unimaginable loneliness of being left
behind in the world we have despoiled.
Against this omnipresent, quickening threat of extinction, against the
mounting risk of abandonment, Warhol summoned things, a ballast of objects,
a way to check or trap or maybe even trick time altogether. Like many
people, among them Henry Darger, he treated his separation anxiety, his fear
of loss and loneliness, by hoarding and collecting, by shopping obsessively.
This is the acquisitive Andy immortalised in the silver statue in Union
Square, his Polaroid camera around his neck, a Bloomingdale’s Medium
Brown Bag in his right hand. This is the Andy who before taking the cab to
hospital with what must have been an agonisingly painful infected
gallbladder spent his last hours at home on East 66th Street stuffing his safe
with valuables, the Andy whose house after his death was found to be
crammed on every floor with hundreds and thousands of unopened packages
and bags, containing everything from underwear and cosmetics to Art Deco
antiques.
But like every ordinary activity in which he participated, Warhol also
alchemised his hoarding into art. The largest and most extensive artwork he
ever made was the Time Capsules, 610 sealed brown cardboard boxes filled
over the last thirteen years of his life with all the varied detritus that flooded
into the Factory: postcards, letters, newspapers, magazines, photographs,
invoices, slices of pizza, a piece of chocolate cake, even a mummified human
foot. He kept one on the go in his office at the Factory and one at home,
moving them when full into a storage unit, though his intention was eventually
to sell or exhibit them somehow. After his death they were transferred to the
Warhol Museum in Pittsburgh, where a team of curators have been working
since the early 1990s to systematically catalogue their contents.
While I was living at Larry’s, I decided I wanted to look at the Time
Capsules, to see what it was that Warhol wanted to preserve. The project
wasn’t yet open to the public, and so once again I wrote a begging letter to
the curator, who agreed that I could spend five days viewing but not touching
some of the contents.
I’d never been to Pittsburgh before. My hotel was a few blocks from the
Warhol, and each morning I walked to it on a street that ran parallel to the
river, wishing I’d brought gloves. I fell in love with the museum at first sight.
My favourite space was towards the top of the building: a maze of dimly lit,
echoing rooms in which a dozen of Warhol’s movies from the 1960s were
being projected. I’d never seen them full-size before, flickering and granular,
the colour of mercury or tarnished silver. All those lovely things his eye had
eaten up. John Giorni’s dreaming, somnolent body. The beautiful Mario
Montez, resplendent in a white fur headdress, slowly and erotically
consuming a banana. A naked, cavorting Taylor Mead, whose memorial
service at St Mark’s Church I went to the next year, wanting to pay my
respects to the diminishing Warhol circle. Nico in Chelsea Girls; the sky
behind the Empire State Building growing infinitesimally more light. Time in
the room was running palpably slow, hanging heavy, because of the way the
films were projected at half speed.
The Time Capsules themselves were kept on metal shelves in the
archivists’ lair on the fourth floor. At the end of the room, a man inside a
plastic tent was carrying out the delicate work of conservation, and at a table
near the front a young woman with a magnifying glass was identifying people
in Warhol’s photographs. The artist Jeremy Deller was also visiting,
resplendent in a Barbie pink Puffa jacket. He’d known Warhol in the 1980s
and among the pile of pictures he found a couple of them hanging out together
in Warhol’s suite at a grand London hotel, Deller in a stripy blazer and Andy
with a floppy, slightly foolish hat perched above his wig.
To view the Capsules, we had to don blue plastic gloves. The curator took
down the boxes one by one, laying out each item on a protective sheet of
paper. Time Capsule –27 was filled with Julia Warhola’s clothes: her floral
aprons and yellowing scarves, a black velour hat with a rhinestone pin, a
letter that began Dear Buba and Uncle Andy, Did Santa Clause come up
there? Did you see TV? Old satin flowers, a single earring, a dirty paper
towel, many of them packed away in plastic carrot bags, a lasting record of
Julia’s eccentric storage solutions, her stubborn thrift.
In Time Capsule 522, there were remnants of Basquiat, including his birth
certificate, which he had tagged, and a drawing he’d done of Andy all in
blue, his arms wide open, holding a camera with the word CAMERA in block
capitals beneath it. There was a letter from him too, on paper from the Royal
Hawaiian hotel, three sparsely written pages, that started HI SWEETHEART,
HERE IN WAIKIKI.
But alongside these seemingly precious relics were other boxes filled with
hundreds of stamps, with hotel pyjamas still in their wrappers, with cigarette
butts and pencils, with pages and pages of jotted notes containing names for
Superstars that never were. A used paintbrush, a ticket stub for the opera, a
New York State Driver’s Manual, a single brown suede glove. Candy
wrappers, not quite empty bottles of Chloé and Ma Griffe, an inflatable
birthday cake signed with a Sharpie, Love Yoko & Co.
What were the Capsules, really? Trash cans, coffins, vitrines, safes; ways
of keeping the loved together, ways of never having to admit to loss or feel
the pain of loneliness. Like Leonard’s Strange Fruit, they have something of
the feeling of an ontological investigation. What is left after the essence has
departed? Rind and skin, things you want to throw away but somehow can’t.
What would Winnicott have made of them? Would he have used the word
perverse, or would he have seen their tenderness, the way they work to arrest
time, to prevent the quick and dead from slipping too far, too fast?
Andy’s nephew Donald was giving a talk at the museum while I was there,
as he did most weeks. One afternoon we sat down in the café together and he
told me about his uncle, speaking slowly and distinctly into my little silver
tape recorder. What he remembered most was Andy’s kindness, how he liked
to joke around with the kids, as his two beloved dachshunds, Amos and
Archie, ran barking round the room. His apartment had been crammed from
top to bottom with fascinating objects, and Donald remembered thinking even
then that it was a microcosm of New York, the city that seemed so thrilling to
him as a child.
Uncle Andy had a knack for listening, for getting whoever he was with to
speak about their lives, even if they were children. ‘I think he didn’t like to
talk about himself, because he just found other people more interesting,’
Donald said, adding later that he thought Warhol had found himself boring.
Andrew Warhola, that is, the vulnerable human self still resident beneath the
silvered wig and corset.
He touched on Warhol’s Catholicism, something that he shared with both
Darger and Wojnarowicz: how every Sunday was a holy day, on which he
would invariably go to church. This information aligned with references in
the diaries to spending repeated Christmas days doling out food in homeless
shelters, an aspect of Warhol that tends to be eclipsed by tales of party-going
and celebrity friends. He talked too about how much Andy had missed his
mother after she died, how he had learned to live around the loss.
I asked him then if he thought that Warhol was happy and he said that Andy
was at his happiest in his studio, a place that Donald described as his
playland, adding that he thought Andy had sacrificed a great deal to become
an artist, including the possibility of having a family of his own. Later, after
I’d turned off the machine and we were walking out of the café, we began to
chat about the Capsules, and he said musingly, maybe they were a partner to
him.
Maybe they were, or at least a way of occupying the space a partner would
have inhabited. Or maybe it was just reassuring to know that whatever
happened, whoever vanished next, he had all the evidence in order, boxed
and ready for the case against death.
*
It’s easy to forget that Warhol was a stitched work in his own right. On the
last day that I was at the Museum, one of the curators showed me a box of the
corsets Andy had no choice but to wear every day of his life after Solanas’s
bullet passed right through him, clipping organs, ricocheting through his
interior and leaving him with a permanent hernia, a hole in his belly. Bauer
& Black, Abdominal Belt, Extra Small, Made in the USA, the label read.
They were shockingly tiny, to fit his twenty-eight-inch waist. Many had
been hand-dyed by his friend Brigid Berlin, also known as Brigid Polk and
the Duchess, B to his A. She’d picked cheerful colours, tomato red and
lettuce green, lavender, orange, lemon and a pretty bluish-grey. They looked
like the sort of thing Marie Antoinette might wear – a post-punk Marie,
anyway, off to Danceteria in a towering pink wig. ‘She does a beautiful job
on them,’ Warhol told the Diary in 1981. ‘The colors are so glamorous,’
adding regretfully of his then crush: ‘but it looks like no one will ever see
them on me – things aren’t progressing with Jon.’
The corsets made me more aware than anything of Warhol as a physical
presence, a body that was always on the verge of falling apart. He spent so
much of his life trying to stick himself together, an assemblage of purchased
parts: the white and blond wigs, the big glasses, the cosmetics he used to
conceal his patchy reddish skin, his ugly open pores. One of the most
prevalent phrases in his diary is glued myself together, which is to say the
nightly routine of taping on his wig, putting together the finished Andy, the
public production, the camera-ready, professional version. Towards the end
of his life, he often spent evenings playing with cosmetics in front of his
mirror, giving himself better and brighter faces, the same benevolent,
flattering magic trick he’d performed for hundreds of celebrities and
socialites, from Debbie Harry to Chairman Mao.
The glue only failed him once, on 30 October 1985, when he was signing
copies of his photobook America at Rizzoli bookstore. In front of the queue,
in front of the entire store, a pretty, well-dressed girl ran up and snatched his
wig off, exposing his bald head, a signifier of shame, permanently concealed
since he first began to lose his hair as a young man.
He didn’t run away. He pulled up the hood of his Calvin Klein coat and
carried on signing for the crowd. To his diary a few days later, he began by
saying: ‘Okay, let’s get it over with. Wednesday. The day my biggest
nightmare came true.’ He described the experience as agonising. ‘It was so
shocking. It hurt. Physically. And it hurt because nobody had warned me.’
No wonder. Imagine being stripped, having the most excruciating portions
of your body bared to hostile or amused witnesses. Back when he was a little
boy, Andrew Warhola had once refused to go to school for a whole year
because a girl in his class had kicked him. But this was worse; not just
violence against his person, but rather having the pieces of himself torn apart,
literally disarticulated.
There are very few images I can think of in which Warhol shows this
aspect of himself willingly, divested of his uniform, exposing the same
vulnerable human form that both the corsets and the Time Capsules protected
him against. Back in New York, I hunted out the series of black and white
photographs taken by Richard Avedon in the summer of 1969, in which
Warhol in a black leather jacket and black sweater flaunts his scarred
abdomen, posing like St Sebastian, his arms akimbo.
The other portrait of undress was painted by Alice Neel in 1970 and is
now owned by the Whitney. In it, Warhol is sitting on a couch, wearing
brown trousers and gleaming brown shoes. He’s strapped into his corset, but
is otherwise naked to the waist, revealing a scarred and dented chest, marked
by two deep intersecting purple gashes, which divide his ribcage into
triangles. Running on either side of them is a ladder of quick white dashes
that represent the ghosts of stitches. Neel’s eye, Neel’s brush lingers
attentively on his ruined body, beautiful and damaged. She gets it all: the
slender wrists, the bulging corseted belly, the delicate little breasts with their
pink areolae.
I loved how Warhol looked in that picture, the careful reticent way he
holds himself. His eyes are closed, his chin is up. Neel has done his face in a
lovely muted palette of pale pinks and greys, with thin shadowy blue lines
running along his jaw and hairline, giving him the exquisite pallor he’d
always craved, and emphasising the remarkable fineness of his bones. What
is the word for his expression? It’s not exactly proud or ashamed; it is a
creature tolerating inspection, at once exposed and withdrawn; an image of
resilience as well as profound, unsettling vulnerability.
Strange, to see such an adept gazer submitting to someone else’s scrutiny.
‘He looks a bit like a woman, male and female in one,’ the painter Marlene
Dumas commented of the portrait. ‘Warhol was also enigmatic; there is a
total fake, artificial aspect, then there is the lonely aspect of an alienated
character.’
Loneliness is not supposed to induce empathy, but like Wojnarowicz’s
diaries and Klaus Nomi’s voice, that painting of Warhol was one of the things
that most medicated my own feelings of loneliness, giving me a sense of the
potential beauty present in a frank declaration that one is human and as such
subject to need. So much of the pain of loneliness is to do with concealment,
with feeling compelled to hide vulnerability, to tuck ugliness away, to cover
up scars as if they are literally repulsive. But why hide? What’s so shameful
about wanting, about desire, about having failed to achieve satisfaction,
about experiencing unhappiness? Why this need to constantly inhabit peak
states, or to be comfortably sealed inside a unit of two, turned inward from
the world at large?
In her discussion about Strange Fruit, Zoe Leonard made a statement
about this business of imperfection, about the way life is made up of endless
failures of intimacy, endless errors and separations, that anyway culminate
only with loss. At first, she says, the sewing
. . . was a way to think about David. I’d think about the things I’d like to
repair and all the things I’d like to put back together, not only losing him in
his death, but losing him in our friendship while he was still alive. After a
while I began thinking about loss itself, the actual act of repairing. All the
friends I’d lost, all the mistakes I’ve made. The inevitability of a scarred life.
The attempt to sew it back together . . . This mending cannot possibly mend
any real wounds, but it provided something for me. Maybe just time, or the
rhythm of sewing. I haven’t been able to change anything in the past, or bring
back any of the people I love who have died, but I’ve been able to
experience my love and loss in a measured and continuous way; to
remember.
There are so many things that art can’t do. It can’t bring the dead back to life,
it can’t mend arguments between friends, or cure AIDS, or halt the pace of
climate change. All the same, it does have some extraordinary functions,
some odd negotiating ability between people, including people who never
meet and yet who infiltrate and enrich each other’s lives. It does have a
capacity to create intimacy; it does have a way of healing wounds, and better
yet of making it apparent that not all wounds need healing and not all scars
are ugly.
If I sound adamant it is because I am speaking from personal experience.
When I came to New York I was in pieces, and though it sounds perverse, the
way I recovered a sense of wholeness was not by meeting someone or by
falling in love, but rather by handling the things that other people had made,
slowly absorbing by way of this contact the fact that loneliness, longing, does
not mean one has failed, but simply that one is alive.
There is a gentrification that is happening to cities, and there is a
gentrification that is happening to the emotions too, with a similarly
homogenising, whitening, deadening effect. Amidst the glossiness of late
capitalism, we are fed the notion that all difficult feelings – depression,
anxiety, loneliness, rage – are simply a consequence of unsettled chemistry, a
problem to be fixed, rather than a response to structural injustice or, on the
other hand, to the native texture of embodiment, of doing time, as David
Wojnarowicz memorably put it, in a rented body, with all the attendant grief
and frustration that entails.
I don’t believe the cure for loneliness is meeting someone, not necessarily.
I think it’s about two things: learning how to befriend yourself and
understanding that many of the things that seem to afflict us as individuals are
in fact a result of larger forces of stigma and exclusion, which can and should
be resisted.
Loneliness is personal, and it is also political. Loneliness is collective; it
is a city. As to how to inhabit it, there are no rules and nor is there any need
to feel shame, only to remember that the pursuit of individual happiness does
not trump or excuse our obligations to each another. We are in this together,
this accumulation of scars, this world of objects, this physical and temporary
heaven that so often takes on the countenance of hell. What matters is
kindness; what matters is solidarity. What matters is staying alert, staying
open, because if we know anything from what has gone before us, it is that
the time for feeling will not last.

4
4
8
NOTES
BACKGROUND MATERIAL ABOUT DAVID WOJNAROWICZ’S life and work comes
from the wonderfully rich David Wojnarowicz Papers (MSS 092) at Fales
Library and Special Collections, New York University Libraries (hereafter
Fales). Cynthia Carr’s extraordinarily detailed, beautiful and acute
Wojnarowicz biography, Fire in the Belly (Bloomsbury, 2012), was also
indispensible.
The ACT UP Oral History Project, founded by Jim Hubbard and Sarah
Schulman, was of great assistance in understanding both the progress of
AIDS in New York City and the work of ACT UP.Transcripts of all
interviews can be read at www.actuporalhistory.org, and footage can be
viewed at Videotapes, Manuscripts and Archives Division, The New York
Public Library.
Unpublished material about Darger’s life is drawn from the Henry
Darger Papers, American Folk Art Museum Archives, New York (hereafter
HDP).
I’m particularly indebted to Gail Levin and Breanne Fahs, the
biographers of Edward Hopper and Valerie Solanas respectively, whose
meticulous biographies bring into print the remarkable details of their
subjects’ lives, including many previously unpublished letters and
interviews.
CHAPTER 1: THE LONELY CITY
‘a chronic disease without redeeming features . . .’: Robert Weiss, Loneliness: The
Experience of Emotional and Social Isolation (MIT Press, 1975), p. 15.
‘If I could catch the feeling . . .’:Virginia Woolf, ed. Anne Olivier Bell, The Diary of Virginia
Woolf, Volume III 1925–1930 (Hogarth Press, 1980), p. 260.
‘Loneliness is a . . .’: Dennis Wilson,‘Thoughts of You’, Pacific Ocean Blue (1977).
16
17
17
17
20
22
23
24
25
26
26
30
31
33
33
34
34
37
38
39
40
40
40
41
CHAPTER 2: WALLS OF GLASS
‘It’s nothing accurate at all . . .’: Gail Levin, Edward Hopper:An Intimate Biography (Rizzoli,
2007), p. 493.
‘The loneliness thing is . . .’: Brian O’Doherty, American Masters:The Voice and the Myth (E.
P. Dutton, 1982), p. 9.
‘Are your paintings reflective . . .’: Hopper’s Silence, dir. Brian O’Doherty (1981).
‘certain kinds of spaces . . .’: Carter Foster, Hopper’s Drawings (Whitney Museum/Yale
University Press, 2013), p. 151.
‘our most poignant . . .’: Joyce Carol Oates,‘Nighthawk:A Memoir of Lost Time’, Yale Review,
Vol. 89, Issue 2, April 2001, pp. 56–72.
‘brilliant streak . . .’: Deborah Lyons, ed., Edward Hopper: A Journal of His Work (Whitney
Museum of American Art/W. W. Norton, 1997), p. 63.
‘the exceedingly unpleasant . . .’: Harry Stack Sullivan, The Interpersonal Theory of
Psychiatry (Routledge, 2001 [1953]), p. 290.
‘The writer who wishes . . .’:Frieda Fromm-Reichmann,‘On Loneliness’, in Psychoanalysis and
Psychotherapy: Selected Papers of Frieda Fromm-Reichmann, ed. Dexter M. Bullard
(University of Chicago Press, 1959), p. 325.
‘Loneliness, in its quintessential form . . .’: ibid., pp. 327–8.
‘I don’t know why . . .’: ibid., pp. 330–31.
‘possessed . . .’: Robert Weiss, Loneliness:The Experience of Emotional and Social
Isolation, pp. 11–13.
‘The man’s the work . . .’: Katherine Kuh, The Artist’s Voice: Talks with Seventeen Artists
(Harper & Row, 1960), p. 131.
‘I’m being very biographic . . .’: Interview with Edward Hopper and Arlene Jacobowitz, April
29, 1966 from ‘Listening to Pictures’ program of the Brooklyn Museum. Gift of the Brooklyn
Museum. Archives of American Art, Smithsonian Institution (housed at Edward and Josephine
Hopper Research Collection; Whitney Museum of American Art, Frances Mulhall Achilles
Library).
‘I’d heard of Gertrude Stein . . .’: Brian O’Doherty, ‘Portrait: Edward Hopper’, Art in
America, Vol. 52, December 1964, p. 69.
‘It seemed awfully crude . . .’: ibid., p. 73.
‘They are not factual . . .’: Interview with Edward Hopper and Arlene Jacobowitz, April 29,
1966 from ‘Listening to Pictures’ program of the Brooklyn Museum. Gift of the Brooklyn
Museum. Archives of American Art, Smithsonian Institution (housed at Edward and Josephine
Hopper Research Collection; Whitney Museum of American Art, Frances Mulhall Achilles
Library).
‘The interior itself . . .’: Gail Levin, Edward Hopper, p. 138.
‘without a stitch on . . .’: ibid., p. 335.
‘Any talk with me . . .’: ibid., p. 389.
‘Should be married . . .’: ibid., pp. 124–5.
‘the most exact transcription . . .’: Edward Hopper, ‘Notes on Painting’, in Alfred H. Barr, Jr, et
al, Edward Hopper: Retrospective Exhibition, November 1 – December 7, 1933 (MoMA,
1933), p. 17.
‘to force this unwilling medium . . .’: ibid., p. 17.
‘I find in working always . . .’: ibid., p. 17.
‘I haven’t gone thru . . .’: Gail Levin, Edward Hopper, pp. 348–9.
43
48
51
52
53
55
56
56
59
59
60
61
62
62
63
63
65
65
66
67
68
68
68
69
71
71
72
73
73
73
73
‘seems to be the way . . .’: Katherine Kuh, The Artist’s Voice: Talks with Seventeen Artists, pp.
134–5.
CHAPTER 3: MY HEART OPENS TO YOUR VOICE
‘The silent adjustments . . .’: Ludwig Wittgenstein, Tractatus Logico-Philosophicus (Harcourt,
Brace & Co., 1922), p. 39.
‘I only know one language . . .’: Andy Warhol, The Philosophy of Andy Warhol (Penguin,
2007 [1975]), pp. 147–8.
‘To me good talkers . . .’: ibid., p. 62.
‘And my brother . . .’: Andy Warhol, The Andy Warhol Diaries, ed. Pat Hackett (Warner
Books, 1991), p. 575.
‘“ats” for “that is” . . .’: Victor Bockris, Warhol: The Biography (Da Capo Press, 2003
[1989]), p. 60.
‘He had an enormous inferiority complex . . .’: ibid., p. 115.
‘just a hopeless born loser . . .’: ibid., p. 91.
‘all the Cokes . . .’: Andy Warhol, The Philosophy of Andy Warhol, p. 101.
‘If everybody’s not a beauty . . .’: ibid., p. 62.
‘The reason I’m painting . . .’: Andy Warhol, interviewed by Gene Swenson, ‘What Is Pop Art?
Interviews with Eight Painters (Part 1)’, Art News, Issue 62, November 1963.
‘He made a virtue . . .’:Victor Bockris, Warhol:The Biography, p. 137.
‘Machines have less problems . . .’: Andy Warhol, ‘Pop Art: Cult of the Commonplace’, TIME,
Vol. 81, No. 18, 3 May 1963.
‘B is anybody . . .’: Andy Warhol, The Philosophy of Andy Warhol, p. 5.
‘I guess I wanted to be . . .’: ibid., p. 22.
‘At the times in my life . . .’: ibid., p. 21.
‘I need B because . . .’ ibid., p. 5.
‘finding it stunning and poignant . . .’: Stephen Shore, The Velvet Years: Warhol’s Factory
1965–67 (Pavilion Books, 1995) p. 23.
‘He was a little bit franker . . .’: ibid., p. 130.
‘I didn’t get married . . .’: Andy Warhol, The Philosophy of Andy Warhol, p. 26.
‘My guess is that it helped . . .’: Stephen Shore, The Velvet Years, p. 22.
‘I don’t really feel . . .’: Gretchen Berg, ‘Andy Warhol: My True Story’, in Kenneth Goldsmith,
I’ll Be Your Mirror: Selected Andy Warhol Interviews 1962–1987 (Da Capo Press, 2004), p.
91.
‘Andy was the worst . . .’: Mary Woronov, Swimming Underground: My Years in the Warhol
Factory (Serpent’s Tail, 2004), p. 121.
‘confidence in the stability . . .’: Rei Terada,‘Philosophical Self-Denial: Wittgenstein and the
Fear of Public Language’, Common Knowledge, Vol. 8, Issue 3, Fall 2002, pp. 464–81.
‘pure Ondine . . .’:Andy Warhol and Pat Hackett, POPism (Penguin, 2007 [1980]), p. 98.
‘you have finished me off . . .’ Andy Warhol, a, a novel (Virgin, 2005 [1968]), p. 280.
‘The only way to talk . . .’: ibid., p. 121.
‘I’m making love to the tape recorder . . .’: ibid., p. 445.
‘No, oh Della, please . . .’: ibid., p. 44.
‘may I ask you . . .’: ibid., p. 53.
‘Don’t you hate me . . .’: ibid., p. 256.
73
74
74
74
76
76
77
77
79
80
81
81
81
81
82
82
82
85
86
88
88
89
92
92
92
100
101
103
105
106
106
106
107
109
‘Please shut it off . . .’: ibid., p. 264.
‘The dialogue was straight . . .’: Warhol, The Andy Warhol Diaries, p. 406.
‘How old are you . . .’: Andy Warhol, a: a novel, p. 342.
‘SPF—Why do you avoid . . .’: ibid., p. 344.
‘Prussian tactics . . .’: ibid., p. 389.
‘Andy was the chief psychiatrist . . .’: Stephen Shore, The Velvet Years, p. 155.
‘something – work or a feeling . . .’: Lynne Tillman, ‘The Last Words are Andy Warhol’, Grey
Room, Vol. 21, Fall 2005, p. 40.
‘Out of the garbage . . .’: Andy Warhol, a, a novel, p. 451.
‘dominant, secure, self-confident . . .’:Valerie Solanas, SCUM Manifesto (Verso, 2004 [1971]),
p. 70.
‘SCUM is against the entire system . . .’: ibid., p. 76.
‘Valerie Solanas was a loner . . .’: Avital Ronell, ibid., p. 9.
‘It is a product . . .’: Mary Harron, in Breanne Fahs, Valerie Solanas (The Feminist Press,
2014), p. 61.
‘SCUM Manifesto was . . .’: ibid., p. 71.
‘A true community . . .’: Valerie Solanas, SCUM Manifesto, p. 49.
‘to keep under your pillow . . .’: Breanne Fahs, Valerie Solanas, p. 99.
‘dead serious . . .’: ibid., p. 87.
‘Andy, will you . . .’: ibid., pp. 100–102.
‘Toad . . .’: ibid., pp. 121–2.
‘I felt horrible, horrible . . .’: Andy Warhol, POPism, pp. 343–5.
‘Read my manifesto . . .’: Howard Smith,‘The Shot That Shattered The Velvet Underground’,
Village Voice,Vol. XIII, No. 34, 6 June 1968.
‘I’m a writer . . .’: Daily News, 4 June 1968.
‘do it again . . .’: Andy Warhol, POPism, p. 361.
‘glued-together . . .’: Andy Warhol, ibid., p. 358.
‘It’s too hard to care . . .’: Gretchen Berg, ‘Andy Warhol: My True Story’, in Kenneth
Goldsmith, I’ll Be Your Mirror: Selected Andy Warhol Interviews 1962–1987, p. 96.
‘What I never . . .’: Andy Warhol, POPism, p. 359.
CHAPTER 4: IN LOVING HIM
‘I’ve periodically . . .’: Cynthia Carr, Fire in the Belly, p. 133.
‘In my home one could not . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, Close to the Knives: A Memoir of
Disintegration (Vintage, 1991), p. 152.
‘testing testing testing . . .’: ibid., p. 6.
‘I did what I could . . .’: Tom Rauffenbart, Rimbaud in New York (Andrew Roth, 2004), p. 3.
‘There was no way . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, Fales, Series 8A, ‘David Wojnarowicz Interviewed
by Keith Davis’.
‘I could barely speak . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, Close to the Knives, p. 228.
‘My queerness . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, Fales, Series 7A, Box 9, Folder 2, ‘Biographical
Dateline’.
‘the sound of it . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, Close to the Knives, p. 105.
‘things I’d always . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, ed. Amy Scholder, In the Shadow of the
American Dream (Grove Press, 2000), p. 130.
109
110
110
113
114
117
118
119
120
121
122
122
123
123
124
126
128
129
131
131
132
133
133
155
156
158
164
165
‘I want to create . . .’: ibid., p. 219.
‘I found myself walking . . .’: ibid., p. 161.
‘Although the Rimbaud . . .’:Tom Rauffenbart, Rimbaud in New York, p. 3.
‘So simple, the appearance . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, Close to the Knives, p. 9.
‘the solitude of two persons . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, unpublished journal entry, Fales, Series 1,
Box 1, Folder 4, 26 September 1977.
‘Our society is . . .’: Valerie Solanas, SCUM Manifesto, p. 48.
‘a space at a libidinal . . .’: Samuel Delany, The Motion of Light on Water (Paladin, 1990), p.
202.
‘What has happened . . .’: Samuel Delany, Times Square Red, Times Square Blue (New York
University Press, 1999), p. 175.
‘Of course, not all . . .’: Maggie Nelson, The Art of Cruelty (W. W. Norton & Co., 2011), p.
183.
‘SCUM gets around . . .’: Valerie Solanas, SCUM Manifesto, p. 61.
‘When I stopped working . . .’: Charlotte Chandler, Ingrid Bergman: A Personal Biography
(Simon & Schuster, 2007), p. 239.
‘Often I just go where . . .’: People, Vol. 33, No. 17, 30 April 1990.
‘Just the kind of thing . . .’: Andy Warhol, The Andy Warhol Diaries, p. 634.
‘A LONELY FORM . . .’: Life, Vol. 38, No. 24, 24 January 1955.
‘That’s how I express . . .’: Barry Paris, Garbo (Sidgwick & Jackson, 1995), p. 539.
‘Scottie, what are you doing . . .’: Vertigo, dir.Alfred Hitchcock (1958).
‘The instant of photographing . . .’: Nan Goldin, The Ballad of Sexual Dependency
(Aperture, 2012 [1986]), p. 6.
‘third gender . . .’: Nan Goldin, The Other Side 1972–1992 (Cornerhouse Publications, 1993),
p. 5.
‘I saw the role . . .’: Nan Goldin, The Ballad of Sexual Dependency, p. 8.
‘I decided as a young girl . . .’: ibid., p. 145.
‘I want to make somebody . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, Brush Fires in the Social Landscape
(Aperture, 2015), p. 160.
‘I always consider myself . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, Close to the Knives, p. 183.
‘In loving him . . .’: ibid., p. 17.
CHAPTER 5: THE REALMS OF THE UNREAL
All material from Henry Darger’s memoir derives from Henry Darger, The History of My Life, Box
25, HDP.
‘My dear friend Miss Catherine . . .’: Henry Darger, letter to Catherine Schoeder (Katherine
Schloeder), Folder 48:30, 1 June 1959, Folder 48:30, Box 48, HDP.
‘Saturday April 12 . . .’: Henry Darger, Journal 27 Feb 1965 – 1 Jan 1972, Folder 33:3, Box
33, HDP.
‘The intention consisted . . .’: Pierre Cabanne, Dialogues with Marcel Duchamp (Da Capo
Press, 1988), p. 46.
‘This endless stream . . .’: John MacGregor, Henry Darger: In the Realms of the Unreal
(Delano Greenidge Editions, 2002), p. 117.
‘to play, to be happy . . .’: ibid., p. 195.
170
173
173
174
180
182
182
182
184
185
186
186
187
187
188
189
190
192
192
192
192
193
193
193
194
194
195
197
198
198
‘Grahams bank . . .’: Henry Darger, Predictions June 1911 – December 1917, Folder 33:1,
Box 33, HDP.
‘the sense of being alone . . .’: Melanie Klein, ‘On the Sense of Loneliness’, in Envy and
Gratitude and Other Works 1946–1963 (The Hogarth Press, 1975), p. 300.
‘an unattainable perfect internal . . .’: ibid., p. 300.
‘It is generally supposed . . .’: ibid., p. 302.
CHAPTER 6: AT THE BEGINNING OF THE END OF THE
WORLD
‘I might as well look . . .’: The Nomi Song, dir. Andrew Horn (2004).
‘I still get goose pimples . . .’: Steven Hager, Art After Midnight: The East Village Scene (St
Martin’s Press, 1986), p. 30.
‘Everyone was a freak . . .’: The Nomi Song, dir.Andrew Horn (2004).
‘you were witnessing one of . . .’: ibid.
‘He was always thin . . .’: Rupert Smith, Attitude,Vol. 1, No. 3, July 1994.
‘He began to look like a monster . . .’: ibid.
‘A lot of people took off . . .’: The Nomi Song, dir.Andrew Horn (2004).
‘I remember seeing him . . .’: ibid.
‘bodily signs designed to expose . . .’: Erving Goffman, Stigma: Notes on the Management of
Spoiled Identity (Penguin, 1990 [1963]), p. 11.
‘reduced . . .’: ibid., p. 12.
References to Margaret Heckler and the White House press conference are drawn from Jon
Cohen, Shots in the Dark:The Wayward Search for an AIDS Vaccine (W. W. Norton, 2001)
pp. 3–6.
‘There is one, only one . . .’: Pat Buchanan, ‘AIDS and moral bankruptcy’, New York Post, 2
December 1987.
‘Then came the sledgehammer . . .’: Bruce Benderson, Sex and Isolation (University of
Wisconsin Press, 2007), p. 167.
‘found herself frightened . . .’: Michael Daly, ‘Aids Anxiety’, New York Magazine, 20 June
1983.
‘a community of pariahs . . .’: Susan Sontag, Illness as Metaphor and AIDS and Its
Metaphors (Penguin Modern Classics, 2002 [1978/1989]), p. 110.
‘I used my own . . .’: Andy Warhol, The Andy Warhol Diaries, p. 506.
‘I didn’t want to be near . . .’: ibid., p. 429.
‘The New York Times had a big article . . .’: ibid., p. 442.
‘We went and watched . . .’: ibid., p. 583.
‘You know, I wouldn’t be surprised . . .’: ibid., p. 692.
‘Then they picked me up . . .’: ibid., p. 800.
‘the other news from . . .’: ibid., p. 760.
‘risk-taking individuals . . .’: Sarah Schulman, Gentrification of the Mind (University of
California Press, 2012), p. 38.
‘Peter was probably . . .’: Stephen Koch, interview with author, 9 September 2014.
‘You know why . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, Close to the Knives, p. 106.
‘the rabid strangers . . .’: ibid., p. 104.
198
199
200
201
201
204
205
206
207
209
209
209
211
213
214
215
226
228
231
232
234
235
236
237
241
242
243
‘If you want to stop AIDS . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, 7 Miles A Second (Fantagraphics, 2013),
p. 47.
‘that beautiful hand . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, Close to the Knives, pp. 102–3.
‘The beginning of the end . . .’: Sarah Schulman, People in Trouble (Sheba Feminist Press,
1990), p. 1.
‘merge one’s body . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, untitled manuscript, Fales, Series 3A, Box 5, Folder
160.
‘If I could attach . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, 7 Miles A Second, p. 61.
‘My rage is really about the fact . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, Close to the Knives, p. 114.
‘One day politicians . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, Untitled (One day this kid), courtesy of the
Estate of David Wojnarowicz and P.P.O.W. Gallery, 1990.
‘I use images of sexuality . . .’: David Wojnarowicz vs.The American Family Association and
Reverend Donald E. Wildmon, 25 June 1990, in Bruce Selcraig, ‘Reverend Wildmon’s War on the
Arts’, New York Times, 2 December 1990.
‘I didn’t want to ruin . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, Memories That Smell Like Gasoline (Artspace
Books, 1992), p. 48.
‘He’s loved . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, unpublished journal entry, Fales, Series 1, Box 2, Folder 35,
13 November 1987.
‘David has a problem . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, unpublished journal entry, Fales, Series 1, Box
2, Folder 30, ‘1991 or thereabouts’.
‘I am glass, clear empty glass . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, Memories That Smell Like Gasoline,
pp. 60–61.
‘It was very much alive . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, unpublished audio journal, Fales, Series 8A,
‘1988 Journal, Nov/Dec’.
‘To place an object or writing . . .’: ibid., p. 156.
‘To make the private into . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, Close to the Knives, p. 121.
‘once this body drops . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, Brush Fires in the Social Landscape
(Aperture, 2015), p. 160.
CHAPTER 7: RENDER GHOSTS
‘almost sleepy . . .’:Jennifer Egan, A Visit from the Goon Squad (Corsair, 2011), p. 317.
‘Likewise, at a screen . . .’: Sherry Turkle, Alone Together:Why We Expect More from
Technology and Less from Each Other (Basic Books, 2011), p. 188.
‘If I’m in a certain mood . . .’: We Live in Public, dir. Ondi Timoner (2009).
‘I think that I love . . .’: ibid.
‘Andy Warhol was wrong . . .’: Richard Siklos,‘Pseudo’s Josh Harris: The Warhol of
Webcasting’, Businessweek, 26 January 2000.
‘People gathered night after . . .’: Jonathan Ames, ‘Jonathan Ames, RIP’, New York Press, 18
January 2000.
‘We are very much alone . . .’: Bruce Benderson, Sex and Isolation, p. 7.
‘There’s all these people . . .’: We Live in Public, dir. Ondi Timoner (2009).
‘it didn’t matter . . .’: Ondi Timoner, MoMA screening of We Live in Public, 5 April 2009.
‘My only friend was the tube . . .’: First Person: Harvesting Me, dir. Errol Morris (2001).
‘I feel like I’m in uh . . .’: Mario Montez, Screen Test #2, dir. Andy Warhol (1965).
244
244
246
248
249
251
251
252
255
256
258
259
260
261
261
263
263
264
264
268
268
268
270
273
273
274
276
277
278
279
‘The mass medium of television . . .’: Benjamin Secher,‘Andy Warhol TV: maddening but
intoxicating’, Telegraph, 30 September 2008.
‘If you were the star . . .’: Andy Warhol, The Philosophy of Andy Warhol, pp. 146–7.
‘Not really. I make friends . . .’: Blade Runner, dir. Ridley Scott (1982).
‘But now that heightened . . .’: Susan Sontag, Illness as Metaphor and AIDS and Its
Metaphors, p. 178.
‘All the animals come out . . .’: Taxi Driver, dir. Martin Scorsese (1976).
‘What really twisted my brain . . .’: David Wojnarowicz, 7 Miles A Second, p. 15.
‘The closing of the center city . . .’: Bruce Benderson, Sex and Isolation, p. 7.
‘The tortoise lays on its back . . .’: Blade Runner, dir. Ridley Scott (1982).
CHAPTER 8: STRANGE FRUIT
‘the daily affirmation . . .’: Sarah Schulman, Gentrification of the Mind, p. 27.
Larry Krone, Then and Now (Cape Collaboration).
‘It was sort of a way . . .’: Zoe Leonard, Secession (Wiener Secession, 1997), p. 17.
‘And it wasn’t the pneumonia . . .’: Billie Holiday, with William Dufty, Lady Sings the Blues
(Harlem Moon, 2006 [1956]), p. 77.
‘to spell out all the things . . .’: ibid., p. 94.
Zoe Leonard, ACT UP Oral History Project, Interview No. 106, 13 January 2010.
‘From a distance . . .’: Jenni Sorkin, ‘Finding the Right Darkness’, Frieze, Issue 113, March
2008.
‘String can be looked upon . . .’: D. W. Winnicott, Playing and Reality (Routledge, 1971), p.
19.
‘1) going to pieces . . .’: D. W. Winnicott, Babies and Their Mothers (Free Association Books,
1988), p. 99.
‘into a denial . . .’: D. W. Winnicott, Playing and Reality, p. 19.
‘Tantrums over tangles . . .’: Henry Darger, Journal 27 Feb 1965 – 1 Jan 1972, Folder 33:3,
Box 33, HDP.
‘One of those kids . . .’: Andy Warhol, The Andy Warhol Diaries, p. 462.
‘But actually if he’s . . .’: ibid., p. 584.
‘I mean, how long can you suck dick . . .’: ibid., p. 641.
‘Mr. Warhol’s death . . .’: Michael Wines, ‘Jean Michel Basquiat: Hazards of Sudden Success
and Fame’, New York Times, 27 August 1988.
‘Dear Buba and Uncle Andy . . .’:Andy Warhol,TC–27,Andy Warhol Museum.
‘HI SWEETHEART . . .’: Andy Warhol, TC522, Andy Warhol Museum.
‘I think he didn’t . . .’: Donald Warhola, interview with author, 12 November 2013.
‘She does a beautiful job . . .’: Andy Warhol, The Andy Warhol Diaries, p. 421.
‘Okay, let’s get it over . . .’: ibid., p. 689.
‘He looks a bit like a woman . . .’: Phoebe Hoban, ‘Portraits: Alice Neel’s Legacy of Realism’,
New York Times, 22 April 2010.
‘was a way to think about David . . .’: Zoe Leonard, Secession, p. 18.
BIBLIOGRAPHY
Als, Hilton, White Girls (McSweeney’s, 2013)
— with Jonathan Lethem and Jeanette Winterson, Andy Warhol at Christie’s (Christie’s, 2012)
Angell, Callie, Andy Warhol Screen Tests: the Films of Andy Warhol Catalogue Raisonné, Volume 1
(Abrams, in association with Whitney Museum of American Art, 2006)
Arbus, Diane, Diane Arbus (Aperture, 2011)
Arcade, Penny, Bad Reputation: Performances, Essays, Interviews (Semiotex(e)/MIT Press, 2009)
Aviv, Rachel, ‘Netherland’, The New Yorker, 10 December 2012
Barthes, Roland, Roland Barthes (University of California Press, 1977)
— Mourning Diary (Hill & Wang, 2010)
Bender,Thomas, The Unfinished City: New York and the Metropolitan Idea (The New Press, 2002)
Benderson, Bruce, Sex and Isolation (University of Wisconsin Press, 2007)
Benjamin,Walter, One-way Street and Other Writings (Penguin, 2009)
Berman, Marshall, On the Town: One Hundred Years of Spectacle in Times Square (Verso, 2006)
Bisenbach, Klaus, ed., Henry Darger (Prestel, 2009)
— Henry Darger: Disasters of War (KW Institute for Contemporary Art, 2003)
Bockris,Victor, Warhol:The Biography (Da Capo Press, 2003 [1989])
Bonesteel, Michael, Henry Darger:Art and Selected Writings (Rizzoli, 2000)
Bowlby, John, Separation (Basic Books, 1973)
Boym, Svetlana, The Future of Nostalgia (Basic Books, 2001)
Brown, Bill, ‘Things’, Critical Inquiry, Vol. 28, No. 1
Beaumont, Matthew and Gregory Dart, eds., Restless Cities (Verso, 2010)
Cacioppo, John T. and Patrick William, Loneliness: Human Nature and the Need for Social
Connection (W. W. Norton, 2008)
— et al, ‘The Anatomy of Loneliness’, Current Directions in Psychological Science, Volume 12, No.
13, pp. 7–74, June 2003
Carr, Cynthia, Fire in the Belly: The Life and Times of David Wojnarowicz (Bloomsbury, 2012)
Chion, Michel, The Voice in Cinema (Columbia University Press, 1999)
Clements, Jennifer, Widow Basquiat (Payback Press, 2000)
Cohen, Jon, Shots in the Dark: The Wayward Search for an AIDS Vaccine (Norton, 2001)
Cole, Steve W., et al, ‘Accelerated Course of Human Immunodeficiency Virus Infection in Gay Men
Who Conceal Their Homosexuality’, Psychosomatic Medicine 58, pp. 219–31 (1996)
Colacello, Bob, Andy Warhol: Holy Terror (Harper Collins, 1990)
Connor, Steve, Dumbstruck: A Cultural History of Ventriloquism (Oxford University Press, 2000)
Cooke, Lynne and Douglas Crimp, Mixed Use, Manhattan (MIT Press, 2010)
Danto, Arthur, Andy Warhol (Yale University Press, 2009)
Davis, Glynn, and Gary Needham, eds., Warhol in Ten Takes (British Film Institute/Palgrave
Macmillan, 2013)
Delany, Samuel, The Motion of Light on Water (Paladin, 1990)
— Times Square Red, Times Square Blue (New York University Press, 1999)
Dillon, Brian, Tormented Hope: Nine Hypochondriac Lives (Penguin, 2009)
Dolar, Mladen, A Voice and Nothing More (MIT Press, 2006)
Dworkin, Craig, ‘Whereof One Cannot Speak’, Grey Room, Vol. 21, Fall 2005
Fahs, Breanne, Valerie Solanas (The Feminist Press, 2014)
Foster, Carter, Hopper’s Drawings (Whitney Museum/Yale University Press, 2013)
Foucault, Michel, and Richard Sennett, ‘Sexuality and Solitude’, London Review of Books, Vol. 3, No.
9, 21 May 1981
Frei, George, Sally King-Nero, and Neil Printz, eds., Andy Warhol Catalogue Raisonné Volume 1:
Paintings and Sculpture 1961–1963 (Phaidon Press, 2002)
— Andy Warhol Catalogue Raisonné Volumes 2A and 2B: Paintings and Sculptures 1964–1969
(Phaidon Press, 2004)
Freud, Anna, ‘About Losing and Being Lost’, Indications for Child Analysis and Other Papers
1945–1956 (The Hogarth Press, 1969)
Friedberg, Anne, The Virtual Window: From Alberti to Microsoft (MIT Press, 2006)
Fromm-Reichmann, Frieda, Principles of Intensive Psychotherapy (Allen & Unwin, 1953)
— ed. Dexter M. Bullard, Psychoanalysis and Psychotherapy: Selected Papers of Frieda FrommReichmann (University of Chicago Press, 1959)
Glembocki, Vicki, ‘Are You Lonely?’ Research/Penn State (Vol. 14, No. 3, September 1993)
Goffman, Erving, Stigma: Notes on a Spoiled Identity (Penguin, 1990 [1963])
Goldin, Nan, The Ballad of Sexual Dependency (Aperture, 2012 [1986])
—The Other Side 1972–1992 (Cornerhouse Publications, 1993)
—I’ll Be Your Mirror (Whitney Museum of Art, 1997)
Goldsmith, Kenneth, I’ll Be Your Mirror: The Selected Andy Warhol Interviews (Da Capo Press,
2004)
Goodrich, Lloyd, Edward Hopper (H. N. Abrams, 1993)
Gould, Deborah B., Moving Politics: Emotion and ACT UP’s Fight against AIDS (University of
Chicago Press, 2009)
Griffin, Jo, The Lonely Society? (Mental Health Foundation, 2010)
Groy, Christian, et al, ‘Loneliness and HIV-related stigma explain depression among older HIV-positive
adults’, AIDS Care, Vol. 22, No. 5, 2010
Hagberg, G. L., Art as Language:Wittgenstein, Meaning, and Aesthetic Theory (Cornell University
Press, 1995)
Hager, Steven, Art After Midnight:The East Village Scene (St Martin’s Press, 1986)
Hainley, Bruce, ‘New York Conversation: Reading a: A Novel by Andy Warhol’, Frieze, Issue 39,
March–April 1998
Halperin, David M., andValerie Traub, eds., Gay Shame (University of Chicago Press, 2009)
Haraway, Donna, Cyborgs, Simians and Women: The Reinvention of Nature (Free Association
Books, 1991)
Harlow, Harry, and Clara Mears, The Human Model: Primate Perspectives (Wiley, 1979)
—and Stephen J. Suomi, ‘Induced Depression in Monkeys’, Behavioral Biology, Vol. 12, 1974
Herek, Gregory M.,‘Illness, Stigma, and AIDS’, in G. R.VandenBos, ed., Psychological Aspects of
Serious Illness (American Psychological Association, 1990)
—ed., ‘Aids and Stigma in the United States: A special issue of American Behavioral Scientist’ (Sage
Publications, 1999)
Holiday, Billie, with William Dufty, Lady Sings the Blues (Harlem Moon, 2006 [1956])
Howe, Marie, and Michael Klein, In the Company of My Solitude: American Writing from the AIDS
Pandemic (Persea Books, 1995)
Hughes, Robert, Ethics, Aesthetics, and the Beyond of Language (State University of New York
Press, 2010)
Hujar, Peter, Portraits in Life and Death (Da Capo Press, 1977)
— and Vince Aletti and Stephen Koch, Love & Lust (Fraenkel Gallery, 2014)
Huxley, Geralyn, and Matt Wrbican, Andy Warhol Treasures (Goodman Books, 2009)
Jarman, Derek, Modern Nature (Century, 1991)
—At Your Own Risk: A Saint’s Testament (Hutchinson, 1992)
—The Garden (Thames & Hudson, 1995)
Julius, Anthony, Transgressions: The Offences of Art (Thames & Hudson, 2002)
Kasher, Steven, Max’s Kansas City (Abrams Image, 2010)
Kirkpatrick, David, ‘Suddenly Pseudo’, New York Magazine, 22 December 1999
Klein, Melanie, Love, Guilt and Reparation and Other Works 1921–1945 (Free Press, 1984 [1975])
— Envy and Gratitude and Other Works 1946–1963 (The Hogarth Press, 1975)
Koch, Stephen, Stargazer: The Life, World and Films of Andy Warhol (Marion Boyars, 2000)
Koestenbaum, Wayne, Humiliation (Picador, 2011)
— Andy Warhol: A Biography (Phoenix, 2003)
— My 1980s (FSG, 2013)
Koolhaas, Rem, Delirious New York: A Retroactive Manifesto for Manhattan (Monacelli Press,
1994)
Kramer, Larry, Faggots (Minerva, 1990 [1978])
Kuh, Katharine, The Artist’sVoice:Talks with Seventeen Artists (Harper & Row, 1960)
Lahr, John, Prick Up Your Ears:The Biography of Joe Orton (Penguin, 1980)
Leonard, Zoe, Secession (Wiener Secession, 1997)
Levin, Gail, Hopper’s Places (Knopf, 1989)
—Edward Hopper: An Intimate Biography (Rizzoli, 2007)
—ed., Silent Places: A Tribute to Edward Hopper (Universe, 2000)
Lotringer, Sylvère, ed., David Wojnarowicz: A definitive history of five or six years on the lower
east side (Semiotext(e), 2006)
Lyons, Deborah, ed., Edward Hopper: A Journal of His Work (Whitney Museum of American
Art/W. W. Norton, 1997)
MacGregor, John, Henry Darger: In the Realms of the Unreal (Delano Greenidge Editions, 2002)
Masters, Christopher, Windows in Art (Merrell, 2011)
Malanga, Gerard, and Andy Warhol, Screen Tests | A Diary (Kulchur Press, 1967)
McNamara, Robert P., ed., Sex, Scams and Streetlife: the Sociology of New York City’s Times
Square (Praeger, 1995)
Mijuskovic, Ben Lazre, Loneliness (Associated Faculty Press, Inc., 1979)
— Loneliness in Philosophy, Psychology and Literature (Van Gorcum, Assen, 1979)
Modell, Arnold H., The Private Self (Harvard University Press, 1993)
Moore, Patrick, Beyond Shame: Reclaiming the Abandoned History of Radical Gay Sexuality
(Beacon Press, 2005)
Moustakas, Clark, Loneliness (Jason Aranson Inc., 1996 [1961])
Mueller, Cookie, Walking Through Clear Water in a Pool Painted Black (Semiotext(e)/Native
Agents, 1990)
Muñoz, José Esteban, Cruising Utopia:The Then and There of Queer Futurity (New York University
Press, 2009)
Name, Billy, and John Cale, The Silver Age: Black and White Photographs from Andy Warhol’s
Factory (Reel Art Press, 2014)
Nelson, Maggie, Bluets (Wave Books, 2009)
—The Art of Cruelty (W. W. Norton & Co., 2011)
—The Argonauts (Graywolf Press, 2015)
O’Doherty, Brian, American Masters: The Voice and the Myth (E. P. Dutton, 1982)
Orton, Joe, ed. John Lahr, The Orton Diaries (Methuen, 1986)
Prinz, Neil, and Sally King-Nero, eds., Andy Warhol Catalogue Raisonné Volume 3: Paintings and
Sculpture 1970–74 (Phaidon Press, 2010)
— Andy Warhol Catalogue Raisonné Volume 4: Paintings and Sculpture late 1974–76 (Phaidon
Press, 2014)
Renner, Rolf G., Edward Hopper (Taschen, 2011)
Sanders, Charles L.,‘Lady Didn’t Always Sing the Blues’, Ebony, Vol. 28, No. 3, January 1973
Sante, Luc, Low Life (Vintage Departures, 1992)
—‘My Lost City’, The New York Review of Books, 6 November 2003
Scholder, Amy, ed., Fever: The Art of David Wojnarowicz (New Museum Books/Rizzoli, 1999)
Schulman, Sarah, People in Trouble (Sheba Feminist Press, 1990)
—Girls, Visions and Everything (Sheba Feminist Press, 1991)
—My American History: Lesbian and Gay Life During the Reagan/Bush Years (Routledge, 1994)
—The Gentrification of the Mind: Witness to a Lost Imagination (University of California Press,
2012)
Sedgwick, Eve Kosofsky, Tendencies (Duke University Press, 1994)
—A Dialogue on Love (Beacon Press, 2000)
Senior, Jennifer, ‘Alone Together’, New York, 23 November 2008
Serres, Michel, trans. Margaret Sankey and Peter Cowley, The Five Senses: A Philosophy of
Mingled Bodies (Continuum, 2008)
Shafrazi, Tony, Carter Ratcliff, and Robert Rosenblum, Andy Warhol: Portraits (Phaidon Press, 2007)
Shilts, Randy, And the Band Played On: Politics, People and the AIDS Epidemic (St Martin’s Press,
1987)
Shore, Stephen, and Lynne Tillman, The Velvet Years:Warhol’s Factory 1965-67 (Pavilion Books,
1995)
Shuleviz, Judith,‘The Lethality of Loneliness’, New Republic, 13 May 2013
Smith, Andrew, Totally Wired: On the Trail of the Great Dotcom Swindle (Simon & Schuster, 2013)
Smith, Rupert, ‘Klaus Nomi’, Attitude, Vol. 1, No. 3, July 1994.
Solanas, Valerie, SCUM Manifesto (Verso, 2001 [1971])
Sontag, Susan, Regarding the Pain of Others (Penguin, 2004)
—Against Interpretation and Other Essays (Penguin Modern Classics, 2009 [1966])
—Illness as Metaphor and Aids and Its Metaphors (Penguin Modern Classics, 2002 [1978/1989])
Specter, Michael, ‘Higher Risk’, The New Yorker, 23 May 2005
Stimson, Blake, Citizen Warhol (Reaktion Books, 2014)
Sullivan, Harry Stack, The Interpersonal Theory of Psychiatry (Routledge, 2001 [1953])
Thomson, David, The Big Screen:The Story of the Movies and What They Did To Us (Allen Lane,
2012)
Taylor, Marvin, ed., The Downtown Book: The New York Art Scene 1974–1984 (Princeton
University Press, 2006)
— and Julie Ault, ‘Active Recollection’, in Julie Ault, Afterlife: a constellation (Whitney Museum of
Art, 2014)
Tillman, Lynne, ‘The Last Words Are Andy Warhol’, Grey Room, Vol. 21, Fall 2005
Turkle, Sherry, The Second Self: Computers and the Human Spirit (Simon & Schuster, 1984)
—Life on the Screen: Identity in the Age of the Internet (Simon & Schuster, 1995)
—Alone Together: Why We Expect More from Technology and Less from Each Other (Basic
Books, 2011)
Updike, John, Still Looking: Essays on American Art (Alfred A. Knopf, 2006)
Van der Horst, Frank C. P., and René Van der Veer, ‘Loneliness in Infancy: Harry Harlow, John Bowlby
and Issues of Separation’, in Integrative Psychological & Behavioral Science,Vol. 42, Issue 4,
2008
Warhol, Andy, a, a novel (Virgin, 2005 [1968])
—The Philosophy of Andy Warhol: From A to B and Back Again (Penguin, 2007 [1975])
—The Andy Warhol Diaries, edited by Pat Hackett (Warner Books, 1989)
—and Gerard Malanga, Screen Tests: A Diary (Kulchur Press/Citadel Press, 1967)
—and Pat Hackett, POPism (Penguin, 2007 [1980])
—and Udo Kittelmann, John W. Smith, and Matt Wrbican, Andy Warhol’s Time Capsule 21 (Dumont,
2004)
Weinberg, Jonathan, ‘City-Condoned Anarchy’, curatorial essay for ‘The Piers: Art and Sex along the
New York Waterfront’, curated by Jonathan Weinberg with Darren Jones, Leslie Lohman Museum
of Gay and Lesbian Art, 4 April–10 May 2012
Weiss, R. S., Loneliness: The Experience of Emotional and Social Isolation (MIT Press, 1975)
Wells, Walter, Silent Theater: The Art of Edward Hopper (Phaidon, 2007)
Wilcox, John, and Christopher Trela, The Autobiography and Sex Life of Andy Warhol (Trela Media,
2010)
Winnicott, D. W., Playing and Reality (Routledge, 1971)
—Babies and Their Mothers (Free Association Books, 1988)
Wittgenstein, Ludwig, Tractatus Logico-Philosophicus (Harcourt, Brace & Co., 1922)
—Philosophical Investigations, translated by G. E. M. Anscombe (Basil Blackwell, 1986 [1958])
Wojnarowicz, David, Close to the Knives: A Memoir of Disintegration (Vintage, 1991)
—Memories That Smell Like Gasoline (Artspace Books, 1992)
—The Waterfront Journals (Grove Press, 1997)
—Brush Fires in the Social Landscape (Aperture, 2015 [1994])
—ed. Barry Blinderman,Tongues of Flame (Illinois State University/Art Publishers, 1990)
—ed. Amy Scholder, In the Shadow of the American Dream (Grove Press, 2000)
—with Tom Rauffenbart, Rimbaud in New York (Andrew Roth, 2004)
—with James Romberger and Marguerite Van Cook, 7 Miles a Second (Fantagraphics, 2013)
Wolf, Reva, Andy Warhol, Poetry, and Gossip in the 1960s (University of Chicago Press, 1997)
Woolf,Virginia, ed. Anne Olivier Bell, The Diary of Virginia Woolf, Volume III 1925–1930 (The
Hogarth Press, 1980)
Woronov, Mary, Swimming Underground: My Years in the Warhol Factory (Serpent’s Tail, 2004)
Wrenn, Mike, ed., Andy Warhol: In His Own Words (Omnibus Press, 1991)
ACKNOWLEDGEMENTS
ONE MIGHT EXPECT WRITING A book about loneliness to be an isolating
experience, but on the contrary it has been astonishingly connecting. I’ve
been amazed at how many people have gone out of their way to support this
project, and it underscores my sense that loneliness is something we share.
The first person I want to thank is my friend Matt Wolf, who introduced
me to David Wojnarowicz’s work, thereby setting this book in motion, and
who has been an endless source of ideas and contacts ever since.
Huge thanks are due to those who made The Lonely City possible, a list
that must start with my beloved agents at Janklow & Nesbit, the wonderful
Rebecca Carter and P. J. Mark, dream readers both, as well as Claire Conrad
and Kirsty Gordon. I also want to thank my terrific editors, Jenny Lord at
Canongate and Stephen Morrison at Picador, for their insightful and
considered feedback and support. I’m indebted to the Arts Council, who
funded a research trip to various American archives, and to the Corporation
of Yaddo, who provided me with the ideal place to work. I’m also very
grateful to the MacDowell Colony: this book really arose from friendships I
made there.
Thanks too to all the teams at Canongate and Picador, especially Jamie
Byng, Natasha Hodgson, Anna Frame, Annie Lee and Lorraine McCann on
one side of the Atlantic, and P. J. Horoszko, Declan Taintor and James
Meader on the other. And Nick Davies, too, who started it all rolling.
I’ve spent much of the last few years in artists’ archives. I’m very
grateful to all at Fales Library at New York University, home of the
Downtown Collection and the David Wojnarowicz Papers and an intensely
inspiring place in its own right. Particular thanks to Lisa Darms, Marvin
Taylor, Nicholas Martin and Brent Phillips, and also to Tom Rauffenbart, the
exceptionally generous executor of the estate of David Wojnarowicz. The
staff at the American Folk Art Museum, home of the Henry Darger Papers,
likewise provided very generous support. Thanks to Valérie Rousseau, Karl
Miller, Ann-Marie Reilly and Mimi Lester. I’m also grateful to INTUIT in
Chicago for letting me view the Darger room. At the Whitney Museum of
American Art, I’d like to thank curator Carter Foster and Carol Rusk,
Librarian at the Edward and Josephine Hopper Research Collection. And I’d
like to say a huge thank you to all the staff at the Warhol Museum, whose
kindness, generosity and help went well beyond the call of duty, particularly
Matt Wrbican, Cindy Lisica, Geralyn Huxley, Greg Pierce and Greg
Burchard.
While I was working on this book, I was lucky enough to be awarded a
year’s residency at the Eccles Centre for American Studies at the British
Library. I’d like to express my deep gratitude to Philip Davies, Catherine
Eccles, Cara Rodway, Matthew Shaw and especially Carole Holden – it’s
every writer’s dream to work with a curator who shares their interests and
sensibilities and it was a joy to get such a passionate and knowledgeable
guide to the BL’s contents.
People who generously gave up their time to be interviewed or answer
queries include John Cacioppo at the University of Chicago, Cynthia Carr,
Stephen Koch at the Peter Hujar Archive (who also generously provided the
beautiful Hujar portrait of Wojnarowicz on p. 94), and Donald Warhola.
Thank you all. I’m also deeply grateful to Sarah Schulman, whose own work
is such a constant source of education and inspiration.
Thank you to my exceptionally lovely writerly support team of Elizabeth
Day and Francesca Segal, without whom it would take a lot longer and be
much less fun. To Elizabeth Tinsley, whose thinking has been stimulating
mine for decades now. To the artists, too: Sarah Wood and Sherri
Wasserman, thank you. And a very special thanks to the magnificent Ian
Patterson, who read and commented on a multitude of early drafts with vast
intelligence and patience.
Then there are the friends and colleagues who’ve discussed, read, edited,
encouraged, fed and housed me. In the UK: Nick Blackburn, Stuart Croll,
Clare Davies, Jon Day, Robert Dickinson, John Gallagher, Tony Gammidge,
John Griffiths, Tom de Grunwald, Christina McLeish, Helen Macdonald, Leo
Mellor, Tricia Murphy, James Purdon, Sigrid Rausing and Jordan Savage. In
the USA: David Adjmi, Liz Duffy Adams, Kyle de Camp, Deb Chachra, Jean
Hannah Edelstein, Andrew Ginzel, Scott Guild, Alex Halberstadt, Amber
Hawk Swanson, Joseph Keckler, Larry Krone, Dan Levenson, Elizabeth
McCracken, Jonathan Monaghan, John Pittman, the late Alastair Reid,
Andrew Sempere, Daniel Smith, Schulyer Towne, Benjamen Walker and
Carl Williamson.
For support with research materials: Brad Daly, Harko Kejzer, Heather
Mallick, John Pittman, Cerys Matthews and Steven Abbott, Kio Stark and
Eileen Storey, as well as several unknown but much appreciated benefactors.
Elements of this book first appeared in Granta, Aeon, The Junket,
Guardian and New Statesman. Thanks too to all my editors there.
My deepest thanks go, as ever, to my family. My brilliant sister, Kitty
Laing, who was on to some of the scenes on these pages long before me; my
beloved father, Peter Laing; and my mother, Denise Laing, who has been
reading since the beginning, and whose support I could not do without.
LIST OF ILLUSTRATIONS
Greta Garbo, 1955, by Lisa Larsen. Courtesy of The LIFE Picture
Collection/Getty Images.
Edward Hopper, 1941, by Arnold Newman. Courtesy of Getty Images.
Warhol on the phone, 1972, by Michael Ochs. Courtesy of the Michael Ochs
Archives/Getty Images.
David Wojnarowicz with a Snake, 1981, by Peter Hujar. © 1987 The Peter
Hujar Archive LLC. Courtesy Pace/MacGill Gallery NY and Fraenkel
Gallery CA.
Henry Darger, 1971, by David Berglund.
Klaus Nomi, 1979, by William Coupon. Courtesy of William Coupon.
Scene from WE LIVE IN PUBLIC, 1999. Courtesy of Interloper Films.
Polaroid of Andy Warhol Posing for Alice Neel, 1970, by Brigid Berlin.
Copyright Brigid Berlin. All Rights Reserved. Courtesy of Vincent
Fremont Enterprises, Inc.
Arthur Rimbaud in New York (Times Square), 1978-79, by David
Wojnarowicz (gelatin-silver print, 8 x 10 inches). Courtesy of the Estate
of David Wojnarowicz and P.P.O.W. Gallery, New York.
CHANNELLING GREAT CONTENT
INTERVIEWS, TRAILERS, ANIMATIONS, READINGS, GIGS
AUDIO BOOKS, PODCASTS, MUSIC, PLAYLISTS
CHAPTERS, EXCERPTS, SNEAK PEEKS,
RECOMMENDATIONS
BLOGS, EVENTS, NEWS, CREATIVE PARTNERS
LIMITED EDITIONS, BUNDLES, SECRET SALES